Episode 5x01 "Weight Loss" (1.01) All right, everybody. This is your last meal. So eat up. From this point forward, you will not use the bathroom. We need to keep our starting weights high. So we can lose more. This summer, corporate is sponsoring a little weight loss contest between the branches. Whichever branch loses the most weight gets 3 extra vacation days. - What should we do with the leftovers? - I'm taking the dumplings for my wife. No, this is your last meal. There will be no leftovers. I can bring these to my shelter. I'm taking my dumplings. There. Take those home to your wife. - Dwight, Dwight! - Michael, it's time! Hit the scales, everybody. Get right on that black platform. This way. Step it up. Don't go breaking my scale. I'm excited to lose weight for the wedding. Because I really want to have washboard abs. The first time Angela sees me naked. Ex-squeeze me. No, I will ex-squeeze you. OK everybody, get used to this. Because we are going to be standing here briefly every monday for the next seven mondays. Wait a minute. One more bite of eclair each. Hold it in your mouth if you can't swallow. Really? Nothing? You all need to learn some portion control. Wait a minute. Pam is on the scale. Pam-cake, no. We would love your extra poundage, but you're going to be leaving us next week, so Vamos. - OK. - Vamos, Pam. - Dunder Mifflin Family only. - Family only. All right, got it. You weigh 226 pounds? - Almost, Kevin. - Not almost though, Holly. I mean, not close to 200. - Math is hard. - Yeah. Just We'll just keep going. All I had this weekend to eat was a chicken breast - and a case of Diet Coke. - Really? 'Cause I haven't eaten anything since noon on Friday. Stanley, come on. I forgot something in my car. I'll see you guys up there. I happen to be losing weight on my own for my own reasons. The truth is I have lost a little of my speed. A little of my fire. Here's what I used to look like. Look at those biceps. We were fighting the power and eating whatever we wanted. And arch your back. And slowly bring up your head. - Jimbo. - They moved the shower? Did you see Holly's butt? Nope, I didn't. - You know why? - Why? Cause most of the time friends don't talk about other friend's butts. - I know. - But what have you learned about her? I learned that she broke her left leg twice in one year. I learned that she's allergic to sesame seeds. I learned that she has read Lonesome Dove three times. - Nice. - And that her butt refuses to quit! Well, I tried. You have You have to agree with me. That's insane. - I'll just go later. - I thought you had to pee. If you're into yoga, I take a great Bikram class in Dickson City. Thanks, I should check that out. Also, and no pressure, the teacher, he's a catch. - Actually, I'm a lesbian. - I'm gay. - I'm not a lesbian. - I don't know why I said that. - Stupid joke. - What's the joke? There is no joke. I just said it because I haven't had much luck lately, and I'm not really looking to date, so Maybe I should switch to women. You think it's a choice? I'm gonna head back to my work area and just I'm messing with you, Holly. I knew that. So you have the directions? You have a toothbrush? - You have a cell phone charger? - I have everything. Tomorrow I start a three month design program at the Pratt Institute in New York. I will be a little fish in the Big Apple. What up, 212? Fax this for me. Come on, she goes to New York in like, 10mn. It's not gonna take her If I don't see you again, goodbye. Well, actually I'll see you when you give me the fax confirmation, so never mind. Ang ela. Under my Angerela - What? - Hey, check it out. This is The Breakers. Newport, Rhode Island. Huge awesome gorgeous mansion overlooking the Atlantic. And my dad went to Cornell with the current groundskeeper. Every little boy fantasizes about his fairytale wedding. This is where my parents decided not to get divorced. I don't care. How do you feel about Maine? I'm on it. I'll see you later, love. We done good in there, half-pint. That was the last time, Dwight. I mean it. Monkey I have a fiance I very much like. - What happened? - I wrote you a goodbye poem. It's really long. I left it up in my office. Could you please wait till I go get it? - I should really get going. - No! The last word is "seagulls". - I'm sure it was really lovely. - I took a lot from other poems. - Call me when you get in. - OK, bye. - All right, call - No, Michael. Why haven't I proposed yet? Actually, Pam and I talked about it, and we just decided that Well, we didn't want to spend the first And Pam's always said she doesn't want a long engagement. Something in her past, I guess. Not really sure of the whole story. Something about a guy who used to work here. Same places as last week. - Doesn't matter. - Yes it does. This is about weight displacement. We have to have the same weight distribution. Right here. There we go. Let's move that up. There we go. Fancy meeting you here. All right. OK, everybody smile. You lost 31 pounds. - All right! - Yes! Can't believe I'm saying this, but Michael is actually killing it with Holly. And I think I know why. It's because Holly is kind of a major dork. I'm Mc Mike Scott And I am hot She's Dj Jazzy Flax And she is the best All those sucker branches Can suck our fat Dunder Mifflin. This is Ronnie. I don't really know Ronnie. But I have a feeling I will get to know her very well over the next few years. And eventually declare my love for her. Sorry I'm late. I accidentally switched my alarm clock setting to Zapf Chancery. Which is my terrible segue into our course: Expressive typography in new media. I'm in the wrong class. Some of you may remember from last semester. I am professor Monaghan and Looks like I'm boring someone already. - No, I just - Please sit down. - You're shaking. Are you all right? - Just leave me alone! I am on the third day of my cleanse diet. All I have to do is drink maple syrup, lemon juice, cayenne pepper, and water, for all three meals. I just bought some bikinis online, size 2. So Gonna look amazing! Hi, can I help you? I need you to make me 100 copies of this on canary yellow. - Hey, Jan. How's the candle game? - Hi. Great, yeah. Serenity by Jan is kicking ass and taking names. Remember last week when that girl went missing? Guess whose candles they used for the vigil? Cool. Thank god they found her too. They found her? Hey, Jan. Hello, baby! How are you? Good to see you. Who's your daddy? You don't know who your daddy is, do you? No, you don't. Come on, let's go in. When Michael told us that Jan was pregnant, he lead us to believe that he was the father by telling us that he was the father. Who's that woman in Michael's office with the feet? - That's his ex. - She's very beautiful. Yes, she is. And clinically insane. So listen I don't know if your offer still stands or whatever, but you can give your yoga teacher my number. Listen, dummy, it's not that hard. All you have to do is take the numbers from the sales report and type them into a master spreadsheet. A g.d. monkey could do it. I don't understand why you can't do it. You do not talk to him like that! But he's an idiot! - He is not an idiot. - Thank you, Holly. He is mentally challenged. But he's doing a super job here. Wait, back up. Do you think that I'm retarded? Dwight Holly, that is very offensive. I'm sorry. So Since my little lady has such particular impossible to perceive taste, I have made non-refundable deposits at four totally different wedding locales. Hot air balloons over Napa Valley. World-famous Walt Disney's Epcot center. Scuba Diving Wedding in the Bahamas. And the Wilkes-Barre Marriott, ballroom C. Dangerous, tacky, sharks, haunted - Hurry, we have to make this fast. - Let's do this thing. I have a nice comforter and several cozy pillows. I usually read a chapter of a book, and it's lights out by 8:30. That's how I sleep at night. All right, I am connecting. And you are not there. Did you install it right? How about this? Go to applications - I can see you! - All right! This is so cool! So what is going on, girl in the computer? Lunch with a girl from my hall. Ceramics class. Then dinner by myself. I'm gonna watch HGTV, and maybe go to Bungalow 8 with John Mayer. Can you turn the girl off, please? I'm trying to get some work done. No way! Pam Beesly! Hey, everybody, look, Pam! Pam! Say hi! Say hi to Pam. Don't we all look skinny? Almost dropped you. Can you put me down? I'm getting nauseous. Pam, I would like you to meet Ronnie. We call her Rice-a-ronnie. She is hilarious. She is wonderful. A beam of light in this dark, dark office. Not really so much. All she does is plop herself down there and answer phones all day. The nerve. Calm down, weirdo. It's just a joke. She's such a weirdo! You know what? My real beef with her, though, Pam? Is that she can't find those little colored paperclips I like so much. - Would you help her find 'em, please? - They're on the supply shelf. Let's go. We are following Pam to the supply shelf. Let us go. New york is so exciting. I love my classes. The city's awesome. Can you give me back to Jim now, please? OK, everybody, let's suck in our guts. for a grand You all gained five pounds back. Damn it! Come on! Oh, my god! Come on, Bernard. - Here we go. Everybody on. - All right, we're set. Still good. You guys lost a pound. You lost one pound. I was under IV for two days at the hospital. I lost 4 pounds. I don't know what those other fools were doing, but I lost 4 pounds. Angela, you'll go to the supermarket and get the New York cheesecake. Make sure it's the generic one. It's Stanley's favorite. Yes, I've replaced Angela as head of the party planning committee. I guess I was just in the right place at the right time. How's it going? - It's going well. - Good. I have a crazy idea. What if we did fruit instead of cake? Cake? Who suggested cake? Phyllis. We lost weight today. I think it's OK to reward ourselves once in a while. Are you kidding me? We only lost one pound, Phyllis. What is wrong with these people? They have no will power. I went I once went 28 years without having sex. And then again for seven years. Does anyone have any idea what the number one cause of death is in this country? - Shotgun weddings. - That's not what that is. Fright. Being scared to death. - Obesity-caused illnesses. - Obesity-caused illnesses. Thank you. Holly's right. People, this is not just about winning some extra vacation days. This is about a very cool H.R. initiative That if we don't follow, we are all going to die of obesity. - So how much are we gonna lose? - I would like to lose 65 pounds. Yes! All right. Who else? Angela, can I put you own for 10 pounds? No, my doctor wants me to gain weight. If you gain weight, you will die. I want you to live forever. I want us all to live forever. How are we gonna do this? Cryogenics. Beer me five. This is how we're gonna do it. I'm asking each of you to lose 5 pounds. That plus Jim's 65 will give us a very good chance at winning this thing. All right, I'm taking off. - Booty call. - Nope, just going to see Pam. - Maybe put up some shelves. - Wait a second. I don't want you to end up with a surprise pregnancy like me. OK, thank you for this. - You want more? - No. I don't know if there's any one place that has all these things. It's not my problem. "A thousand-year-old church in the continental United States. "There has to be a rainbow. - "24-hour veterinarian on call". - That is very important to me. So I have work to do. Just do it. Sweetheart. Just so you know, I don't care where we get married. I'll marry you right here in this building. I'll marry you in the parking lot. I'll marry you in the eye of a hurricane, in the middle of a snowstorm, on top of a monsoon. All I care about is that we're gonna spend the rest of our lives together. I know I haven't made this easy on you. That's so rude of me. Have you seen, Pam's new art? It's right there. Check it out. Just when I've begun To get myself together You waltz right in the door It's a pretty lame party. Does anyone want to dance? 'Round your little finger Here you come again Collins has pitched a near-perfect game so far. And popped up Some girl came into Pam's room crying about her roommate stealing her soy milk. So I'm in here waiting it out. Stanley, Michael's not here. You can eat a slice of your birthday cake. I don't like cake anymore. Why not, dawg? Taste changed. Now all I like is Baklava. Michael, we have a situation. They should not be in that room. - That's so lame they didn't invite us. - You know what we should do? We should have a party and not invite them. Let's go mini-golfing. Yeah? Could I have a rain check on the mini golf? I actually have a date tonight. It'll probably be a total disaster, but I think you'll have fun because men from Scranton are handsome, and they know how to show a woman a good time. Not that guy who murdered his mother. He was not so handsome. - Also Kevin. - You know what? We're pretty much done here today. Why don't you just take off early? Really? That's sweet. - Wish me luck. - Good luck. Holly doesn't need luck. Everyone that meets her instantly loves her. Party's over! You are so busted! OK, everybody. Phyllis, did I or did I not say fruit? - You said fruit, Michael. - And what is that? Cake. You know, we're gonna have to try a little bit harder if we are going to win this thing. Happy birthday, Stanley. It's king of a good news, bad news situation. The bad news is we're not doing very well, so we really had to starve ourselves this whole week. But the good news is that all the other branches are doing just as bad as we are. So corporate upped the prize to 5 days. So if we stay fat long enough, we may actually get a whole month off. - What? - Nothing. It's just some of us are taking this really seriously. I swallowed a tapeworm last night. It's going to grow up to 3 feet inside of me, And then eats all my food so that I don't get fat. And then after 3 months, I take some medicine and then I pass it. Creed sold it to me. It's from Mexico. That wasn't a tapeworm. How's my favorite branch doing? All right. Ronnie was Things were at an all-time sad here. But then I got an email from Ryan that he was coming back to town. And I called the temp agency, I told them, "I will pay you any amount. "Just give me Ryan Howard. Give him to me. "I want him. I need him." - And you got a goatee. - I did. Did you get that after you helped me move - and you saw mine? - Yes. Gooo-atee! Fire-ed guy! That's really funny. - Great to see you, Kev. - You too. I'm keeping a list of everyone who wrongs me. So when I'm back on top, they'll be sorry. Kevin just made the list. I wanted to apologize for how I treated you last year. I lost sight of myself. And now that I've quit the rat race, I realized there's so much more to life than being the youngest VP in the company's history. I've even started volunteering. Giving back to the community. That's great. You're talking about your court-ordered ommunity service? I don't need a judge to tell me to keep my community clean. But he did, right? - All right. - All right. Well, you lost zero pounds. No change. On the brighter side, you gained zero pounds. You know what? I can't do this by myself, people. Kelly and I are the only ones who either passed out or almost passed out. Damn it, I need these 5 days for my honeymoon! Who is slacking? Let's just all try and work harder, OK? No, I want names! This is the hardest thing I've ever had to do in my entire life. I haven't had a very hard life. - So how was your date? - 8.5. I got a red wine stain on my favorite shirt. But he's cute, right? What's wrong? Close the door. - This is your fault. - No. Your stupid "friend zone." I should've been lovers with her first and then friends. That was terrible advice. Terrible advice! You know my seduction method. I like to get in there and get my hands dirty. You sabotaged me. You sabotaged me, man. Attention! We only have a few weeks left, and most of you are just as fat as the day we began. How much weight have you lost? - I'm hardly the problem. - You're definitely the problem. This is what I'm gonna do. I'm gonna randomly select 3 names, and these 3 people will get liposuction. Stanley, Phyllis, Kevin. And you will be responsible for your own medical bills. Hello, Ryan. You look well. I wanted to say I'm sorry for treating you bad the past couple of years. I was in my mid-twenties, and I was going through a lot of stuff. I think I never really processed 9/11. I want you to know I've changed. - Cool. - We should get a drink later, catch up. Pick me up around 8:00? That is so sweet, But I'm dating Darryl still, and we're, like, crazy in love, so Well, maybe I'll see you around. It's a small office. Hey, Phyllis, do you have a minute? Listen I'm really sorry about what I said before, OK? I was way out of line. Yes, you were. But you know what? I want to make it up to you. There is a surefire sale, but it's a two-men job. Interested? Split the commission? I'll drive. Dieting's only half of it. Saunas. And exercise. Although I know everybody loves going to the gym. The dreadmill. Probably the weirdest thing about Pam being gone will be lunch, actually. But it will force me to become acquaintances with people I consider coworkers. My god OK. Everybody just act normal. Don't say anything. What? My ex-girlfriend, she's right behind you. - Really? Where? - Just hide me. No, don't look Was it the age difference? Actually, kind of, yes. I just didn't like eating dinner that early, so Listen, can I call you back in a little bit? I made friends. Are you insane? God, what happened? There was no client. Dwight drove me to an abandoned warehouse 5 miles away and pushed me out of the car. I had to walk home with no money and no phone. And you burned over 1,000 calories walking home. And this branch just got a little bit closer to winning the contest. - Phyllis Vance, ladies and gentlemen! - You left me in a bad part of town. Yeah, I took your purse. What are you worried about? You look great. I can definitely see the difference. Phyllis Vance for David Wallace. "Dunder Mifflin wants to make it clear "That Dunder Mifflin does not discriminate. "Nor does it condone unhealthy dieting habits "or extreme weight-loss strategies "as was clearly stated in the official" Shake! Hello, everybody! - What are you doing? - Fair question. I say, I say, I say, sit down, Holly! I'll take it from here. I am beautiful. They are beautiful. He is beautiful. This big fat pig is beautiful. It's my sumo suit. I just didn't inflate it all the way. I'm so glad that I bought instead of rented. Body image. We are here because there is something wrong with society. See, you're always saying there's something wrong with society, but - maybe something's wrong with you. - If it's me, society made me that way. Now I know a lot of you are probably asking yourself, "Why are you dressed in a plus-size suit?" Because you're kind of doing Michael Klump. How do you know Michael Klump? It's your "making fun of fat people" character. How dare you! Michael Klump is a celebration of fat people. I think of him as more like a monster. What about, "I say, I say, I say, I sit on you"? No. It goes look. I say, I say, I say, I sit on you! No! You know what? Fat people, are not monsters. Why don't you guys have a little more sensitivity to the subject? Case in point. Look at the outside of this building. It is ugly. But you come inside, and it is beautiful. Just like this unappealing fat suit. Inside is a rather handsome, sexy, - man. - Vamping. - Why don't you just sit down, please? - I've been sitting all day. We're doing this because of you. So why don't you just go stand somewhere else. Hey, shaved? - I did. - Why? So in the year 2000, Fungus and even black mold was discovered growing in the cave. Some blame it on the new air conditioning system that was installed. Some on the high-powered lights. Others feel that fungus is due to - Nice. - Quiet, please. - Sorry. - Sorry. Dwight, I would like you to apologize to this beautiful, beautiful woman for forcing her to walk 5 miles, which for her, is basically a death march. She should thank me. OK, Phyllis, thank Dwight first. - Why should I have to thank him? - You're right. - Dwight, do it. Just say it, OK? - I apologize for creating a ruse which forced you to exercise. Finally! Right? Phyllis, you must be exhausted from standing on those gams. Why don't you have a seat? Let's all clap at Phyllis. Michael Klump wants to remind you that corporate Their idea, yes, was to urge you to lose weight. But more importantly, what this whole thing is about, this contest is really about being healthy and in order to be healthy, you have to eat, Kelly. Back, back! Kelly, I want you to stand up on your chair. Come on, stand up on your chair. Stand up, stand up, stand up. Somebody help her. Here we go. I want you to look at her. She's a beautiful Indian woman. Why? What makes her beautiful? Everything. She's perfect. - I like her nails. - OK, be more specific. I like her finger nails. I like her purple dress. - What about her looks? - Hell of an ass. What else do people like? I wonder what people like about me. Probably my jugs. Kelly, will you just agree to stop this madness and stop trying to kill yourself? I hate dieting. I hate it so much. I hate this worm inside of me! I want you to know Kelly, look at me. I want you to know that you are beautiful. You are truly, truly beautiful. Give me a hug. Summer's going great. Just spent two hours listening to Michael Klump. I have a weird pain in my left side that I'm convinced is an ulcer. My girlfriend lives in New York, and I haven't seen her in 10 days. How's your summer? Ryan, look. Shaved off my goatee. I am goate-less. We are the goate-less brothers. How was friday night? I had a good time, but it's been 3 days and no call. I even have 2 tickets to see Counting Crows for tonight, so. He'll call. Oscar, enough with the girl talk please. You guys lost 4 pounds. - Hey! - I say we have a parade. Excellent. Good job. So it turns out tonight is my nephew's tee ball game, and I kind of missed the first three, so You've already disappointed him so much. He can't be expecting a lot from you. I know. I suck. Yes, you do. - Dwight says hi. - I do not. I do not say hi, Pam! - Now he's saying hi louder. - All right, listen, we're still good for this weekend, right? No tee ball games, recitals, karate tournaments? - Can you got to IM? - OK. What are you writing about me? I'm gonna write you both up for not working. I'm gonna write you up for not working. OK. Well played. Neither of us will write the other up for not working. - Did he call? - I just got off Kendall? I heard you talking to Oscar about that guy. - What happened? Did he call? - No. - Really? - No. And you know what? I even got two tickets to see Counting Crows tonight as a surprise. Why do guys not call when they say they're gonna call? I don't know. I always call everybody back right away. But he'll call back, though. Give him to the end of the day. He'll call. If he doesn't, he is loco. Thanks, that's sweet. Anyways, seems like we lost to Utica by only 8 pounds. At least everyone lost weight. That's all that really matters. Wait, could we have till the end of the day? So we're only 8 pounds behind Utica. Now I know it's a stretch, but, we could weigh ourselves again at the end of the day - and maybe win this thing after all. - Leave it to me, boss. I can get this whole office to make weight. It's gonna be a little toasty in here. A good old-fashioned sweat lodge. Andy Bernard does not lose contests. He wins them. Or he quits them because they're unfair. - Is that healthy food? - Nope. We're trying to win a contest here, Kelly, please? Michael, I just scheduled lunch with a client, - so I might be back a little late. - OK, that is fine. Just water, and be back by weigh-in. - OK? - Perfect. I hate to even ask cause you've been so accommodating - about all the wedding stuff - Your wish is my command. Is there any way our first dance can be to my favorite song? The little drummer boy. Of course! - Really? - Yeah. It's a great song. I always thought it was bigger than Christmas anyway, you know? And you know what? The guys already know it, so it's easy breezy. The guys? I didn't tell you? Here Comes Treble, Class of'96 was available for our big day, so I booked 'em. I don't think that And they're collectively my best man. And they're crashing with us for 3 weeks, so - totally works out. - I don't know if I want your old college a capella group to be our wedding band. OK, I hear you, sweetheart. But this is a deal breaker. But you know what? You're gonna love these guys. Carl one, Carl two, Broccoli Rob, Sparerib, Doobie, Lunchbox. Boner Champ. That's me. Pubie Lewis and the News. Hopscotch, Jingle Jangle. Sandwich. These are the best best men a guy could ever hope for. Let's talk about this later. This is not halfway. I did the math. I had to drive way longer than you. Montclair would've been closer, so you have to buy lunch. What are you doing? I just I can't wait. Oh, my god. Pam, will you marry me? Oh, my god! So? Yes! God! Where is Jim? I'm calling it. Guess that's curtains for the yoga guy. - Really? - Yeah. I have to say, I think the problem with that whole thing was that he was a complete stupid idiot. Oh, man, I really wanted to see them. - I know. I love Counting Crows. - Look at where my seats were. Really? That's a shame. A shame to waste these. I want to buy them from you. - Michael, you don't have to buy them. - No, I do. I want to. Trust me. I really do. All right. Just I want you to just forget about 'em, OK? Case closed. Can I pay you tomorrow? I have like a $60 limit on my ATM, so - Yeah. - Is that good? - What's up, everybody? - What are you smiling about there, smiley pants? - You're late. - Wet tuna! - What's up, Meredith? - Nothing. - You're dripping on me. - Darryl, would you do the honors? - Sorry, guys. - No. I don't want to hear moaning. This is a good day. You guys accomplished something big. You lost a ton of weight literally. A lot of weight. And I don't care what any stupid scale says. You guys are all gigantic losers. I don't know about anyone else, but it was a good summer for me. I lost 7 pounds. And you know what? I'm just gonna take I went ziplining in my third day in Costa Rica. I guess the harness wasn't strapped in exactly right. I broke my neck. And I've been in the hospital I still haven't seen the beach. It's nice to have visitors. - Well, I should go. - All right, I'll tell everybody here that you say hi. No, don't. I'm mad at them. Why? What happened? Not one of them called to congratulate me on our engagement. That they might be off the hook for, because I didn't tell them. What? Why not? I just didn't, you know, want to deal Come on, it won't be that bad. You know what? Here we go. Everybody, just wanted to make an announcement. Pam and I are engaged. Hi, everyone! - I thought you were already engaged. - Nope. That was Roy. She was engaged to Roy. - Thank you, Angela. - I got a gift for Pam and Roy. - Do I have to get another one? - Yes. A little close to my engagement there, Tuna. - What's your game here? - To get married. She's not a virgin, you know. - What's going on? - No, nothing. Nothing, Michael. Just saying hi. The tall guy got engaged. - To be married? - Yep. Sorry. Episode 5x02 "Business Ethics" (1.00) Pencils down! Just kidding. Take your time. Today is ethics day. After they finish the quiz, I'm gonna run my first meeting here. It's gonna be in-sane! No, it's not. I have to read from the binder. I got it. I got it. I took you to an intimate restaurant Then to a suggestive movie There's nothing left to talk about Unless it's horizontally Let's get ethical, ethical I wanna get ethical Let's get into ethics Let me hear Dunder Mifflin talk Your body talk Let me hear your body talk Why are you helping her? You're not even dating. She's my friend, and ultimately my strategy is to sort of merge this into a relationship without her even knowing. OK, let's give it up for Miss Holly Flax! Thanks, Michael. Today we're gonna have a business ethics seminar, because recently, without mentioning any names, there has been some misconduct at corporate. And we have a very strict ethics policy, - and that employee has been fired. - Come on! He's right there. He was hired. - Check it out Hired guy. - Nice. OK, elephant in the room. Let's talk about it. Do I regret what I did? Of course I do. Even though it was an amazing ride, and I'll give you an example. Anyone see Survivor, season 6? Anyone know Joanna on that show? In New York city, I hooked up with a girl who looked exactly like that Indistinguishable, so OK. Well done. Good speech, Ryan. You're a good guy. Let's start discussing those questionnaires that you filled in this morning. "It is wrong to make personal calls during work hours?" Now some of you marked that you very strongly agree. But ideally you would've selected "totally agree." I thought "very strongly agree" sounded stronger than "totally agree." Corporate would like to emphasize that ideally you would all totally agree with that statement. Well, I think we can all totally agree that Holly is totally fantastic. Thank you. "In fact, spending a half hour at the watercooler "during work hours is a form of stealing." - What? - Yes, it's called time theft, and it's the same as taking money from the company. Can anyone think of examples of things that are over-the-line time-wasters? This meeting. Can't set them up like that. Why is it OK for smokers to take breaks all the time? If I want to go outside and hang out once an hour, I'll just take up smoking. I'll do it. Don't care. I'll smoke with you. I got a bag of cigars in my purse. Stealing office supplies is another big ethical area that there seems to be some confusion about. Can we have a moment? Can I talk to you for a second? A lot of good stuff, and you look you look - fantastic. - Michael. What should we be working on while you guys are talking? Do some do some work. People expect a lot from these meetings Laughter, sudden twists, surprise endings. You need to be Robin Williams and M. Night Shyamalan. You need to be Robin Shyamalan. Well, I just have to get through the binder. - Just you're kind of losing them. - I am? Don't think about the stakes. - It'll freak you out. - OK. Well, Michael makes a really good point. So let's just open this up a little bit. Say my name is Lauren, and here I am shopping in a supermarket, and I steal a pencil. That's not right. Lauren, enough with the pencils. I have to go over pencils and office supplies. - It's part of the ethics thing. - That isn't ethics. Ethics is a real discussion of competing conceptions of the good. This is just the corporate anti-shoplifting rules. I'll drop an ethics bomb on you. Would you steal bread to feed your family? Exactly, Andy. I took intro to philosophy twice, no big deal. It's a trick question. The bread is poisoned. Also, it's not your real family. You've been cuckolded by a stronger, smarter male. No, that's not how it works. I would not steal the bread. And I would not let my family go hungry. OK, but we should get back to business. Have any of you ever faced any ethical dilemmas in the workplace? Anybody? This is a chance for you to say something without any repercussions. Stanley? - Oscar, come on. - Pass. I will go first. When I discovered Youtube, I didn't work for five days. I did nothing. I viewed Cookie Monster sings Chocolate Rain about 1,000 times. What was the dilemma? To tell you or not, and I'm glad I did. I feel very, very good and "catharctic." I promise you that you are not going to get into trouble. You can say anything you want with total and complete immunity. Come on. Anybody? Let it fly. Once in a while, I'll take a long lunch. - A siesta. - Time thief. Time thief Fire him. You've really never stolen any company time? Never. You are a thief of joy. Anybody else? Sometimes I download pirated music onto my work computer. Who hasn't? Good. Good! - What else? - No, I'd like to hear more about that. I once reported oscar to the I.N.S. Turns out he's clean, but I'm glad I did it. - Well, let's keep this party moving on. - I'll go. Have you guys ever met Bruce Myers, the Scranton rep for Hammermill? Well, for the past six years, I've been sleeping with him in exchange for discounts on our supplies and outback steakhouse gift certificates. Jackpot. Meredith, that is serious. I mean, not only is that a conflict of interest, but there's also an exchange of goods. Exchange of steak. Have you ever had sirloin steak, honey? That's crazy. That's crazy talk. The "Merenator", sleeping with suppliers. What time we got? You know what? That's a good place to end it, right there. This, I think, was a great ethics seminar. She has given us a lot of wonderful things to think about. Right, what is wrong Who's to say, really, in the end? I mean, because it is unknowable, but let's give her a round of applause. Holly, everybody. Get back to work. Great job. I am truly impressed. That You really pulled that one out. Classic, classic meeting. We should celebrate. There are some serious issues with Meredith. I mean, all of you have done things I wouldn't have done myself, but Meredith's actions are really over the line. What you gonna do? So, regarding the supplier, approximately how many liaisons have there been? Liaisons? You mean meet-ups? I don't know. Once a month for six years, something like that. Meredith, why don't you tell Holly it's not what she thinks, nothing unethical happened, and that you just like to sleep around. Am I in trouble here or something? No. This is just a stupid formality. No, it's not a formality. Now, were these meet-ups, just personal, unrelated to business? No. I wouldn't have done it if it wasn't for the discount paper. There's not a lot of fruit in those looms. For the love of god, we're trying to help you, you stupid bag. What I don't understand is why the steak coupons, I mean, if you were already getting the discounted paper? Well, it's funny. Maybe it's a girl thing, but after we did it, when he would give me those coupons, I just felt good about myself. What's going on here? I thought I had immunity. Well, unfortunately, immunity, or something being off the record does not really exist in the workplace. I've never heard of anyone who kept their job after something like this. Well, I'm not quitting. Yawn Four seconds. What are you doing? You had said that you don't do anything personal during work time, so I'm just making sure. Wait a minute. So you're gonna time me every time I yawn? That's absurd. Really? Hey, look, monkey knows how to use a stopwatch, everybody. He's ti Personal conversation There is no way that that was One second. Holly-lujah. It's a miracle. You're at your desk. It's mike-raculous. Reaching! You'll get there. Anyway, I was giving it some thought, and there's no reason that two attractive, good-looking intelligent, funny, attractive people can't, you know, just sit down and work this whole Meredith thing out. Sounds good. Good. Would you care to bang it out over lunch? I already bought this. Your food is no good here, my lady. Sorry. You know what? Let's go out, Dunder Mifflin's treat. Actually, you're not a client, so we'll just split it? Ethical. - So I've gone over corporate policy. - What do you think? What do you think of this place? - It's very nice. - Isn't it? It's kind of business/romantic. So you're from Des Moines? That sounds so warm. In summer. Here too. You know what my favorite season is? Maybe we should talk about Meredith first. Yes. Get the boring stuff out of the way. Autumn was what I was gonna say. When the leaves change. It's just I think it's the most contemplative of seasons. OK, so I've gone over this, and I've thought about it, and I just don't think there's any way I can write a report that doesn't end with her being terminated. Terminator. I'm from the future. Hey, Andy. By any chance, did you see Battlestar Galactica last night? No, I did not. Is that any good? Actually not. It is really so-so. I mean, I like all the crazy monsters and stuff, you know, like Klingons and Wookies and all that, but Sorry, was there something you wanted to add, Dwight? Is that anything like the original Battlestar Galactica? You know, it's weird. It's practically a shot-for-shot remake. Really? That's cool. Story's kind of bland. It's about this guy named Dumbledore Calrissian, Who needs to return the ring back to Mordor. It's really That doesn't sound right. I just don't want my employees thinking that their jobs depend on performance. I mean What sort of place is that to call home? And Meredith needs this job. This is her main source of money. That's very sweet, but we have to follow the protocol. Those are the rules. New idea. We don't report at all. We just punish her. We punish her? Tell her, can't have sex for 6 months. I don't think we could enforce that. I don't know. I saw this thing - Like a belt with a key. - A chastity belt. Yeah, it's more of a Underwear garment that has little spikes, like, made of I think sometimes they're made of metal. You know what I'm talking about. You unlock a little door that Down Where you Where you put Where you put the He has not stopped working for a second. At 12:45, he sneezed while keeping his eyes open, which I always thought was impossible. At 1:32, he peed, and I know that because he did it in an open soda bottle under the desk while filling out expense reports. And on the flip side, I've been so busy watching him that I haven't even started work. It's exhausting being this vigilant. I'll probably have to go home early today. I am just saying that I don't think that you understand what I am saying. No, you are saying that we should sweep it under the carpet, accept the discount on supplies, not fire Meredith, and pretend like the whole thing never happened. Yes. - What am I saying? - Well Busted. I don't I'm saying that her behavior is unethical and a little icky, and I don't think I want to work in an environment where that sort of conduct is tolerated. You have to tolerate a lot when you're part of a family. It's not a family. It's a workplace. I will be honest with you, that car ride did not go well. And that was not my fault. The only reason I am standing out here right now is because I don't want to take the elevator with her. And I am holding on to her leftovers. What were we doing for 19 minutes and 48 seconds? None of your business. So I guess I can assume that was personal. Fine. So maybe you're not completely ethical after all. Yes Maybe I'm not. It's been a little tense. People are suspicious of me, and my best friend in the office won't even talk to me. Turns out being the morality police does not make you popular. I should know, because in middle school, I was the hall monitor, and the kids used to stuff egg salad in my locker. I was just hoping middle school was over. Kendall from corporate H.R. is on line 1 and Holly's on her way too. What's the only thing worse than one H.R. Rep? Two H.R. Reps. You get me. Can I sit? I don't know. Can you? Kendall, my main man. Listen, Holly, Michael, I just got the report that your branch submitted, and there's a lot of stuff about a relationship Meredith is having Yes, that came out during the ethics seminar. And let the record show that it was during the immunity part of the seminar. I'm not sure these circumstances warrant any action. I think it's pretty clear it was unethical. From what I can gather, it seems like a gray area. Look, to be honest, the company's getting a discount at a tough time in our balance sheet, I don't know that the right thing to do for the company is to turn our noses up at that. Kendall, I understand that the discount is good for the company, but I'm just not happy about the way we're getting it. I thought it was clear with you, Holly. Your task was to get signatures from the employees showing that they completed the training. I understand Cause every other branch has managed to get those. If it's not something you can handle, then that's a different discussion. - No, I can do it. - Good. How do you tell somebody that you care about deeply, "I told you so"? Gently? With a rose? In a funny way, like it's a hilarious joke? Or do you just let it go because saying it would just make things worse? Probably the funny way. Can I have everyone's attention? Excuse me! May I have everyone's attention, please? We need to finish the ethics seminar. - No way, lady. - It's a trap. Everyone, please, I just need your signatures to show corporate I gave you the training. - Don't sign anything. - OK, everybody listen up. If you are not in that conference room in 2 minutes, I'm going to kill you. It's a quarter to 5:00, and I have started to gather my things. Get in there right now, or I'm gonna lose it! - Am I getting fired? - Now is really not the time, Meredith. In this next section, we examine the difference between sick days and personal days. Sick days are only to be used when an illness precludes you from doing your job or can spread to your coworkers. Personal days, on the other hand, are much more flexible. Thank you, Meredith. This was delicious. Where's the steak sauce? I think we're out. I got some in my minivan somewhere. Wait a second. How does the steak factor in again? I think she got it as a tip, but I don't know why she didn't just take cash. I don't care what she's doing. I hope she just keeps doing it. Amen, just keep the ribs coming. - Michael? - Yeah. Contractions are coming every 10 minutes. Just remember to keep breathing. - My cervix is ripening. - OK, good. Jan is about to have a baby with a sperm donor. And Michael is preparing for the birth of a watermelon with Dwight. Now, this baby will be related to Michael through delusion. - Michael! My water's breaking! - OK! OK! What do you do? I get a call from Jan and meet her at the hospital. Right. Highways or surface roads? I take Quincy Ave to Gibson. Gibson is covered in potholes. Car breaks down. Adapt! I checked the route, no potholes It's about adapting to the circumstances. - Andy, would you like to have my baby? - Yes! No. OK, I'm crowning! I'm crowning! All right. Sorry. Here we go. Here we go! - The pressure! The pressure! - Do it! Scream! Scream it out, scream it out! Babies are one of my many areas of expertise. Growing up, I performed my own circumcision. - Just keep pushing I'm right here. - Hold me! - Cradle my head! - I'm right here! - I'm screaming, I'm screaming! - All right. Just push and breathe. Numb me up. I want anesthesia! - You can't have it. It's too late. - I don't want natural! - You have to just push it out! - OK! Keep simulating. Do you have the Sharpie? - Do you have the Sharpie? - Yes, I do! When the baby emerges, mark it secretly in a kind of a mark that only you could recognize - and no baby snatcher can ever copy. - OK. - Ready? - Yes. It's coming! Here we go! God! What was on that? Butter. Newborns are slippery. Nice touch. Good. Let's try that again. It is going to be the happiest day of my life. Episode 5x03 "Baby Shower" (1.00) Hello ladies, how's my shower going? - Phyllis, did you get the live storks? - No. Damn it, Phyllis! I'm sorry. Damn it, Phyllis It was hard enough to convince Jan to come. So are we set for refreshments? Per your instructions, we have the personalized M&amp;M;'s with the baby names. This is your boy bowl, with the name "Chevy." That was me. And this is the girl bowl, with M&amp;M;'s with the name "Astird." - That can't be right. - Michael wrote down "Astird." She said it is the name of a Viking princess. So - Ass turd. - I know. I know. It is beautiful. No. Thank you. Is this it? I mean, is this Two bowls of M&amp;M;'s and some balloons? You know what, I think you need to step it up. I think you need to get the lead out. Because if I'm not mistaken, we gave you your wedding shower here. We all came into this room and gave you, a golden shower. Well you know what, where's my golden shower? It does not matter to me at all, whether this baby is biologically mine. I am going to love it. It's like when the dog nurses the tiger cub. Have you seen that video? It is It's so bizarre and unnatural, but it happens. I'm collecting for the baby shower. - But Phyllis, it's not his baby. - I know, Kevin. Why do we have to pay money to get a gift for his ex-girlfriend's unborn sperm bank baby? Look at it as if you're paying for the cake, not the baby. Sheet cake. I do enjoy being the head of the Party Planning Committee. I'm no longer under Angela's heel, and her little grape head is under mine. What are you doing? Don't talk to them. - Sorry. - Make the party. Don't Make the party, please. Pump it! - So you know Stacy, right? - The one from England. There's no one from England. Katie studied in Ireland. This is Stacy, the one who does the Maira Kalman-style collages. - Right, that style. - So, Stacy and Eric get to Bogre's DeTech half an hour early so they don't have to sit on the slab. Anyway, Bogre's TA Sarah Kaya comes in. Wait, who's Sarah Kayacombsen? No, Sarah Kaya comes in. Don't interrupt, I have like 30 sec to finish this and get to DigiPres. So Sarah Kaya says to Eric, "No way. You can't reserve seats." And Stacy gets all up in her face and Sarah picks up Stacy's new PM pad and throws it at the light box. - No way! - Yes! - That's hilarious? - No, it was horrible! - Jim, she might get arrested. - Who, Stacy? No, Stacy is a boy! Frustrating. Why can't you just be in art class with me? Wait, I gotta go, class starting. OK, I'll ta I'll talk to you later. That was a good story. Who's Sarah Kayacombsen? I got the Nard-puppy for ya. What's going on here? It's a baby game where you guess whose picture is whose. Check it out. Who would have thought that this little baby would be marrying that little baby? That's Phyllis. Well It is. So I hope you two are very happy together. Pervert. - Why would that make me a pervert, - Well, it does. - That's me. - That's not you. - Yes it is. - That's mean, come on, that's Ahoy, matey. Ahoy! - So, how you doing? - Good. Listen. Jan Levinson is coming in today, and she is in the terminal stages of her pregnancy. The child of which I have a vested interest. It's all kind of weird. Anyway, she is incredibly fat and enormous right now extremely unattractive. And you are, on the other hand, one of the more attractive people in the office. So while she's here I am going to be acting kind of cold to you. And I am doing this to pay respect to her bloated feelings. - And I'm treating Ryan the same way. - Of course. I do not like pregnant women in my workspace. They're always complaining. I have varicose veins, too. I have swollen ankles, I'm constantly hungry. You think my nipples don't get sore too? You think I don't need to know the fastest way to the hospital? - What do we have here? - This is my baby. Really Jan had the baby and Michael wasn't there to mark it. So the baby could be anybody's. Except Michael's. So this is Astird. Astrid. Why didn't you call me? You know, labor just kind of started - very suddenly and - I could have helped. Birth instructor thought it wasn't a good idea for you to be there. That guy? He had no sense of humor and I proved him wrong in so many ways. You have no idea what I've been through. - No, I don't! - So, let's I'm sorry, I thought today at the baby shower would be a good time for the two of you to meet. Can I hold her? Yes, yes you can. You know, I think, just leave her in the car seat. I love babies. I think they are beautiful in all sorts of different ways. I try to pick up and hold a baby every day, if possible, because it nourishes me. It feeds my soul. Babies are drawn to me, and I think it's because they see me as one of them. But cooler. And with my life put together a little bit. If a baby were president, there would be no taxes, there would be no war. There would be no government, and things could get terrible. It actually, probably it would be a better screenplay idea than a serious suggestion. Ladies and gentlemen, it is my privilege and honor to present for the first time in her life and in the office: - As - trid. trid Levinson. Hi! Astrid, this is everybody, look. This is your family. You're gonna know them for the rest of your life. - Well - Well, he may not be here. Say hello! OK, here we go. - Lion King! - Michael, Michael! That's that's too high. I'll take that. Come on, let's get our shower on. Conference room, choppity chip chop. Are you OK? You seem kind of I'm fine, weirdo. Such an HR weirdo. Try not to suck all the air out of there when you walk in. Ready to play some games? Let's do it! The baby's already been born. So we had games planned but the baby ruins all of them. No, the baby doesn't ruin anything Kevin, OK? The baby multiplies the fun. Let's just do what you were going to do. Who wants to guess when the baby will be born? All right, how about some presents? I want to see some presents. I got this so I can write down for thank-you notes. - Thank you. That's very sweet. - Whatta we got? We all chipped in and got you this stroller. - Thank you. - She already has a stroller. This is way worse than the stroller she came with. She's got an Orbit, that's a 1200$ stroller. OK, what else? on my whole bomb shelter. For that kind of money, this stroller should be indestructible. Being good isn't always easy No matter how hard I try When he started sweet-talking to me He'd come and tell me everything is all right He'd kiss and tell me everything is all right. Can I get away again tonight The only one - Hey you! - Hey! You busy? Doing laundry for the first time in like a month. OK, you gotta hear this. So, Jan's shower is going on right now, - she's singing Son of a Preacher Man - Can't hear anything, - everyone's just staring at her. - there's like machines going. The song is about losing your virginity next to a church, and guess what, she's been singing for the last 20 minutes! I can't hear anything! OK, well you know what, I - just call me later. - OK. I'm not frustrated. Even if I were in Scranton, Jim and I would have days like this. We're just a little out of sync. You know, that's all. Great. I washed my lipstick. How well I remember The look that was in his eyes Stealing kisses from me on the sly Taking time to make time Telling me that he's all mine Learning from each other's knowing Looking to see how much we've grown. And the only Don't hit the fence. My child! Don't get stuck on the barbed wire! Playtime is over! So Jan, tell my intended about the miracle of childbirth. Actually, I had a tub birth. And it was really quite amazing. - You gave birth in a tub? - It's a really nice transition from womb to world, you know, kind of like a big womb. - So you're in the tub with everything? - Yeah, the afterbirth floats. Must be like the tide at Omaha Beach. It's actually really hygienic, Creed. - I'm done. - Me too. This is the birth story. It was beautiful. It was beautiful. This is a once-in-a-lifetime experience. And I should have been there. I should have been there to witness this. - I could have helped. - I know you're sad about this. And I wish that I, but Would it help if you held Astrid for just a little bit? I'm just going to lie down for 2 minutes. I'm exhausted, so Remind me to talk to you about Astrid's 529. Wake me in 20. I usually love babies, but when I held Astrid I just felt shortchanged. - Could you take - Sure. Just for a sec. - Hey guys. - What's up, Mike? I need some advice from one baby daddy to another. You, a baby daddy? I, a baby daddy. When you first became a baby daddy, did you have an immediate connection with that baby? Like, the first time that you held it, did you find that with your baby baby? Hell yeah. You know why? 'Cause that was my baby. - I just saw this baby daddy - You should stop calling yourself "baby daddy". Why, Darryl? Because I'm quote white quote unquote? Because you're not a daddy, and it's not your baby. Feel connected to his baby over there? It's That's different. - You feel connected to this? - That's not a baby. You want to hold me, to see how you feel? - Could I? - No. I was just catching up on my sleep. I can imagine. - Where's Astrid? - I think she's on a sales call. On a what? More paper! She's just on a coffee break. That's funny. She's with Angela. That's good. Now, I need you to I need it to look up here. Get the baby to look up here, ready? Look at my finger. Look. - Come on, up here! - Look up here! - Your hand's in it. - What? Sorry. What are you doing? What's going on? - Excuse me. - We're taking a picture. - She's nature's bounty. - You don't flash around a newborn baby. Don't you know that? - Michael, I need your help. - I was just going to I was going to talk to Holly, about her hygiene. She smells like old tomatoes and dirt. Come on. I like to call this the bumper test. - Sure you can't stay a little longer? - No, you know what? I really have to go. All right, everybody, we're leaving. Jan and Astrid are leaving. You know what, where is the stroller that I came in with? I took the liberty of putting it in your trunk. Thanks, Dwight. You know what? There is There is one more thing that you can do for me. Don't date Holly. That's I hate her. God! Why would you even ask me to I mean, not that it matters, 'cause I don't, but wha All right. Fine. Thanks for the baby shower. It was great. - And I'll see you soon. - All right. You still gonna be mean to me? You wanna go out? Yes. I didn't feel much when I held Astrid, but I got a good feeling from Holly. Hey, it's Jim. Leave a message. Hey, this is Pam. Leave a message. Hey, it's me. It is I figured I'd catch you walking to your car, but - You must be out or something. - I'll leave a message. Is it me, or are we just a little off today? I guess this is just one of those days. It'll get better. Hope you didn't have any major laundry issues. I finished my laundry. Got all my socks. Nothing like that time that crazy guy pushed you. Remember that time that I helped you do your laundry and that crazy guy came in and started yelling at you? Remember we went shopping the next day to buy me a washer and dryer? Yet here you are, back in a Laundromat. Now, I'm just trying to help you, Beesly. Be safe. You're probably upset that I'm even at a Laundromat right now. But, don't worry, I'm being safe. And I'm headed home. I'm headed to my dorm. Not home. Wish you were home. Anyway Anyway I miss you. I miss you. - Pam, line 3. - OK, thanks. New york, as it turns out, is very expensive. And I ran out of money. I thought about selling a kidney, but Michael offered to get me a part-time job at corporate. Pamela Of course, now Michael knows where to reach me 16 to 18 hours a week. Miss you, kiddo. Miss you so much. Episode 5x04 "Crime Aid" (1.00) - That was really fun last night. - Yeah, it was nice. I'm actually thinking about getting my own set of put-put golf clubs. That would be great. You need that. - Really? - Yeah, it would help. - I let her win. - No, he didn't. So When can I see you again? Tonight. I'm free tonight. Is that too eager? I don't care. I'm free tonight. Wait. Tonight's no good. Because I am busy taking you out. I just remembered. I can't tonight. - Why? - I'm going out with you. Wait a second. I can't tonight. Tonight's - No more. - All right. Too many times. It's all good. All right, so good. So have a nice day. - Thank you. You too. - You're welcome. In my opinion, the third date is traditionally the one where You have sex. Does Holly feel that way? I don't know. I will probably find out tonight. If she starts having sex with me, I'll know for sure. That's for you. And I am right in assuming that Dwight is short for D-Money. Cause that's what I wrote on your Save-The-Date. You set a date? J-Money. Or should it be T-Money, for Tuna? Receptionist-Money. K-Money. - What are you making? - A knife. - You're making a knife with a knife? - You got a better way? You wanna talk about it? About what? You know I know. You know they know. I know none of that. And if I did, you'd be the last to know. The mall could be fun. We could go to the food court, get different foods. You could get chicken teriyaki. I could get a hot dog. Some of what we order depends on if we're having sex after. Elephant in the room. Are we, do you think? Do you think we're gonna have sex tonight? Hell yeah. OK, so we do the restaurant thing, and then Then we can do - We'll just do the restaurant first. - Yeah, that's good. Probably get soup or something light. She introduced me to so many things. Pasteurized milk, sheets, monotheism. Presents on your birthday, preventative medicine. - It's nice to learn new things. - I was talking to myself. Just I don't get it. What don't you get? Why is she marrying Andy? Angela's not really a risk taker. And Andy's not really a risk. That's really fattening. No, it's lettuce. - It's time to go? - No. Reservations are at 8:00, so we've got like an hour 45 minutes. I'm a crazy 8. - I'm crazy. - You're crazy. Go crazy. I forgot my keys. - Do you need'em? - Yeah, let's go grab them. All right. - After vous. - Thank vous. What? I didn't forget my keys. I just didn't want to make out with you in front of the cameras. Do you think they can hear us? Not if we turn these dials all the way down. Now they can't hear us at all. - Good. - We're totally alone. Yes, that's correct. I need to cancel checks from 10,001 to 90,000. Great, they stole my laptop. Well, they stole my surge protector. How does that even compare? Oscar, I'm now going to be prone to surges. Oh my god. What happened? - We were robbed last night. - Bravo, Watson. Looks like a classic 7-men job. Security tapes were stolen. Motives, financial. Or possibly vintage HP computer collectors. Hank down at security had clocked out. And that is all we have. - Can I talk to you for a second? - Yeah. That wasn't us, right? You remembered to lock the doors? No, did you? Michael, I think this is our fault. - Oh, no. - No, my god! My god. So much for sex without consequences. You are such a dork! Shots! So apparently Pam went out last night and accidentally called my work phone at 3:00 in the morning. - So - I'm not drunk. I'm on minute six of this message. OK, I do not sound like that. - You can take the girl out of Philly. - Scranton. The future mother of my children. I never felt safe here. You're always safe with me. I'm a very good screamer. And one day, we're gonna move to Disney's celebration village in Florida and leave all of this behind. I would very much like that. Consider yourself at home. Get in. Where are we going? I know she loves me. I am sure of it. She practically told me so. Then you need to give her an ultimatum. Tell her she needs to make a choice. You or Andy. If she picks you, great. If not, you can move on. Are you sure that's gonna work? It did when Bob said I had to stop talking to my sister on the phone so much. Wait, this isn't our floor Dwight. How's everyone doing? My door is always open If anyone wants to talk. I don't want to talk. I want my laptop back. Nobody steals from Creed Bratton and gets away with it. The last person to do this disappeared. His name? Creed Bratton. We're gonna make everything all right. All right? Conference room, 15 minutes. To recoup their losses, I am planning a little charity auction. Where people from all over Scranton can come and bid on our goods and services. I'm calling it Crime Aid. It's like Farm Aid. But instead of farms fighting against aids, it is us fighting against our own poverty. - I think it's a fun idea. - Thank you. We could auction off things that we do for each other, like cleaning or tennis lessons. - My sorority did it all the time. - I'm gonna have to stop you right here. Was this a sorority that you didn't get into a real sorority so you had to kind of form your own? - Move on, Michael. - OK. Come on! Let's have an auction. Let's do this. We'll auction off people, like in the olden days. So, in order to recoup the value of items we liked, we have to spend more money on things we don't want. Who would ever come to this? I don't know. It could be any number of people. It could be a pedestrian. It could be an old person. It could be a lookie-loo. Or it could be a Bruce Springsteen fan what? Who said that? I did. Why did I say that? I think you know why I said that. I think it is very apparent. I think it goes without saying. Bear with me. There's a point there. But what is the point? I don't understand what he's saying. It seems a little shady. It seems a little foggy. Well, it's not a little foggy. - There's really something going on. - Do you need us for any of this? Do I? Michael scored the big ticket item. Springsteen tickets. The boss scored the boss. I think that's pretty boss. He knows how to get things. He got me. Sorry. Twice. Right? Listen to me close cause I'm only gonna say this once. You either break off your engagement with that singing buffoon, apologize, and then date me. Or you can say goodbye to this. I think you have me confused with another person. I said I was only gonna say it once. You have until 6:14 P.M. - 6:14. - I heard you. Pump it up! Pump up the volume. Thank you very much, everybody. Thank you, Mr. Springsteen. And welcome to C.R.I.M.E.-A.I.D. Crime Reduces Innocence Makes Everyone Angry, I Declare. It is not known how many office robberies occur every second, cause there is no wikipedia entry for office robbery statistics. However, tonight, its victims are standing together and standing strong in the form of song, Cooking lessons and hugs. Really, Phyllis? You're auctioning a hug? OK, so with no further ado, lights, camera, auction! Take it away, Bruce! Mike gave me a list of his top ten Springsteen songs. Huey Lewis and the News. One was Tracy Chapman, Fast Car. And my personal favorite, Short People. OK, this is the moment that you've all been waiting for. Our first item up for bids tonight is something I consider to be very boss indeed. It is a yoga lesson from Holly Flax! And I would like to start the bidding off at $300. $300, do I hear $300? $300. Batter, batter. Swing, batter, $300. Anybody, $300. $400. Do I see somebody in the back? Is there somebody in the back? Sold for $300 to me! - What the hell is that? - It's the only gavel I could find. It squeaks when you bang it. That's what she said. Let's hear it for me! Right? A bargain at any price. Mike, do my thing. Yes, great. Very good. So, Darryl and the boys in the hood in the warehouse have graciously donated to go out for a beer with them right now. You know what? I'm actually going to bid on this. I'm gonna start the bidding cause this is something that I've dreamt of. Mike, you can't do this. It's conflict of interest. - $5. - Sold to Jim! - OK. - OK, sold! Have fun, you guys. Well, this next item is sure to spring steam from your ears if you don't win it. - It just says Creed. - Yeah, that's all-inclusive. She thought I was Mcnabb. - I can see that. - Well, whatcha gonna do? Another round, boys? Great. Halpert? What's up, Roy? Hey, man. Relax, man. I'm not gonna hit you or anything. Oh, I wouldn't - You good? - Good. How you doing? - I'm good. - OK. Darryl, what's happening? - What's up, Roy? - What's up, guys? How you been? I'm Kevin. And I'll do your taxes. Let's hear an opening bid, everybody. Who's first? Kevin do your taxes. He's the taxman. Kevin the taxman. - Federal and state. - Federal and state. - Fine. - OK, all right. You know what? I would appreciate it if people would stop storming off the stage. We are getting there folks. Slow and steady. Well, have we been blessed today. Ladies and gentlemen, Mr. David Wallace! Thank you, Michael. Thanks, everybody. I'd like to auction off a weekend at my place in Martha's Vineyard. - $100. - $100. Great. - $125. - $125. - $140. - $140. Phyllis, someone let the air out of your tires. - Come quick. - Oh, dear. Keep it going. - $160. - $160 I had to get your attention. This is an emergency. Why couldn't you just said it? Why did you actually do it? Listen, she ignored my ultimatum. Now what? Now you move on. OK, fine. I've moved on. Now how do I get her back? Dwight, I don't think you do it. I think you've got your answer. Wait, that's it? That's your advice? I thought you had some kind of big master plan. I just think we all deserve to be with someone who wants to be with us. I get it. You're trying to secure your place as head of the party-planning committee. You're just being selfish. And you slap like a girl. What did Phyllis do wrong? I'll tell you what Phyllis did wrong. She stuck her nose into my business and tried to help me. What's going on with Pam? - She's good, actually. - Yeah? She's in New York. She's at art school. - Really? - Yeah, she's doing really well. She's engaged to me. - Congrats, man. - Thanks, man. Appreciate that. So Pam's happy? Yeah, I'd say she's happy. I mean, she loves her classes. Loves the city. Last night, she was out with her friends till like, 8:00 A.M. What? I thought you were a friend. I am going to see Pam. Because I feel like I should. - When are you getting to Bruce? - Just a few more items. Bruce, Bruce! All right, all right! Here we go, here we go. All right, big ticket item. All right, in my pocket, I have two tickets to Mr. Bruce Springsteen, front. Where are those? Has anyone seen an envelope with Bruce Springsteen front row tickets and backstage passes? Anybody seen something like Laying around? - Do you want us to look for'em? - No. I think they were stolen. I think they were stolen and they're gone forever. So That was the last good item. So good job, everybody. I have my hug. Well, Phyllis, nobody. really wants a hug, so. - I'll bid on a hug. - She's your wife, you idiot. - $100. - 200. What the hell is happening? - 250. - What are you doing? I need a hug, unless you're gonna give me one. - Not here. - 300. - 300. - We have 300. - 325. - 325. - 350. - 350. - 350 and one penny. - 350 one penny. - 400. - 400 - 400 and one penny. - 400 and one penny. - 500. - 500, 500, 500. - 500 and one penny. - 500 and one penny. $1 million. - 700. - 700. It's not worth it. Sold for $1,000! Nicely done. No. You know what? No. Because I'm not that guy. And we are not that couple. That looks good. Listen, about the tickets. It's sort of a gray kind of a gray area in terms of whether I had them The Springsteen tickets seemed too good to be true. But a lot of Michael seems too good to be true. So far it's all true. But yeah, those tickets really seemed too good to be true. No. I did not know that Michael was dating Holly. You guys look amazing. Stanley, I thought you hated halloween. He wears it so he can sleep at his desk. - Who are you? - Carrie Bradshaw from Sex and the City. - I like your shoes. - Thank you. - Will you help walk me to the fax? - Sure. I got her, I got her, I can help you. - You look amazing. - Inappropriate. Thank you. - Who are you, Larry King? - Gordon Gekko. - From the insurance commercials. - Yeah Awesome. Let's put a smile on that face. Damn it, Creed! I've been up since 4:00! Sweet'stume, dude. Who are you supposed to be? Cool. You are a cat. We were looking for kitten. Give me one second. Jim Halpert. - Hey, New York. Happy Halloween. - Thanks. My costume's getting a lot of attention. So apparently no one dresses up for Halloween here. I wish I had known that before I used grease paint for my moustache. And I can't even take off my hat because then I'm Hitler. Wanna see a magic trick? I'm gonna make a pencil disa Disappear. Episode 5x05 "Employee Transfert" (1.00) OK, I think we are set. We have puzzles, string for cat's cradles. Burned this last night. A little road trip CD. Puppets. Look at all this stuff. It's only 7 hours. When corporate found out that we were dating, they decided they were gonna transfer Holly back to her old branch in Nashua, New Hampshire. Michael's taking a personal day to move me up. Road trip! Right? Breaker one-nine, copy Copy that, breaker. Those Duke boys are at it again. Do not touch my radio. - Kidding. - We're not doing anything. It's been a weird week since we found out I had to transfer. Michael wanted me to quit and get some job here in Scranton, I said "why don't you quit and get some job in Nashua?" He said "I asked you first." I said "first" at the same time he did. And then I said "jinx." And then we never talked about it again, and haven't been back to the conversation, so All right, everybody, I am out of here. - Jim, you are in charge. - I'll walk you out. You're quite a gentleman. You can let people go a couple of min early if you want. All right, we'll see. No. I'm off to New York. My brother Pete from Boston and my brother Tom from New Jersey are taking Pam and I out for lunch to celebrate the engagement. Or maybe to beat me up. I can never tell with those two. Good morning, temp. Good morning. Good morning, Dwight. Thought I'd go casual today. Good morning, everyone. Good morning. Hello. How are you, Phyllis? That's funny. Take that sweatshirt off! - Hey, buddy. - Andy. Remember when I jokingly yelled at you to take your sweatshirt off? Totally joking. But you should know those colors are sacred. Not that I care. But if you're not a Cornell man. - You probably shouldn't wear them. - No, I get it. I totally understand. And I just want to assure you that I mean no disrespect. You see, I'm applying. Come on, you think you could get into Cornell? Well, if someone who barely out-sells Phyllis can get in, I should be fine. - I'm sitting right here, Dwight. - I meant that as a compliment to you. As well as a slight to Andy. Cornell is a good school. And I want to better myself through higher education. If it makes Andy angry, so be it. I have to unpack this weekend, but maybe next weekend we go to the outlets! Mike, you driving every weekend? We're gonna switch back and forth, the driving. Sometimes we'll just meet in the middle. It'll be fun. Wait a sec. I love this song. Life is a highway I wanna ride it all night long If you're going my way I wanna drive you all night long If you're going my way Hey there. So, how do you think we're gonna do against Penn this year? Nathan Ford's arm looks pretty strong. Well, he's had a pretty good season so far Stop saying "we." You did not go to Cornell. You're just doing this to screw with me. Not so. Cornell is an excellent school. Without its agricultural program, we probably wouldn't have cabbage. At least not modern cabbage. I know it's an excellent school, Dwight. I went there. My blood runs big red. Someday we'll both get together in Comstock Hall and just laugh about all of this. Hey, future baby sis! How are you, Tom? Nice to see you. I asked Tom and Pete to come early so we could play a prank on Jim at lunch. Pretty awesome, right? I think they're into the idea. They're probably thinking, "that Pam Beesly, "she's the coolest sister-in-law on the planet. "She's the best. "The absolute best." OK, so, here's what I'm thinking. I'm gonna say that before ceramics class I took off my ring. And then when I changed back out of my smock, it wasn't in my pocket anymore, and I lost it. That's perfect. You know what'd be even more hilarious? Remember that thing we did when Jim was in high school with his girlfriend? That would be hilarious. We should totally dog her about being an artist, - never making any money. - That's awesome. Like she basically has a hobby for a job. So, not the ring, then? Not doing the ring, then. I think this is better. This is nice. It's fun. He hates it when we pick on his girlfriends. They came up with that idea really fast. - This trip is longer than I thought. - Yeah, it did look shorter I was having a nightmare. You were sleeping? - You were talking before. - Was I? Really? - Was I saying anything interesting? - Not really. All right, what's the scoop? How far? Four hours. Almost halfway there. - We're only halfway? - Halfway! You know what I want to do? I want to pull over and find a little bed and breakfast for when we meet in the middle. Emphasis on the bed. And the breakfast. Next exit isn't for five miles. Let's check there. - Hey, guys. - How are ya? Good to see you. Nice to see you again, Pam. Pam, I haven't seen you in so, so long. All right. So now we can sit and get comfortable. There's nothing out here, man. I don't know. I just imagined a hotel right here. A pool over here. Little breakfast place With really good bacon. Just Here we go. Fourth time's a charm. Life's like a road where you just One thing here and the next day back Sometimes you deal with it then you don't Sometimes you do what you want It's out there - Are you crying? - No. - Allergies? - No. - Did Darryl touch you? - What! No, Darryl did not touch me. Can we just keep going, please? - What's the matter? - It's not gonna work. - Sure it is. - There's too much distance. It's gonna work. It'll be fine. We've only been dating each other for a few weeks. Listen to me. - I like you so much. - I like you too. - And I've dated almost 4 women last - I've dated 4 guys last year too. No. In like, the last 10 years. I've dated almost 4 women. And you are so far above them it is stupid. Michael, don't. Don't. Don't make it harder than it has to be. That's what she said. Holly thinks that this relationship is over. Well, you know what, I am not gonna give up that easy. I'm going to make this way harder than it needs to be. Take that down. - Excuse me? - Take that down! I once dated a couple of guys from Cornell. They were really nice, gave me a ride home. I seriously doubt anyone from Cornell dated you. It's pronounced "colonel." Highest rank in the military. It's pronounced Cornell! It's the highest rank in the Ivy league. Andy, let's just talk about this man to man - after work. What do you say? - Fine. Good. - Good. - Can we That's big red bear! That's a bobble big red bear! God! If you leave on friday by 5:00, you'll be rolling in at midnight at best. And then sleep in saturday. That only leaves us less than 24 hours before you have to go back again. I will talk to you on the bluetooth the entire trip. So we're talking constantly all the way. I'll tell you everything that I see. Everything that I pass by. Things that I witness on the road. Maybe I'll see an accident one weekend. How long could we keep that up? - Years. - Years? Years of just a few hours every weekend? Here's my wish. I want you to meet a great guy, and I want you to be happy. - Thank you. - My wish has come true, incidentally. Because you've met me and you are happy. Clever, Mike. So Pam, how much money does an artist make after they leave art school? Not a lot of money in the arts, right? That's not really true. There's a lot to do with an art degree, actually. Maybe Pam should pay the check by drawing a picture on this napkin. That's a little rude. What's your deal? - Just having fun, Jimmy. - Right, Pam? You know what, I think we're a great couple. I think we're a classic couple. I think we're like Romeo and Juliet. I think we. go together so well. We're like peanut butter and jelly. - Don't you think? - I do. Then, don't do it. Please don't do this. Please don't do this. What's up? I just thought I'd try you. I'm thinking about that story where you ran into the girl you used to babysit. - I don't know what I'm gonna do! - Please call me back. - I'm not gonna be OK. - You will. No, I won't. I'm not strong. I'll go back to Jan, and I hate Jan. Oh, god! - You might be interested - What? Andy, I've been meaning to ask you, which a cappella group should I join? The Harmoniacs or the Do-Re-Migos? Assuming you had the voice to be in any of them, it's irrelevant. Because I called admissions, and it looks like I will be conducting your university interview. - That's a conflict of interest. - Yeah. Big one. So should I not let you in now, or do you want to do the interview, and then I won't let you in? - Interview. - Excellent. When the hourglass strikes 3:00, then in the room whence employees confer. - What? - The conference room. Who are your role models? If I had to put his chances into a percentage, I would say he has none-percent chance. So Dane Cook. Jack Bauer. And Eli Whitney. You're doing great. Life is a highway I wanna ride it all night This is my niece, Vanessa. She's a trumpeter. - And look at her. - Cute. It must be really fun for you and Marcy. She only knows how to play When the saints go marching in. - I love that one. - Yeah, but She doesn't think she's gonna be, like, a career musician, right? Here we go again. What's your deal today? Just saying, how many famous trumpeters can you name, besides Louis Armstrong? - Miles Davis. - One. - Chet something. - Half. - The point is that there are jobs - Dizzy Gillespie. Also good. and hobbies. I love baseball more than anything, but you don't see me trying to get on the Mets. Pete, you couldn't make the Mets. She's at Pratt. You play JV baseball. Will you lighten up a little bit? Just calling it like I see it. I don't know if I'm going to make any money with art. I mean, it's a very competitive field. But I've a professor who says that I've a lot of promise. And if I don't try now, I never will, so Guys, what is going on? We pranked you. It was Pam's idea. Pam was the mastermind. Got you. That was killer. I was so close to blowing it. Let's see how well you know your big red history. Bring it. Who was Cornell's 8th president? - Dale Raymond Corson. - I'm sorry, that's incorrect. Cornell's 7th president was, in fact, James A. Perkins. Comprehension skills sub-par. Interviewing skills sub-par. What are you writing? You can't even give Cornell your full attention. On the contrary, I'm helping Cornell by evaluating their interviewers. Nobody wants that to happen. Well, when they get my evaluation, we'll see if they're interested. Applicant is attempting to blackmail interviewer, showing low moral character. Interviewer is threatening applicant with an arbitrary review process. Applicant is wasting everyone's time with stupid and inane accusations. Interviewer has suspect motives. Applicant has a head shaped like a trapezoid. Interviewer has turned off applicant's interest in Cornell, and they are going to go to the vastly superior Dartmouth. Ever heard of it? I think I have everything I need. I think I have everything I need. You will be hearing from the Cornell Application Department. And you will not be pleased with the result. And your affiliation with Cornell will end completely!  will end completely. That is all, sir. You may go. There's another dolly in the truck, Mike. You could take more than a lamp. For the record, I wanted to go another direction. Which was way better. Well, I'll be the judge of that. What do you got? I lost my engagement ring in ceramics class. Left it in my smock. I had this whole thing where I go back to class, wrongly accuse another girl. Look, I even used makeup to put a ring around my finger. - You can hardly see, it's very subtle. - That is good. Thank you. Truthfully, anything would have been better than that prank. Text message from my brother. "Pam cool. Welcome to the family." How about at Thanksgiving we prank Tom about being bald? - This is the last of it. - That's mine, actually. - Maybe put it back in the truck. - You're not staying? You know, I have some things I need to do this weekend. I just remembered, so I'll just ride back with you. - But you want me to put it back. - I'll be down in just a second. So I think I'm gonna go back with Darryl. - Bye. - OK, bye. I know it's hard, Mike. Break-ups hurt. We didn't break up. Looked like it. Sometimes when I'm down like this, it helps to sing the blues. That's a really pretty song. No, no, check it out. Look. Wanna do that? That's when you hit me with what's getting you down. No, wait, you You supposed to Never mind. I thought I'd come in casual today. Man, I'm hungry. Anyone else feel like a beet? - Where did you get those? - What, these? Bernard Farms. Best beets in the state. I see what you are doing. But I do not know where you are going with this. You will. As soon as you visit my new beet farm. You're supposed to cook these, aren't you? Cornell. Hey, sport. I heard someone got engaged, you dog! God! Nothing can hurt you now. You're a man in love! I was there. That dude is not engaged. I'm not a big believer in therapy, but I'll go into my own pockets to cover his co-pay. Big idea: double wedding. Me, Angela. You, Holly. We would never do that. And if we did, it would be with Jim and Pam. - We'd never do that. - So there you go. Michael, I got my bridesmaid dress. So quickly. And you said I could get it in any color I wanted, so I picked white. Michael, did you tell your mom yet? Nope. Not yet. - You wouldn't tell your mom? - You love your mom. - I'll call her later. - Let's call her right now. - Call her! Call her! - I don't want to do that. - Call her! - All right, I will call her. She's going to freak out. - Speakerphone! - That's Thanks. - Hello? - Mom, I'm gettin' married. - No, you're not. - Why do you always do that Whenever I'm geing married, you don't believe me. Are you getting married? No I'm not. I'm not getting married. Psych. Episode: 5x06 "Customer Survey" (1.00) So, I returned my bridesmaid dress, and it was on sale, so I'm out $100. And I'm out a fiancee. - Those are customer surveys? - This is all of them. Jim, Dwight, Phyllis, Stanley, Andy It's the receipt to my bridesmaid dress. - What's that doing there? - I'll take care of that for you. Thanks. Kelly Kapoor is our dusky, exotic, customer service rep. And once a year she will contact our clients and find out how happy they are with our salespeople. Sort of a Kapoor's list. Schindler's list parody. That's not appropriate. Those reports affect our bonuses. Which is kind of great for me because, you wouldn't know from looking at her but Pam's a gold digger. New York ain't free. Get back to work. It's the world's tiniest bluetooth. I found it in a japanese gadget store in the Village. I got one for Jim too. - Jim, say something. - Testing, testing. Hello, everybody. We wanted to stay on the phone all day, but the company has a policy against 8-hour personal calls. So we're not telling anyone. - Pam, what do you want in your coffee? - Sprinkle of cinnamon. I should go. All righty, Dwighty, let's see how you did. - Bring it on. - No Sorry. What does it say? Dwight, your feedback is horrible. - That's impossible. - A number of your clients found your personal style abrasive and distasteful? I sell more paper than anyone. Wait, is this a joke? I'm getting that queasy feeling that sometimes accompanies jokes. - Do I look like I am joking? - No, but that's sometimes part of it. If I were joking, you'd be laughing. Do you look like you are laughing? Impossible to say. I can't see myself. You're not. Yo, Tommy Tuna, - Did you get your scores yet? - Nope. I got mine. They were really good. I miss him. - You must be really proud. - Pretty psyched. That's my mug. Sorry. It was just It was right here. Right, well, it's mine, so, if you could pour it out and get another one. Or maybe I could finish the coffee in here. And you could use Snoopy. He's funny. Don't give up Snoopy. That's mine. That is a great mug. But it's not my mug. That is my mug. So give it back. - How can you even be sure? - It has my face on it. Make the face. - No, I don't see it. - Dude, that is my face. What was that? That was Dwight. He seems upset about something. Describe him exactly. What color mustard is his shirt? - Yellow or Dijon? - It is more of a spicy brown, actually. - What are you mumbling about? - How was your meeting with Michael? - None of your business. - Was it your scores? These can't be my scores, Jim. For your information - I'm being sabotaged. - Of course. And I'm gonna find that person and punish them. Absolutely. Or you could just be nice to your customers. - You're an idiot. - There's the charm. Jimbo, let's do this thang. That is me. Wish me luck. - No way. - Good luck. - Thanks. - Didn't say anything. - Love you. - Love you too. What do you think I am saying to you? Not talking to you. I caught Jim talking to himself several times today. What a loser. Get a friend, loser! I'm looking at it right now. It's really gorgeous. You guys do great work. I found the best "tentist" on the east coast. He personally tented Giuliani's first and third weddings. And I got him. I got him! Would you be able to do the same design, but, with walls of gray? And a top that's gray too? Fabulous. Come on! - What? - You too? - Did my scores drop a little? - Jim, they are a poopy. Are we even sure that's my file? Yes, I am sure, Jim. - Well, there's gotta be an explanation. - I agree. So let's see what we can find out from reading. "Jim Halpert is smudge and arrogant." I think you mean "smug". - Arrogance. - I'm just trying to And there's our smudgeness. I need a decent bonus because I'm actually in the process of buying my parents' house So that they can retire. And if history tells us anything, it's that you can't go wrong buying a house you can't afford. Pam doesn't know about the house, so Fun surprise. Pam. Sorry about that. I lost you for a second. So as it turns out, I may not have done so hot on my customer reviews this year. Maybe it's cause you spent whole year flirting with the receptionist. A little bit. Worth it. Here's what's going to happen. I am going to have to fix you. Manage you two on a more personal scale. A more micro form of management. - Jim, what is that called? - Microgement. Now, Jim is going to be the client. Dwight, you're going to have to sell to him without being aggressive, hostile, or difficult. - Let's go. - All right, fine. - Hello. - Hello, this is Dwight Schrute from the Dunder Mifflin paper company. That's great 'cause I need paper. Excellent, then you are in luck because we are having a limited-time offer only on everything. - This is my lucky day. - Ask him his name. - What's your name, sir? - I am Bill Buttlicker. - Really? That's your real name? - How dare you? My family built this country, by the way! - Be respectful, Dwight. - Yes, Michael. Would you hold on a second? That's my other line. Hello. No, I'm just on the phone with this stupid salesman. He's so dumb. I'm probably just gonna keep him on line forever and not buy anything. It's up to you to change his mind. Sorry. That was a family emergency. - No, what's wrong? - You know what, that's private. - Boundaries, Dwight. Come on! - I'm sorry, Mr. Buttlicker. - As I was saying, we're having - You'll have to speak a bit louder. - I'm hard of hearing. - He's hard of He's an old man. - As I was saying, right now we are - You're gonna have to talk louder. - Our prices have never been lower. - Son, you have to talk louder. - Never been lower. - Louder, son! Buttlicker, our prices have never been lower! Stop it! That is totally inappropriate. You never yell at the client. - Never yell at a client. - Listen to me, sir. - Here we go. - The 3 words I would describe you as is aggressive, hostile, and definitely difficult. - Please, Mr. Buttlicker. - I'm irate right now! Please give me another chance. - Mr. Buttlicker, - Give me the phone! - I've to put you on with my boss. - Well, I should hope so. - Who is this? - Hello, this is Michael Scott, - regional manager. - This is William M. Buttlicker. Hello, Mr. Buttlicker. How may we help you? Michael, I like the sound of your voice. You know what I'm gonna do? I'm gonna buy $1million worth of paper products today. See how it's done? Thank you very much, sir. I don't think you'll regret it. - You're the master. - There is one condition, Michael. You have to fire the salesman that treated me so terribly. Don't do it, Michael. It's a million-dollar sale. So, it's called the Shangri-La tent. It's two stories, heated, and it has a bridal suite for my bridal sweet. It's just really simple. Really tasteful. I don't want to be married in a tent like a hobo. Hobos live in trains. Nana Mimi can't be in canvas that long. Well, Nana Mim OK, look This tent is awesome. And it's in high demand, so I really think we should put a deposit down now. OK, fine. You can have your tent, but only if it's in a field. - A hand-plowed field. - Done, and done-er. There has to be a barn that's old enough that you can see the stars through the roof slats when you lay on your back. And antique tools to look at when you roll over. Do you have a specific place in mind? But anything within a 5 to 8 mile radius is acceptable. On it! - Get in. - Are you serious? Get in! OK, what are you They might listen to us. They might be listening to us! Who's "they"? Customer service might be monitoring this conversation. - In this car? - Never know, better safe than sorry. What are you thinking here? Who stands to benefit from our downfall? The mob? Maybe NASA. Could be the mob. But then Dunder Mifflin would need to be a front for money laundering, - and there's little evidence of that. - Is there some evidence? - Cute shoes online. - How many shoes do you need? I don't know. 2? Maybe 3, if one wears out. - How many shoes do you need? - Not talking to you. - Who are you talking to? - Pam. - She's not here, Jim! - No, she's not. I found it. I found the perfect place. A local bed and breakfast on a 60-acre beet farm. And even better, I have an in with the owner. We work together. It's Dwight Schrute. As in Schrute Farms. So I'd like to re-double my order. If you could put me down for Wait. Shut up. I'm sorry? Do you hear that? Hear what? Breathing. Is that you? - Well, I am breathing, yes. - Well, stop. Hold your breath. I still hear it. Who's there? Kelly, is that you? Hold on. I need paper. - My god, you scared me! - Hear anything interesting? - What are you talking about? - I think you know. You always say that, and I almost never know. What are you up to, girl? Phyllis put you up to this? Stanley? Are they paying you? - Are you accusing me of something? - Of course. I know you're the mastermind. But you're too stupid to do it by yourself. Easy - Let's head back to the desk. - You can't come into my nook and call me stupid. Maybe if you were a little bit more nice and polite, people wouldn't give such bad customer reviews. The reason that I got bad customer reviews is because I didn't! There is a massive conspiracy going on here, and I know you're involved. Get out of my nook! That's what she said! That's what she said! Good one. Sorry about Dwight, by the way. Yeah, he's weird. Well, we all handle it differently. I personally choose to handle it like a normal person, but How are you and Darryl? We're cool. Bye. That was weird. - What was? - Have you ever had a conversation where she didn't go on for 15 minutes without taking a breath? No, actually. - Did you do something to her? - Don't think so. Well, something's off. Hey, how's things? All right. Livin' in the moment. Do you have any reason to believe that Kelly would be mad at me? I don't play the politics game anymore, Jim. Can I tell you something? I played it full-on in New York. I played it high stakes. For keeps. Made it to the top. But look what it costs. - Can I tell you what else I learned? - Wait, that's pretty weird. - What? - Andy has a mug just like that. Kelly gave them out as party favors. - Remember? You got one. - What party? Her America's Got Talent finale party over the summer. Crazy. It was packed. I thought everyone was there. - You were, I remember you being there. - I wasn't, but thank you. - Do you know anything about this party? - Yes, I said you definitely should go, but you wanted to visit me instead. I can't be the only one who didn't - Let me see your coffee cup. - No! - Is that it? - No. Why? OK, I'm gonna assume that was it. Here's the thing. I think you're right. I think it was Kelly. I think she's mad at us for not coming to her party. Man, I knew it. Who are her co-conspirators? - Probably just Kelly. - Obviously. I knew it. - That's what I'm saying. - What? - You were right. - I was I was right. - You were right. You knew it. - I was right. I knew it. - You knew it the whole time, buddy. - I knew it the whole time, buddy! Right, Dwight is loud. I knew it! Kelly the whole time! Let's get her. Dwight, Dwight, let's talk about this. What's going on? - Why don't you tell us. - Nothing's going on. Let me paint you a picture, of a little girl from southern India, who, despite being welcomed into this country, will now spend the rest of her life in prison for a crime she did commit. I was informed by these gentlemen that the reports that you filed may not entirely be accurate. What? I don't know what you're talking about. It's the first time I'm hearing about this. Come on! You juked the stats, cupcake. We called about a dozen customers, they all said they gave us great marks. What's going on? I love your tie, Michael. I was raped. You cannot say "I was raped" and expect all your problems to go away, Kelly. Not again. Don't keep doing that. I'll give you one last chance to come clean. Just tell me what happened. OK, all right. OK, I did it, all right? I lied, whatever. Just fire me. But you know what? I did it because you didn't come to my party, and you said you would try to, and then didn't even show up, and so you're bad friends. We have our confession. I'm calling security Get away from that, Dwight, please. You know, she's got a point about you. You do have a problem dealing with people. - See? I wasn't lying. - You were lying. - I was lying. - Yes. Jim, Dwight, please excuse us. - I wanna be here when you fire her ass. - I'll call you when it's time. I have an enormous amount of trouble trying to get people to come to my place. And I hate it. I can't tell you how much leftover guacamole I have ended up eating over the years. I don't even know why I make it in such great quantities. Here's what we're gonna do. We are going to sit here for a while, make it look good. And maybe you should cry. - Can you make yourself cry? - No problem. I think you should do that. Pam Beesly? Hey! What are you doing here? - Who's that? - It's Alex. It's Pam. I came to kidnap you. There's free wine and cheese at the Chuck Close retrospective, let's go. That's gonna be great. Who's Chuck Close? I love Chuck Close and his photo-realist paintings. But I have to work. Well, actually there's something else I'd love to talk to you about. Can we go somewhere else to talk about it? That's it, I want to talk to this guy. Put me in his ear. What's up? I want to take a big leap. And I want to tell you that I think that you should not move back to Scranton. I'm gonna make a bigger leap here. He is into you. Why did you come to New York in the first place? Because they have a great design program, and I wanted to see if I was any good at it. And I wanted to work on my art too. Right. And that's why I think you should stay here. 'Cause, I mean, you really, you just got here. You know, and you can't do New York in three months. You know, it has everything. All the opportunity is here. All the whole art scene is in New York. It would be nuts to go back to Scranton without getting to fully experience it. Jim's in Scranton. I know, but all I'm saying is, if there's even a teeny tiny part of you that really wants to be an artist, then I think you should stay here. Because you don't want to wake up in 50 years and look back and wonder what could have been. And that is the end of my speech. I planned it all. Anyway - I will see you tomorrow. - I'll see you tomorrow. Is that the Matsuhashi B400? World's tiniest bluetooth. - May I? - Don't. Congratulations on choosing Schrute Farms for your wedding. No, we haven't decided on anything yet. We're still reviewing some options, and it's gonna come down to the numbers. Well, then, why don't you look over some of our materials? While I describe to you the Excalibur package. In addition to the breathtaking natural beauty and smell of Schrute Farms, I can promise you that our grounds can be catered to fit your exact specifications. I will work tirelessly for you over the coming months, and be at your constant disposal. Please feel free to call or stop by any time of the day or night. Very generous. Well you, my good friend, have nothing more to worry about. This wedding is officially out of your hands. Thank the good lord. Deal! - What are we talking, price wise? - You already said deal. Pay him whatever he wants. Can't argue with that. You're gonna make us so happy. Did you know that in Morocco it is common to exchange a small gift when meeting somebody for the first time? In Japan, you must always commit suicide to avoid embarrassment. In Italy, you must always wash your hands after going to the bathroom. This is considered to be polite. Why are you telling us this? I am jetting off on an international business trip. - Where you going? - To Canada. - Where is it? - Canada. My boss is sending me abroad to do a presentation to an international client. And I have always been intrigued by all things international The women, the pancakes, the Man of Mystery Meredith, I'd like you to pretend that you are from Abu Dhabi. I am ashamed at your naked face. I must cover it with my jacket. You are now sexy in your culture. Episode: 5x07 "Business Trip" (1.00) T- minus One more week. Pam comes back from New York next week and everyone here has just been so excited for me. And involved. And intrusive. And weird. One more week! - Do you have your passport? - I have my passport. - Got your per diem? - I have my per diem. I already know what I am going to spend this on. I'm going to buy a sweater. Michael That's for your food. I'll use different money for that. I was happy to send Michael on this trip. He's been feeling pretty down since we had to transfer Holly up to New Hampshire and But this little perk really seemed to turn him around. And it's pretty tough to find somebody who wants to go up to Winnipeg mid-November. And business class air, like a five-star hotel in the sky, nothing but the best. Actually, better than a five-star hotel 'cause you get a big, cushy seat and you sit in a row of people. And to eat, whatever the mind can imagine. I think I am going to have a filet with mushroom sauce. Well, I'm just glad you're happy, 'cause, you know, I felt bad. Well, that is all the past. And in terms of nightlife, when you get there, just ask the concierge. They have one of those? Let's do this! - Why do you need three suitcases? - Two are empty for souvenirs. - You have your money belt? - I do. It is right here. You want to wear that puppy right up on the breastbone like a bra. - I don't want to wear a bra. - Let me help you. Stop it! You want to get robbed in a foreign country? - I wash my hands of this. - OK. Where's my translator? Ici, monsieur. I'm just bidding a bon voyage  la mon petite fiance. Translation: Good-bye, my petite fiance. - Be good. - I will try. - Meaning what? - Meaning I will try to get other dudes laid. That's what I'm talking about. That could be you if you hadn't forgotten french. Where is my numbers man? - Here. - There we go! Our town car awaits. - It's just a van. - It's not just a van. I know my way around a van. That is just a van. Dwight, could you get those, please? Welcome to Cribs, the Business class edition. Check this out. Mimosa. - Sweet! - Handed it to me. As I sat down. This was my hot towel. It is still wet. Michael G. Scott, rollin' like a pimp! Take a sip of that. That good? Don't drink all of it. Give some to Oscar. That's really good. You want one? I can hook you up. - You'll need to keep moving. - Yes, this is Beth. This is my personal valet, slash flight attendant, and she'll be helping me this morning. We need to keep the aisle clear. - Get back, come on. - All right. Get back to the slums! Oh, boy. Hey, guys. Check it out. My own personal dvd player and 20 movies. Andy brought one, too. Harry and the Hendersons. Keep it down. I made egg salad sandwiches. Do you want one? Could you have picked something stinkier to bring on a plane? My God, Oscar. Really? Do you have a bag of baby poop, too, to share with everybody? No, I'll be ordering my own food. Thank you very much. I'd like to see a menu, please. I'm sorry, there are no meals on flights less than two hours. Doesn't matter, because I am going to take a nap. I think I'm going to use my complimentary blindfold. I will don it And Look at that. I can't see because I am in a And what would you like to drink? Just checking out where I'm gonna be pretty soon. When Pam gets back. Gonna be close quarters. Gonna be a lot of tension. For you. I'm with Darryl. This looks like where I'll probably do my push-ups every day. Is that supposed to impress me? Not gonna happen. He has hurt me too much and too often and I am in a healthy relationship now. So, I'm not gonna flaunt it, I'm not gonna hurt him, but that door is closed. What are we doing? This is so wrong. This is nice! Move in here. Very sweet. I'll check us in. Very cool! We are gonna find out where the action is, my friend. Where's the concierge? Wallace said there would be one of those. Bingo. Follow moi, bro-sieur. What about a nice sushi place? Maybe a place with a view? Matsuki. That's a good one. You may walk there if you wish or you may take the number 17 bus until 9:00. Other than that, you can take the taxi and the number is right there. I'm blown away by this. This is great. Thank you. One final question. Where might you find yourself on a Winnipeg night like tonight? The Huntsman is good. Down here. The financial district. A concierge is the Winnipeg equivalent of a geisha. This is a woman who has been trained in the fine art of fanciness and pleasure. And when you meet one, it is intoxicating. Just what the doctor ordered. Can't believe this. - Are you sure? - I just talked to my advisor. Failing. - I thought you were good at Flash. - I was. And then they switched to Acrobat just as I was learning Quark. I hate computers. It's no big deal. So you're not a computer geek. I have to stay and retake it. That means another 12 weeks. Can you do another 3 months of this? It's not about me. I mean, this is your dream. And you went to New York to do this. So when you come back, you come back the right way. Right? Right. You OK? My cell battery's low, so I have to let you go. - Love you. Bye. - Love you too. Guys. She's sitting there. Engaging wings. I'm probably gonna leave after one drink. Yeah, with a hot slab of canadian bacon in your hand. Excuse me. Concierge Marie. Michael Scott. - Good to see you again. - Good to see you. This is my associate from Dunder Mifflin. - Oscar Martinez. - Nice to meet you. Works in accounting. This is concierge Marie. Who works at our hotel. You look how you say, radiant tonight. And it is how you say, a beautiful night. Michael, why? She's foreign. I am For Madame et monsieur. - Thank you. - You're very welcome. - Thank you, Andy. - Thank you! Let me get a picture of you guys. Everybody's going to end up dying someday, and I think it's better to die with some people that you like Like Oscar, and Andy, and concierge Marie Than to know that there's somebody out there that you love that you're not with. All right. I've scoped out the joint. Those two dudes are as good as naked. How do you even know they're gay? Come on! It's Dandy Dale and Foppy McGee over there. Mademoiselle! Beer me dos Long Island Iced Teas, s'il vous plat. Bad decision in a glass. I don't care if you're gay, straight, engaged whatever. A guy needs intercourse. You will thank me when they spank thee. Don't do this! - You guys like apples? - What? Do you like apples? - Sorry, what - How do you like these apples? All right, on a scale of 1 to 10. How hot is that dude? Is he your boyfriend or something? But he could be yours if you play your cards right. Dude. Leave us alone, right? Gentlemen. - What are you doing? - Dude, you struck out. They're totally stuck-up. Here, drink up. How about this one? It's Christmas Eve and everything is closed, and you need to get some dry cleaning done. What do you do? What do you do? Come on. What do you do? Astro Cleaners on St. James Place is the only place that is open on that day. Unbelievable. - If you don't mind me asking - Anything. You can ask me anything. I'm your wingman. It's just that, I've sat next to Angela for a very long, very long time. Right-o. How could anyone stand that woman? - What? - What do you see in her? - What do you see in Angela? - What do I see in Angela? I wanna know. I see through a hard exterior to a little jelly in the middle. She is teaching me to be a better person. And she's working really hard on that. And she has the softest skin I've ever seen and I can't wait to have sex with her. You haven't had sex? Are you guys waiting to get married, or? Honestly, I don't know what we're waiting for. - Something's wrong with that woman. - What is wrong with her? I'd like to know. You should call and ask. I'd like to know what's wrong. I should call her and ask her. What is wrong with her? Do it. Call her. Oh my god, don't call her Andy. - Don't call her. - Too late. Too late, it's dialing. Now it's ringing. - Hello? - What is wrong with you? - Why won't you do Andy? - What? Oscar wants to know why you won't do me, and I think it's a valid question. - Are you drunk? - This is Andy Bernard. - I know who this is. - I wanna take you to sex school. - What? - Who is that, monkey? Is somebody there? Are you drunk? - I have needs. - We will discuss this later. - Naked. - What? We'll discuss it later naked. I want to see you naked. Do you wanna get some breakfast or something? I'm so tired. - How does everyone know already? - Know what? Pam failed art school. - Doesn't surprise me. - Excuse me? Have you seen her painting, Jim? The building? There are shadows coming from two different directions. What? Are there two suns? Come on Last I checked, that's not an office building in the Andromeda galaxy. I'm gonna grab a cup of coffee. It's totally unrealistic. No lines in the parking lot. - That was fun last night. - Yeah, it was. You know, it's true what they say Long Island Iced Teas are way stronger in Canada. - Thanks for trying to hook me up. - You kiddin' me? It's what I do. Get the whole nine 'Nards. I can't believe we called her up. Totally. Who? I'm talking about Angela. I can't believe we called her up last night. We called Angela? You called her. That was real? I thought I dreamed that. - Oh, god! - All right. Oh, god! So bad. - Morning, Michael. - Are you ready for the meeting? Slept like a baby. - This can't happen again. - This has to happen again. Darryl can't happen again. Look at me. Do you want me to do more push-ups? You have to break up with Darryl. I already typed out a text message for you. All you have to do is press "send." I don't know. I mean - it's well-written and all, I just - Has to be done. We'll press "send" together. - My god. He's gonna kill us. - I'd like to see him try. He says it's cool. - He said, "it's cool!" - That's all he wrote? - That's all he wrote. - Can I see it? - Didn't you two date for a long time? - This is like a fairy tale! I'll be honest with you, we've been talking with Catalyst Paper. Their prices are better than yours. Look, people continue to come back to us time and time again because they feel cared for here. They feel respected and they feel that their needs matter. They are treated like human beings. - Everything OK? - Yes. Man, she's so pissed. She's taking us back to first base. What's first base with Angela? I get to kiss her forehead. I had a good time hangin' out this weekend. I had a good time, too. Wingman for life. - W.M.F.L. - Thank you. You up for a chest bump? Bro hug? Back to basics. I like it. I had to go all the way to Canada to get to know a guy who sits 20 feet away from me. And he's delightful! I just heard you guys made the sale. - Yeah, we locked him up for 2 years. - Good, very good. See, told you. Sounds like somebody had a good trip. No, actually, the trip sucked. - Excuse me? - The trip sucked, David. It blew chunks. It was terrible. It was a bad trip. - What are you talking about? - I did not like the trip. Well Starting with the airport shuttle, which was basically just a van. And business class, which was basically just coach. - And the hotel which sucked big time. - The hotel? What, M - It was not It sucked. - I'm sorry to hear the hotel was bad. And thanks for the tip on the concierge. That was great. That was great. That was - That was a really good choice. - Please, listen for a second. No, David, you listen to me. Why did you send her away? That God! You knew I liked her and you just sent her away. And that - That was a sucky thing to do, man. - Michael, - sometimes - That was a really sucky thing to do. Sometimes we Why have I stayed at Dunder Mifflin for so long? Certainly not because of the paycheck. 'Cause I could be making more money as a doctor or a professional athlete. I think it's because they respect me. A boss that will not fire you even though you just tell him off right to his face over the phone That's respect. You did it, man. Day one. Congrats. Thanks, man. I'm coming back the wrong way. It's not because of you. I don't like graphic design. That's it. Stop smiling. I really didn't like it. It's just designing logos and stuff. And I missed Scranton. But it is not because I missed you. I just really wanted to come home. And I know you said to come home the right way, but you can't tell me what to do. - Got it? - I missed you. I missed you, too. You're back. Good. I need you to make five copies of these. I'm not going inside. All right. First thing in the morning, then. Welcome back. - We're back together again, baby. - We're back. They tried to keep us apart, but they couldn't. It was like destiny. I realized that, for whatever reason, I just couldn't do better than Kelly. Are you swallowing them whole? You're eating them so fast, are they even touching your tongue? Brownies, is it? Pastry cubes made of sugar and fat? No, thanks. I'll stick with my jerky. - Why'd you come in here? - To socialize. And inform. I'm taking two so I can parcel them up and eat them at my leisure later on. Much healthier. You taking two? Yeah, but one of them is for Toby. Why don't you send that to him in Costa Rica? - I'm gonna hand it to him right now. - OK, weirdo. Why's that weird? She said she was gonna give it to him right now. She's probably going to, cause they sit next to each other. They used to. Toby works here again. Can you imagine? You don't know. I don't know. What? You should probably just meander back there, take a look, see if he's - see if he's back. - Dare I? You know what? I'm going to. For old time's sake. Great practical joke, Jim. Got me to go to the annex. No! God! No, God, please no! Episode: 5x08 "Frame Toby" (1.00) Look at him. With his stupid face. Stupid tan. He looks great. Well-rested. He looks worse. Michael, is everyone OK? I'm afraid not. Toby Flenderson of H.R. has made a sudden reappearance. I don't understand. Is anyone hurt? Not on the surface. But I can tell people are disturbed, David. You texted me "911. CALL ME!" All in caps. Do you know what 911 means? I learned a while back, that if I don't text 911, people'll not return my calls. But now people always return my calls, because they think that something horrible has happened. What I'm curious about is how you were able to go an entire week without knowing a member of your staff was there. I did not want to go back to the annex cause that's where Holly worked, - whom I loved. - Also it's icky back there. That's true. People say it's icky. I have to go. David, wait. Is there no way we can get rid of him? - Not without cause, Michael. - I have cause. It is because I hate him. You have to get along with Toby. - I don't. - Goodbye, Michael. Don't do that. Come on! Do you see this? Disgusting. So, Tunes you still gonna buy your old man's place? I am. Wait. How do you know? I didn't tell you. I was walking by your desk. I saw some emails. I got peepers of an eagle. - That's really not cool. - So, Jim you're gonna live in the same house that you used to pee the bed in? I guess technically, Kev, you're right. Today's a big day. Today's the day that I show Pam the house that I bought for us. Without telling her. But it's my parents' house, the house I grew up in. I bought it kind of impulsively. The price was good and I was helping out my mom. It's got shag carpets. You can't blame my parents, it was the 70s. And why would you wanna buy ugly wood from trees when you can have paneling and a painting of some creepy clowns that is apparently crucial to the integrity of the building? She's gonna love it. Right? Would you guys do me a favor and not talk about this until I tell Pam? That'd be great. You haven't told the missus about the castle? You're in for a spanking. Myself and my lady no secrets. Jim, don't listen to Andy. I think it's romantic. - Thanks, Phyllis. - Where's your place? It's on Linden Ave., by the quarry. Cool beans, man. I live by the quarry. We should hang out by the quarry and throw things down there. Definitely, we should. "To whoever made the microwave mess. "The microwave is a shared kitchen appliance. "By not cleaning it up, you are telling whoever follows "that their time is less valuable, as they will have to scrub out "your disgusting splatter. "Sincerely, disappointed." That is just obnoxious. No kidding. Wait, what? The mess or the note? The note. So holier than thou. I liked it. Don't you think the person who left the mess is the obnoxious one? The note is way more obnoxious than the mess. "Sincerely, disappointed." Get off your high horse, Richy. Just because someone likes things clean doesn't mean they're rich. They're rich. You wanna see some real high-caliber acting? Mr. Kurt Russell, you are about to be served. Great to have you back, man. Seriously. Just a real pleasure to see you again. You're welcome. Missed you as part of our family. Well, that's sweet. I missed you guys too. So, Costa Rica that was Did you have fun? That must have been fun. It was amazing. Really was. Thanks for asking. Beaches were pristine. Nice peaches? Pristine beaches? The whole thing was incredibly cathartic. Why'd you come back? Why didn't you stay? It's actually kind of hard to meet people out there. For you. Plus, it was hot. Why didn't you get an air conditioner? Should have gotten an air conditioner for yourself. - Are you all right, Michael? - Yeah, I am. I tried. I tried to talk to Toby and be his friend, but that is like trying to be friends with an evil snail. I feel like I'm dying inside. I feel like Neve Campbell in Scream II. She thinks she can go off to college and be happy, and then the murderer comes back and starts killing off all of her friends. Learned a lot of lessons from that movie. This is just one of them. OK, just summarize. Fireable offenses include workplace violence and sexual harassment. That's it, perfect. We'll get him to hit on somebody, and then we'll catch him in the act. I love catching people in the act. That's why I always whip open doors. Me too. Let's get this started. - What are you doing? - I am the bait. - For what? - Men find me desirable. It's a good day too. I'm wearing my mustard shirt. The bait for Toby? For one thing, he's not gay. And if somebody were to be bait, it would be Jim or Ryan. Or me. Men find me desirable. Sure they do. When it comes down to it, it's a health issue. I should've written that. Why aren't you as interested in this as me? Totally! Sorry, are we talking about the microwave still? Are you inching away from me? Reach your arms out. I'm always this close. Camptown lady sing this song May I have a moment with Pam, please? I just have to take this call anyway, so His mistress! I'm kidding. Nobody'd ever cheat on you. - You are the complete package. - What do you need? What I would like you to do is take this folded note, and deliver it to Toby Flenderson. I want you to just react to whatever this note elicits. Do not read it beforehand. Can you do that for me? - Sure. - Good. "Please hug and kiss me, no matter how hard I struggle. "I'm too shy to tell you that I love you." Damn it, Pam. You gave me your word. Guys, that's really inappropriate. What's up? I got some photos from Costa Rica if you wanna see em. Yeah, let's see them. Toby, can I see those? What's the matter? - You scared? - Those are fighting words. I hope he doesn't haul off and just hit you. Do you wanna do that? You wanna hit me? You wanna punch me? - Punch him! - I dare you to. Come on. - What's the matter? - Hit him, chicken. Yeah, punch him. Come on, Ryan. Whose side are you on? No, do it. I dare you. Punch him as hard as you possibly can. Not as hard as you can. Just a good, solid punch. - Come on. - I'm not gonna punch you. Are you really not gonna punch him? - No, why would I punch you? - Son of a bitch. Shoulda hit him. Guy was asking for it. Once in a lifetime, man. You were gonna parcel those out through the day? Would you stop it? You haven't done anything helpful all day. There's still one thing we can do to get Toby fired. What's that? Frame him for using drugs. - Frame him? - It's illegal. But everything they do on The Shield is illegal. I've never framed a man before. Have you? I've framed animals before. I framed a raccoon for opening a Christmas present. And I framed a bear for eating out of the garbage. Just seems awfully mean. But sometimes, the ends justify the mean. I've seen you guys around. I'm Michael Scott, Dunder Mifflin. How you doing? I guess you know why I'm here. I need to purchase something. Like a fridge? I wanted to buy some weed from someone. - What? - Grass, weed? What makes you think we'd have weed? I heard you were drug I heard you dealt. Just hold on a second. I'm not wearing a wire, so Why would you even say that? It's gonna be $500. - How much? - $500. It's a good price. It's a steal. How many pounds is that? It's 2 pounds. I'm losing money on this, man, just give me the money. Walk away. I wanna let you know, I'm totally on your side with the whole microwave situation. I was just back there to make some cup of soup, - the thing is still a huge mess. - I know. Can you believe it? It's crazy. But I guess the thing is at some point, notes or no notes, someone's gonna have to just get in there and clean it up. I guess that's why we have a temp. No, trust me. I would just make it worse. How would wiping it with a paper towel make it worse? I would find a way. You've seen things clean before though, right? Pam, I am hopeless to that stuff. I forgot Forgot Yes, I repeat: a drug dealer is on the premises of Dunder Mifflin. His name is Toby Flenderson, and he recently returned from a mysterious vacation in Central America. I have risked a great deal to tell you this information. My name is Andy Bernard. Andrew Bernard, that's my name. See you soon. We received a call. I don't know anything. We were tipped off about a possible narcotic situation. Here? I got this, OK? Hello, officers. Former volunteer sheriff's deputy. I may have inside information that someone is hiding drugs in this very office. Just pretend like we're talking until the cops leave. Those are real cops. Real guns. Wonder what's going on. Officers, I reveal to you the perpetrator. - What's this? - Search his things. Could you step away from your desk? - Please step away from your desk. - What's going on? You don't have my permission. They don't need your permission. They've got the company's permission. What are you Why are you doing this? You know what? This is probably a misunderstanding. Don't search my stuff. I have a reasonable right to privacy. Save your whining for the jury there. Let's just cancel this, OK? Did you recently return from a trip to Central America? My God. There was I went to Costa Rica for a few months. That was totally legitimate. - God! - That is not mine. - Turn around please, would you? - What is going on here? I don't know what that is I bet he has nothing to do with that. - That's mine. - No, Michael! It's mine. Some basil. - And salad dressing, I think. - Salad dressing? Yeah, it's Caprese Salad. There's a little bit of mozzarella right there. Are you kidding me? That's my salad. Wait a minute. There's no drugs? Damn it. Come on! I think we got a fake tip. Officers, are you sure you don't want to interrogate him? You have laws that protect you in any kind of interrogation. Why don't you use them? You must feel pretty good about yourself right now. I didn't put Caprese Salad in my drawer. Did you? Since when is it illegal to put Caprese Salad anywhere? The police could have been out there, catching real criminals, instead of here, searching my stuff. Are you kidding me? That's what you're worried about? You're worried about the cop's time. You think I framed you, and you're worried about the taxpayer? God! Welcome back, jerky jerk-face. You said you were leaving, and you made liars out of all of us. - I did leave. - Yes, you did. And then you came back. Which makes you the biggest liar - of the history. - I don't see it that way. You wanna hear a lie? I think you're great. You're my best friend. - I can't do this. - Can't do what? It's not fair to you. And it's really not fair to me. What are you saying? I broke up with Darryl. That was your choice. Don't put that on me. I'm just going on a little trip. - Can I come? - Not that kind of trip. Going to Thailand with friends from high school. Well, a high school. If I don't do it now, I'll never go. And I'll always resent you for it. You don't want me to resent you? - So you're dumping me? - Let's be adults about this. Let's have sex one more time, and if you have any extra cash, that would be amazing. Do you mind if we make a stop on the way home? - Sure. - Cool. - Your parents' house? - I have a surprise for you. Ready? Close your eyes. And now Open your eyes. I don't get it. I bought it. It's ours. Let's go inside. I'll show you inside. So, if you can believe it, I did it without a realtor. Saving on closing costs is good. We can put all of the money to de-shag the carpet. Which I think will help the color situation. I'm really sorry about this. I tried to move it, but he is really nailed in there. Worried about art theft, I guess. A lot of art thieves in this neighborhood. This is the master bedroom. But I'm actually not allowed in here, so. I'm still in the process of converting the garage. It's got great light in here. And I was thinking it could be perfect for an art studio. Look I know, I bought this without asking you. It doesn't look great. I know that. And if you really hate it, I totally understand. It's just I love it. You do? I love it. - Really? - You bought me a house. Oh, my God. You bought me a house! Yeah, I did. Do we have to sleep in your parents' bedroom? No, we'll just board that up. It'll be that weird spare room that people ask us about. And the clown? I really can't move him. What is my perfect crime? I break into Tiffany's at midnight. Do I go for the vault? No. I go for the chandelier. It's priceless. As I'm taking it down, a woman catches me. She tells me to stop. It's her father's business. She's Tiffany. I say no. We make love all night. In the morning, the cops come, and I escape in one of their uniforms. I tell her to meet me in Mexico, but I go to Canada. I don't trust her. Besides, I like the cold. I have a son, he's the chief of police. This is where the story gets interesting. I tell Tiffany to meet me in Paris by the Trocadero. She's been waiting all these years. She's never taken another lover. I don't care. I don't show up. I go to Berlin. That's where I stashed the chandelier. Here are our final actual costs for this year. As you can see, we did pretty well. Yes, I can see That we did indeed. Why don't you explain this to me like I am an 8-year-old? This is the overall budget for this fiscal year along the x-axis. - Right there. - There's the "x-axix." You can see clearly on this page that we have a surplus of $4,300. We have to spend that by the end of the day or it will be deducted from next year's budget. Why don't you explain this to me like I'm five? Your mommy and daddy give you $10 to open up a lemonade stand. So you go out and you buy cups and you buy lemons and you buy sugar. And now you find out that it only cost you $9. So you have an extra dollar. So you can give that dollar back to mommy and daddy, but guess what? Next summer I'll be six. And you ask them for money, they're gonna give you $9, 'cause that's what they think it costs to run the stand. So what you want to do is spend that dollar on something now, so that your parents think that it costs $10 to run the stand. So the dollar's a surplus. This is a surplus. We have to spend that $4,300 by the end of the day or it'll be deducted from next year's budget. We should spend this money on a new copier which we desperately need. Break it down in terms of I think I'm getting you. Jarick &amp; Collioure Episode: 5x09 "The Surplus" (1.00) Guess what, everybody? Christmas has come early this year. Oscar very smartly has discovered an extra $4,300 in the budget. Thank you, Oscar. And I have decided with that money I am going to buy a new Drum roll, please. Can anybody guess? - New chairs? - No. A new copier. Unless everybody can agree on something better? No, please. Please do not do this. Michael, new chairs. These chairs are terrible. We were supposed to get new ones last year. So we all agree to get new chairs then. - Good? - Good. Yeah, he said good. I'm good. Listen, we are a paper company. How can we take pride in our jobs if we have to put our fine paper in this wretched machine? This is not the time for one of your principled stands. Pam, you make more copies than anyone. Exactly. That should tell you how terrible the chairs are. Okay, good suggestions. All good suggestions. Let's just decide and agree upon one. I'm with Pam. Chairs. All right, so teams forming. We should really have the office's air quality tested. We have radon from below. We have asbestos in the ceilings. These are silent killers. You are the silent killer. Go back to the annex. You'll see. I've talked to Meredith, Stanley and Jim about the chairs. I know they're with me on this. Actually, I'm gonna go with copier. What? Ever since Pam and I started dating, I just feel a little weird asking her to make copies for me. So I make my own copies. And that copier sucks. Let me tell you, I But you know what? Pam and I don't have to agree on everything. Good for you standing up to Pam like that. The balls on you, man. - So Michael, what do you think? - Why me? You have to make the decision. I swallowed all your ideas. I'm going to digest them and see what comes out the other end. I'm a little concerned about some of these directions to Schrute farms. Yeah, do tell. I mean, like, "156 paces "from the light red mailbox, make a left. "Walk until you hear the bee hive." How could it be more clear? I think Andy makes an excellent point. But my biggest concern is that there's only one bathroom. We'll dig a trench. As long as it's downhill from the well, we should be fine. Nana Mimi cannot squat over some trench. We're gonna put out stumps. Come on. Let's three-way this little issue and come to a solution by the time we get to Schrute farms. How's that for a plan? We're getting married at Schrute farms, no matter what. I have looked at 12 venues. I have lost 8 deposits. And I have seen Angela naked zero times. I am not losing another deposit. I've been thinking about this whole chair/copier thing. I really think you should reconsider. Pam, I really - hate that copier. - Yeah, I know. But I really think you should reconsider. Beesly, are you threatening me? I'm not threatening you. I love you. But you should know you're on very dangerous ground. This is where you'll have your receiving line. Of course we'll clear out all the livestock and hay and such. - What's that smell? - You're gonna need to be more specific. Manure. Get rid of it. Manure covers up the smell of the slaughter house. Do you have to slaughter on our wedding day? - You want to eat, don't you? - Honey, say something. If we pay extra could you slaughter the entrees the day before? I'll consider it. See? That's how you do it! Making progress here. Darn! There's a hose out back. You were gonna get a new chair and you were gonna give your old chair to me. Remember? That never happened. I don't know. I haven't decided yet. I'm gonna grab some lunch. Wanna come? Really? Absolutely! That would be amazing. You guys going to lunch? Mind if I join? Best lunch ever! - Let's do it. - All right! - Where we going? - I have no idea. So I guess that's how they're gonna play this. It is on. It is so on. Look, I really need this new chair. I mean seriously. How is it possible that in five years, I've had two engagement rings and only one chair? Michael, that is hilarious. - Is somebody making fun of me? - The best! Great food. Great friends. Thank you, Michael. I got you some tiramisu. So no hard feelings. That's cool. Good stuff. - You look really pretty. - Thank you. - You got a second? - I do. Good. - That must've been so fun. - It was fun. We had a good time. Have I told you you look really nice today? Yeah, is that a new tie? No, I got it at TJ Maxx, $4. That is amazing. You think that's good. Check out these pants. - $9. - What? $9. The boys department. Look at the ass. Check out the ass. - No way! - Look at that. I guess Oscar and Jim were talking your ear off about the new copier. They were. Here's what I was thinking. Everyone sits on a chair every day. But not everyone Sits on a copier. Or even uses the copier every day. - Yeah, right? - Very valid. - That's it. - OK! See you later. Hot tie guy. Have you made a decision on the butter sculpture? I haven't thought of it. Cow, goat or sheep. It's not that hard. I would like a cat. Cats don't make butter. I would like a cow butter sculpture of a cat. It doesn't make any sense. I'm telling - I want a butter sculpture of a cat. - Cow, goat or sheep. What is this? All right. We're all on the same team. Is it Damn, why is that in the kitchen? You might want to consider changing teams because we would We would love to have you. No, copier's great. - I have my copies. - There they are. - And I have my original. - You got it. So suck it. Michael, I got you a hot chocolate. - I hope that's okay. - Oh, thank you, my dear. Wait, Michael. Let me open the door for you. Chivalry is not dead after all. - There he is! - There he is! Good to see you. There's that ass. Don't take it away! I almost choked. Here's another place. It's beautiful. So Why don't we try this out? We'll see what would happen. Give it a little test drive. What do you say? You pretend to be Angela's father. You will play Angela, and I'll pretend to be you. That way you can see what it looks like when you're up here. Hello, I'm Angela Martin. - And I work with Dwight. - I'm Andy. He doesn't understand a word you're saying. Although born just minutes from here, he speaks only german. Closed society. So now after the readings by all of your sisters, we will arrive at the vows. So Conrad And away we go. This is a little taste of the ceremony, if you will. He's explaining why we're here, what we're doing here. Making introductions. Then he's gonna have Andy repeat a bunch of stuff. He's gonna ask Andy to produce a ring. I have now just just some twine for our purposes. You will put the ring on her finger. And then he's going to ask Andy, if he would like to marry Angela. And you will reply "I do." And he's gonna ask Angela if she would like to marry Andy, To which you will reply - I do. - And there we go. That's just about it. Man and wife. - Got a call about a problem up here. - Did somebody call Hank? Thank God you're here. The office is at a crossroads. So there's no security problem? You know I hustled up the stairs. I need your sage advice. And everyone, whatever Hank decides, that is the decision. That will resolve this issue. Yeah, take as many as you want. You know, it's nice and warm up here. So what are we talking about? Well, we have a surplus. Imagine that your parents give you money for a lemonade stand I know what a surplus is. Okay, good. Well, here's the thing. Some people want to use the surplus to buy a new copier. Other people are complaining about the chairs. - Is that the copier? - It is, yes. - What? - Just thinking. Let me see a chair. - You can try mine. - There we go. Not much lumbar support. Everyone, bear in mind once again that whatever Hank says goes. He is an impartial third party. On the one hand, this copier is very old. You should see some of the new copiers. You would not believe what they do. So the copier. Let me finish. Now the chairs. The chairs are very weak. Very weak chairs. I could not sit all day in this chair. Well, what should I do? - Let me see the copier again. - All right, get out. I thought I knew what I wanted. And then being here with you and the german mennonite minister, it just all felt right. I made a mistake picking Andy. I know you did. And that's why I have taken care of everything. - What do you mean? - Well, monkey He's a real minister. And you said, "I do." And I said, "I do." And Andy wasn't signing a receipt. He was signing our marriage certificate as a witness. That doesn't count! - Of course it does. - No, it doesn't! It does in the state of Pennsylvania. Mrs. Schrute. We are not married. Take this thing. It's not my fault you don't understand german. I've been telling you to take if for years! Are we We leaving or what? I'm sorry. I'm sorry, I'm eating tiramisu. Some of the chocolate powder just went down my throat. - I'm stopping now. - Is this why you're calling me? I'm calling I'm sorry. I'm calling because We have a stupid budget surplus and people Everybody wants something different. You want me to weigh in on a minor budget issue? I want you to make the decision so I'm not the bad guy. If I were you I'd just return the surplus and take the bonus. The what now? Branch managers who come in under budget get 15% of the savings. Like a tip? $645? I hate disappointing just one person. And I really hate disappointing everyone. But I love Burlington Coat Factory. You go in there with $645, you are literally a king. We got that going on Tuesday. Sure. No, I can I'll double check that for you. All right, attention everyone. Let me call you right back. I have made my decision. We do not need a new copier. We do not need new chairs. This copier is working perfectly. That's the original. Pam, would you stand up for a sec? See how relaxed I am? I like this chair. Offers good support. It is erkel-nomically correct. It's a good chair. I think we're spoiled because we don't appreciate the things that we have. You think kids in Africa have chairs? They sit in big piles of garbage. Do you think they have copiers? They don't have copiers. They don't even They don't even have paper. And we are spoiled because we throw out perfectly good tiramisu because it has a little tiny hair on it. My point is this. I have seen the light in terms of what we need and it is nothing. - Do you know? - Do I know what? I think you know. - Know what? - Yeah, know what? Does anyone happen to know what 15% of 4,300 is? $645. Michael's a genius. - Why did you say dollars? - Because that is how my mind works. What's 15% of 200? Everyone, Michael is returning the surplus so he can keep 15% as a bonus. - Wait, what? - You can do that? Michael, what's 394 times 5,912? Let's see. You're gonna give yourself a bonus of $645 instead of getting the office something it really needs. I don't need $645. I already have $645, more or less. - You're gonna get us a copier then? - Or chairs. This is so, so stupid. And, God That's my phone. - I didn't hear a phone ringing. - To be continued. No, I don't This doesn't change anything. I have a very important decision to make. We need a new copier. We need new chairs. And I need to figure out a way to keep this money without having everybody hate me. Hey, Tuna, check it out. Tuna sandwich. Just like you. Now I have to take care of a legal issue. Was that hot or what? So what's it gonna be? You have to make a decision. The day is almost done. You've been promising me this chair since the day you hired me. You are a smart guy. You'll do the right thing. - You think it's easy? - It's your job. You know what? Why don't you guys deal with it? I am going to get up and I'm gonna be out in the common area. But you need to decide. Otherwise, I'm taking the bonus. All right? It is a classic management tactic. You have two sides, a deadline. You know that neither of them are gonna concede. What you do is you put them in the room and you just - We're going with the chairs. - What? I figured I'd rather have new chairs than nothing at all. Good work. I'm proud of you. Mother What did we learn this week? Well, one, thanks to me, my team is much, much faster at coming to decisions than I thought they would be. Number two, never buy a fur coat with a credit card until you absolutely have the money to pay for it. And three, you should know that some people think it's cool to throw buckets of fake blood on you as you are walking out of Burlington Coat Factory. Truce. Yeah, I guess. Since I won. You did win. You did win. Anyway, I'm gonna need three copies of each of these stapled and collated. Totally kidding. I'm gonna need four. What is this? Happy holidays, Dwight. But do not open it till Christmas. You are so pathetic. How long did this take you? 3 hours? Five minutes, actually. I am a black belt in gift wrapping. No such thing. They don't give out black belts for things that are stupid. I hope it was worth it, 'cause I'm gonna take it apart in about five minutes. I think it'll take you a little bit longer than that. If I can skin a mule deer in less than ten minutes, I ought to be able to cut my Jarick &amp; Collioure Episode: 5x10 "Moroccan Christmas" I'm sorry, it's the largest one I have. I will not be the big guy in the tiny hat. This is the first Christmas party I'm throwing as head of the party planning committee. The theme is "Night in Morocco." This isn't your grandmother's Christmas party. Unless, of course, she's from Morocco, in which case it's very accurate. Do I need this invite to get into the party? - Yes. - Awesome. I think this is going to be the best Christmas party ever. You're going to move this for the party? It's not on theme. It's the Nativity scene. All right You can keep your camel, sheep, elephant. And the North African king can stay. Everything else goes in the drawer. I am not gonna judge Phyllis for desecrating Christmas. There is one person who will, though. And she just stuffed him into a drawer. - I need you to get rid of the tree. - But I don't think it's blackmail. Angela just does what I ask her to do so I won't tell everyone that she's cheating on Andy with Dwight. I think for it to be blackmail, it would have to be a formal letter. You brought the new doll collection. These are not dolls, Jim. These are commodities, the same as gold or oil. Every year I do research to determine which toy will be the most popular of the Christmas season. This year it's a doll. Half girl, half unicorn. Catch phrase: "My horn can pierce the sky." Pathetic. I bought out every store in the area over the last couple of weeks. And as lazy parents become more desperate, I will sell them at an enormous profit. Isn't that right, princess? - That's the Christmas spirit. - I am punishing those parents that would wait till the last minute to give their child a gift. And such a genetically improbable one. Look at that. How does that happen? The king had sex with a unicorn? A man with a horn had sex with a royal horse? Is that Princess Unicorn? I thought they were all sold out. - They are now. - Cool. My horn can pierce the sky This is equal parts scotch, absinthe, rum, gin, vermouth, triple sec, and two packs of splenda. I call it a "One of Everything." - Hit me again! - One more time around the block. I will grant you one wish. I wish you would stop rubbing that lamp in that creepy way. Stupid. Everybody knows to ask for 100 more wishes. Dumb. Ange, check it out. There's a place in France where the naked ladies dance Really, Andy? It's Christmas And you're singing about nudity and France. There's a hole in the wall where the men can see it all Jim, check that out. What is it? That is vodka, and I mixed it with orange juice. I call it an "Orange Vod-juice-ka." That is delicious. I can't believe no one's thought of it. Belly dancing. All right. Thank you so much. My daughter is gonna love this. So glad I could help. Merry Christmas. So this is what every day would be like if you hadn't left India. Burnin'. We got a live one! On fire! I'm all right. Sorry. We're back on the 5th. Should we do it then? We cannot do it then. Monthly dental appointment. Soft teeth. What about February 2nd? Would you want to do it on Groundhog Day? - No, I celebrate privately. - That's right. Why don't we just do it now? We'll do it quickly. - It's our Christmas party. - What if we can't do it quickly? What if we can't do it quickly? What if we can't do it? Do you know how to do an intervention? Hey, shut up. Everybody gather up. An intervention, it's sort of hard to describe. But really it's It's a coming together It's a surprise party for people who are who have addictions. And you get in their face and you scream at them, and you make them feel really badly about themselves. And then they stop. We're gonna be here for a while, so why don't you make a plate of hummus for everyone? Little triangles of pita toasted on both sides, fanned, so you can easily grab them. - I don't - And napkins. Fanned. - How do you feel? - A little better. I threw up. T.M.I. Fire girl! Too soon. You know what I thought we should do is have a quick intervention, and then get back to the party. We're only allowed to talk about Meredith's work performance. - We cannot ask her to stop drinking. - I am not asking her to stop drinking. I am imploring her to quit being an alcoholic. I'm not an alcoholic. Obviously you are. Everybody who thinks that Meredith is an alcoholic, please raise your hands. - Aye. - The ayes have it. I don't care what everyone thinks. I know I am not an alcoholic. Let's look at this a little bit closer then. Shall we? When I was in college, I used to get wicked hammered. My nickname was "Puke." I would chug a fifth of so-co, sneak into a frat party Polish off a few people's empties Some brewskis, some jell-o shots. Do some body shots off myself. Pass out, wake up the next morning, boot, rally, more so-co, head to class. Probably gotten expelled if I'd let it affect my grades, but I aced all my courses. They called me "Ace." It was totally awesome. I got straight "B"s. They called me "Buzz." Have you ever used alcohol to alter your mood or deliberately change your state of mind? Sure. Do you sometimes have a drink to celebrate a special occasion - or mark a holiday? - Obviously. Have you ever, under the influence of alcohol, questioned the teachings of the Mormon Church? - Where did you get this? - On a web site. That's not important. We should contact some experts. You don't know what you're doing. One of my employees is undergoing a crisis. And I wish for just once you would take my side on this. I'm doing your job. - Are you texting? - Yeah, 'cause this is kind of a drag. Alcohol is a drag. Yes. I'd like to go around the room and have us each express to Meredith how her alcoholism has affected us. I'll begin. This Christmas party is perhaps the best Christmas party I have ever been to. But then you got so drunk that we had to stop and do this. That's how your drinking affected me. Anybody else? Another time when Meredith's drinking affected you? Come on. If we don't say anything, she's not gonna get any better. There was that one time you bought movie tickets, and then you got too drunk to go, so you gave them to me. And that was really cool. That's You didn't You weren't hurt by that. You said affected by it. - Thanks again. - You're welcome. That's not what we're going for. Who has a problem with Meredith's drinking? It has to bother you. It bothers me, right? How does it bother you? Don't you have anything? No. I like Meredith. Actually, I don't care for Meredith. I don't believe in this kind of thing. In the Schrute family, we believe in a five-fingered intervention. Awareness, education, control, acceptance and punching. Who's gonna tell us the latest dirty joke? Who is gonna tell us what you watched on television last night? I am fine. Was John Belushi fine? Was Bob Hope fine? Come here. If anything ever happened to you, I would be very angry at myself for not doing all that I could do. I know I drink. I like to party. I want you to say "I'm an alcoholic." I'm not an alcoholic! You can say it as loudly as you want, but we're not going to believe you. I was waiting until later to hand out this year's gifts from corporate. I don't think they're appropriate anymore. Please stop making me do these things. Sorry, it's your job. But it's the season of mercy. You never showed me mercy when you were in charge. - Why aren't you wearing the hair net? - I lost it. Fine. Nice. I don't mind telling you that I have an addiction. I do to porn. That is the image, I think we all can agree, is very disgusting. You know what, Meredith, you lit your hair on fire today. What about tomorrow? What is going to happen when you come in to work and you're dead? I'll stab her in the brain with a wooden stick. There are several ways to kill a zombie. But the most satisfying one is to stab it in the brain with a wooden stick. Everyone in this room loves you. But mark my words, we are not going to support your alcoholism anymore. The next time you light yourself on fire, we are not going to help put you out. As fire marshal, I would have to. She is a hazard to the other people of the office. I suppose I could do it if it was a controlled burn - in a well-ventilated area. - But you need a permit for that. Right, that'll take a couple of weeks. - I can get you one in an hour. - Really? This is over. I agree. I think you did the best you could, but this is bigger than all of us. Enabler. It's Christmas and we are turning our back on somebody who's asking for help. You know what the only thing I want for Christmas? I want Meredith to get better. That's my only wish. But my wishes never come true so I'm not going to wish that on her. A watch would be nice. They've been in there for 45 min. I know. If she wasn't an alcoholic before, she is now. That's a Halwa Shebakia cookie. They serve it during Ramadan. It's great. - What's up? - You take requests? - Sure. - Please stop. 'Cause we're having a Christmas party. I'll be down in a minute. Could you write down the number of that rehabilitation center that you mentioned? Sure. - We just missed Poor Richard's. - We did? I thought we were going out for a drink. We'll have to go someplace else then, I guess. The Bog? - Cooper's, Kelly's - We could go there, sure. Brixx's, Carmen's - The Fort, Andy Gavin's? - I have a new place. It must have just opened up. Recently. Enough of this Christmas crap. Let's get some party music. There you go. That's good. - That's better. - Party girls. Hey, Sasha, it's daddy. Have you ever heard of this doll, Princess Unicorn? No, I'm just curious if you heard of it. This is great. My ex-wife's gonna be so pissed. For once, daddy's gonna be a hero. I'd like to buy one of your dolls. That's my last one. I was gonna buy that doll. I was gonna get the doll. - Not my problem. - But I I promised my daughter. Darryl, look I need the doll. I need the doll. I'm begging you. I need it more than anything in the world. I need this doll. Darryl, I need this doll. Don't cry. It's cool. I'll let you get it for 400. I only have 200. You can owe me. I know, right? Merry Christmas. She's gonna Something wrong with the doll? It's even It's even better than the one I wanted. Sunrise Rehab? I told you no! There is no way! No way! It's all right. We're doing this for your own good. Come on. - This is gonna be good. - No way. I told you. We talked about this. There is absolutely no way! - I am not going in there! - Yes, you are. Wait a minute, wait a minute! - Just wait. Just wait. - Calm down. Come on. There is no way! Here's the door. Let's start meeting. This man is crazy. - Can I help you? - I have a deposit. Alcoholic. So do I sign? I need you to put the Christmas tree back up. It's outside. I didn't ask you where it was. I told you where it needs to be. Shut up. Excuse me? I'm not moving the tree. Face it, the only power you have over me is this little secret that I know you're not gonna tell. You wanna know how I know that? Because then you won't be able to plan your stupid, tacky parties anymore. So you move the tree. Angela's having sex with Dwight. I caught them doing it after Toby's going away party. Don't look so surprised. - I knew it. - You did not. - I knew some of it. - Everyone knew some of it. It's Christmas. You knew it. - I knew it. - She knew it. As it turns out, you can't just check someone into rehab against their will. They have to do it voluntarily. And they have to hit rock bottom. So I think I know what I need to do at this point. I need to find ways to push Meredith to the bottom. I think I can do it. I did it with Jan. All right, everybody's still here. Perfect. Got a little surprise I've been working on. Angela, my bride, I just wanted you to know that for the rest of our lives, no matter the cultural milieu, I will always be there to bring you some Christmas cheer. Deck the halls with boughs of holly Tis the season to be jolly Don we now our gay apparel Troll the little old Yuletide carol I think I'd like to go home now. Sure. Tough room. Come on, I just learned it. Just so you know, protocol is a little round of applause. But Merry Christmas to all, and to all a good night!   Dunder Mifflin. This is Pam. I'm sorry. He's not in yet. Would you like his voicemail? Eat that, Carl Lewis! Angela made several 911 calls about cars going too fast in front of the building, so the police put up a radar gun. It's actually caused a bit of a traffic hazard. Wow, 13! No, there was wind. - I was just jogging. - There was wind. - I want a do-over. - It's not your turn. Oscar, go ahead. I want another try. Here we go! - There was a car. - I was ahead of the car. - 31 is my new number. - 31 is humanly impossible. Go, Oscar. - That's impossible. - Beat it. Jarick &amp; Collioure Episode 5x11 "The Duel" Today's a big day. My presence has been requested by Chief Financial Officer David Wallace. He says that he wants to talk about big picture stuff. And I'll be honest, I have little or no idea what that means, so Probably bad. Quick announcement. New year, new candy. Be careful, Kevin. They're kind of spicy. Hot tamales. So maybe just try one at first, and then if it's okay, have a couple more. Excuse me, everyone. Can I have the floor please? This is insanely awkward. It's kind of a elephant in the room, so I'll just No one has rsvp'd to our wedding yet, and the deadline was yesterday. Wait, you still don't know - Nothing. - You still don't - What are you doing? - How about we just I just have to talk to you for a second. No, no one has rsvp'd, and I don't understand it. Now you're shutting me out. You're not even listening. That's really considerate. Thank you. No, what I'm saying Andy still doesn't know that Angela's having an affair with Dwight. It's been 17 days. Eventually he'll figure it out. When their kids have giant heads and beet-stained teeth. But right now it's just awkward. How can he still not know? - We can't figure that out. - I can't take it anymore. - You can't take what? - I am telling Andy. No, you can't. It shouldn't come from you. - Who should it come from then? - Angela. Are you still having intercourse with her? What is wrong with you? She is engaged. Did you ever have intercourse in this office? Are you serious? Where? Where? Where, Dwight? Seems like you already know where. Kevin, you screwed this form up again. The amount owed goes at the top. I'm sorry. I didn't realize I was doing something wrong. If I had, I would've admitted it - and stopped right away. - That's enough. Because I wouldn't want an innocent person who doesn't know anything about the form What? That was good. It's just at the end, you weren't saying something that could apply to the form. How about "I'm sorry I did such a whorish job filling out this form." There you go. That cannot be true! You're going to charge me a fee to cut my own cake? No, what I'm saying is I want to cut it myself. Trade seats with me. I've got a better angle on Pam. I can see everything. Please stop. I need a soup spoon. Rule 17. Don't turn your back on bears, men you have wronged, or the dominant turkey during mating season. There are 40 rules all Schrute boys must learn before the age of five. Learn your rules You better learn your rules If you don't You'll be eaten in your sleep - What is it? - You've got to tell Andy about us. That is a terrible idea. One of your worst. Then we don't have to hide anymore. - You're expanding on your worst idea. - Do you love me or not? I've already admitted that I do. Why do you keep making me repeat it? Because you're engaged to Andy. Well? Not yet. When? When what? When what? You know this can't go on. - What can't go on? - We have to put an end to this. - Seems like - Come on.  you guys should be hearing what I'm saying. This is really not how this is supposed to happen. Angela said she was gonna tell him. She's just not ready. - When will she be? - I don't know. Is she crazy in bed? - Stop. What? Listen. - How so, specifically? - This shouldn't happen at work. - Eager and flexible. This shouldn't be coming from his boss. We should also consider the fact - that man has an anger issue. - Too late. - You haven't done anything. - I am already walking. Michael, once this gets out - I don't know how it's gonna go down. - What does that mean? Might get ugly. This has to get out so we can all deal with it. But you're leaving. Have a good trip. Walk with me. Will do, boss man. I do not have much time car's all the way over there, to tell you what I have to tell you. And just bear in mind that when I say say these things that are bad things that you hear in your ears this is something that I if I were you, that I wouldn't want to hear. You're not making any sense. No, I'm not. I'm not very articulate today, so I'll just leave it for another time. - Another day. - All righty. Which shall be fine. I'm off. Have a good meeting. Kick Wallace's ass. Okay, I will. Dwight and Angela are having an affair, so. I can't hear you through the glass. Dwight and Angela are having an affair. They've been sleeping together for some time. That was the news. I wanted to let you know. - What? - All right. See you later. Are you serious? I knew something bad was gonna happen today. - You said that yesterday. - My neighbor got murdered. - What are you standing for? - If I'm sitting, I can't disable his neck or his groin. You're not gonna do anything. If I'm sitting, I don't have the option to. I'm in charge when Michael's gone, and I need you to sit I need to talk to you. We can talk right here. I need to talk to you in private. - We're not listening. - Let's go to the conference room. Is it true? - What have you heard? - That you're sleeping with Dwight. - That doesn't sound like me. - Is it true? I'm engaged to you. I mean, we just signed off on our wedding flowers. Would I have said yes to chrysanthemums if I didn't want to get married? And all that stuff with our wedding cake Just answer the question. Are you sleeping with Dwight? A little bit. - How long has it been going on? - I don't know. I mean, we were together, and then he killed Sprinkles. And then we stopped, and I don't know exactly when we started up again. - Who else knows about it? - Michael. Who else? Let me think about it. Come on! So listen, Michael. Your branch has been doing great lately, and your sales staff is reporting very strong numbers. Outperforming last year, in fact. And I don't know exactly how to put this But what are you doing right? Right? Utica, Albany All the other branches are struggling. But your branch is reporting strong numbers. You're not our most traditional guy, but clearly something you are doing is right and I need to get a sense of what that is. David, here it is. My philosophy is basically this. And this is something that I live by. And I always have, and I always will. Don't ever for any reason do anything to anyone for any reason, ever, no matter what. No matter where or who, or who you are with or where you are going, or or where you've been Ever For any reason whatsoever. Sometimes I'll start a sentence, and I don't even know where it's going. I just hope I find it along the way. Like an improv conversation. An improversation. This is gonna sound sort of high maintenance, but could we have it, like, three degrees cooler in here? I always think better when it's cooler. Here's the thing. Michael is doing something right. And in this economic climate, no method of success can be ignored. It's not really a time for executives to start getting judgmental now. It's Hail Mary time. What say we order up some pasta? What say we do. Standard, you know? Nothing fancy. - So, like, missionary? - I said nothing fancy. Do you love him? I love you. Why should I believe that? We are at a crossroads here. We can give in to what people're saying, that we're not good together Who says that? Or we can prove them wrong. Let's prove them wrong. Where's Dwight? You okay, man? Not at all, actually. But thanks for asking. Appreciate it. I'd also like to take this opportunity to thank all of you for lying to my face. And not telling me what's been going on this entire time. You are welcome. It's over. - Good. She broke up with you. - No. It's over between you two. No way. I am not giving up. - You have to. - No, I don't. She doesn't love you. She's marrying me. I don't know about that because she certainly seems to enjoy to enjoy making lovemaking with me. Angela Bernard. Will never be her name. It will be her name, and you will have to call her that. I don't think so. Guys, why don't we just cool off a bit? - I'm telling you to back down. - I will never back down. - Then I'll make you. - How are you gonna do that? Through the use of force. That is very general and does not scare me in the slightest. I will fight you. Okay, fine! Good! A duel. The winner gets Angela. - Fine! - This is nuts. What is your weapon? - That's enough because - This is none of your business. It is my business when it happens at work. Guess what, not happening at work. - We're gonna do it outside. - Outside of work. None of your business then. - Good. So what weapon? - My bare hands. That is stupid. I will use a sword, and I will cut off your bare hands. Then I'll get something too. I've had two men fight over me before. Usually it's over which one gets to hold the camcorder. Angela, you have to put a stop to this right now. I will respect the results of the duel. - Of course you will. - I call loser. I will be taking my break at 4:00 in the parking lot. I will also be taking my break at the exact same time and in the same location. What a coincidence. So I either get more involved or I take a sick day Leaving Dwight in charge. How'd that get there? There's a star-shaped thing taped under the kitchen table. So I was in the office, and I look over to our accounting division, and there is Kevin Malone. Kevin is wearing a jacket that I've never seen before. And I call over to Kevin, "Kevin? "Is that a tweed jacket?" And he looks at me and he says, "Michael, yes, it is a tweed jacket." And I look back at him and I say, "I feel the need "The need for tweed." It's hard to try and evaluate yourself, but I appreciate you trying. And thanks for coming in. Have to say, I am so impressed with the potential you see in me. Finish up. Come on! Where are you? Let's do this thing! Come on! Come on out! I can't believe they're gonna fight over me. I guess people have fewer choices as they get older. Come on! Has anything happened yet? It's 4:10. I don't think he's gonna show. Come on, man. Believe in something. Come on, coward! Where are you? Where "From the desk of Andrew Bernard." A note. Pathetic. "Dear Dwight, by now you have received my note. "How are you? I am well. "You are no doubt wondering why I have left this note. "It's come to my attention that in any physical match with you, I would surely be bested." True. "The soft underbelly of my refined upbringing "is my soft underbelly." There's andy. He's in his car. - You guys, what is he doing? - Why isn't Dwight turning around? The Prius is silent if he keeps it under five miles per hour. - He deserves the win. - "At last, after much consideration" - My God! - What's happening? Andy's running over Dwight with his car. What are you Come on! - You give up? - Never! Get out and face me like a man! I'm a man. I'm a bigger man than you'll ever be! I would never sleep with another man's fiancee! You're not a man! You don't know how to take care of her! All you do is dress fancy and sing! What does that mean? You can't even protect her! Protect her from what? Bears, you idiot? When's the last time you saw a damn bear in Scranton? Last year, idiot! Are your legs broken? My right one's falling asleep a little bit. - Andy, are you all right? - Go away, Tuna! I'm winning this. Back off. This isn't your fight. How much is this gonna cost? What? Trust fund'll take care of that. What did you say? I couldn't hear you. I said What? You stupid idiot! You're like a sasquatch. You live in the woods. Sasquatches are the strongest animal on the planet! So fine, call me a sasquatch. How could she be sleeping with you this whole time and only sleep with me twice? - What? - What? - She's sleeping with you? - I'm her fiance. She said she was only sleeping with me. Yes, hi. My last name is Bernard, and I would like to cancel a wedding cake that I had ordered. B-E-R N-A-R-D. The one shaped like a sailboat. That's the one. Thank you. What a day! I thought I was gonna get chewed out. But hold on! Here's an attaboy for you. What? Roller-coaster ride. Roller-coaster. Just goes to show, you leave Scranton, exciting things can happen. What's this? Looks like a red wire. That wasn't here before. It's a computer, Dwight. I mean, computers have wires. Yours doesn't. Doesn't it? It's going in a different direction than the other wires. I'm really busy. I can't talk about this anymore. - Just shut up, Phyllis. - Get outta here. What are you doing? I got 500 feet of red wire at a flea market up by Dunmore High School. Crazy. What a deal. He'll be fine. I made it up there. Proofreading: So. &amp; Valpi Episode 5x12 "Prince Family Paper" What you talking about, Wallace? Hi, Michael. How are you? - I'm well. How are you? - Very good. So, listen, we haven't yet filled the regional supervisor job. Have you not? Correct, and I was wondering if I could get you to do the fieldwork that would normally go to the supervisor. OK, there's an area from Carbondale to Marshbrook where we've never done any business. There's a small company there, Prince Paper. I can't get a report on it because it's not a public company. But we've been talking about going after their market. So I was hoping you could do some fact-finding for me. I'll fax over some of the things we're looking for. Fax? Why don't you just send it over on a dinosaur? This is important, Michael. Then e-mail it, David. - You've got no taste, Stanley Hudson. - I do. - What are you talking about? - Some actress. Whether she's hot. - Who's the gal in question? - Hilary Swank. - Not at all. - She's got mean eyes. - Have you seen her with her bangs? - She looks like a monster. She is a beautiful movie star. So, maybe we should just go to work. - She is an amazing actress. - But that's not the question. - She's not hot. - Thank you, Phyllis. Why don't we just put this to a vote? Then we'll be done with it. - I'm not voting. - No one cares. Who thinks that Hilary Swank is hot, raise your hand. And who thinks that Hilary Swank is not hot, raise your hands. Five. Five to five. - Thank you, accounting department. - So what do we do now? What if the owner of Prince Family Paper has a beautiful daughter and we have to seduce her to get their secrets? - I will seduce her. - No, I wanna seduce her. - Let me seduce her. Michael, please - No I got it. - You'll fall in love with her. - Yeah. So what if I did? That would take precedence, and I would expect your support. Let's go over the plan again. I'm a local business owner. I need to buy paper. I find out everything about their prices and policies. - Your fictious name? - Michael Scarn. I am a paper salesman looking for a new job. I find out everything about their expenses and salaries. Then we meet at Denny's, and we compare notes. No, I never said Denny's. Ihop. No, I said Denny's. You know how I feel about Ihop. - Don't start. - Are you a socialist? I don't want to get into this debate again. - I enjoy Ihop. - I'll have a cup of coffee. You will have pancakes, and you'll like it. - The store next to them is for lease. - So what? It means they're not expanding. Maybe they're shrinking. They could be shrinking. Because the sign is centered perfectly above their store. No sign of the sign being moved. It's lunchtime. But no sign of anyone coming in or out, which means they're not taking new customers out to lunch. They're not acquiring new business. So once again, no growth. And there are clouds. Clouds in the sky. That means it's gonna rain. Bad for business. It would if they were altocumulus, not cirrostratus. Why do you OK. - Whatever. Shut up. - Get your clouds right. You go in now, I'm gonna go in in exactly ten minutes. We have never met each other. We are complete strangers. We're gonna need a signal to bolt outta there in case there is danger. And that signal is Lick your lips. Try it. No, like this. Good. Ready to do this? All right. Here come the sharks. In nature, there's something called the food chain. It is where the shark eats the little shark, and the little shark eats the littler shark. And so on until you get down to the single-cell shark. So now, replace sharks with paper companies. And that is all you need to know about business. How can I help you? My name is Michael Scarn. I am a local business owner, and I would like to find out about your company. Please come in. - What kind of business are you in? - We're a law firm. I assume your primary paper needs are stationery, general office. I'll be honest with you about something. Where I used to live, our paper supplier had a lot of big clients, and I just didn't feel like a priority. So, I guess my question to you would be, how many clients do you have? - About 80. - Really? That many? This doesn't seem like a very big operation. It's just me, my wife and my son. So when When did you set up shop? I opened this place after I came back from Vietnam. Vietnam. I hear it's lovely. Each side will have three minutes to prepare opening arguments. Topic. - Hilary Swank is attractive. - Hot. The debate is whether she's hot. What difference? Attractive, hot We're talking about the same thing here. Huge difference. A painting can be beautiful, but I don't want to bang a painting. OK! T.M.I. So even specialty paper, say 94 brightness double-bonded, you would put that on the same truck as your conventional stock? You sure know a lot about paper for a lawyer. That is because I am a genius. Really? Well, about some things. And other things, I'm just I'm very stupid. Like watch this. Is this the cup? Is this the cup? Is this what I drink out of? Laughter is my job. Tears are my game. Law is my profession. I'd like to apply for a job. I'm afraid we're not hiring right now. Why don't you just get rid of this guy? That's my son. I'm your son now. You can visit him on holidays. Dwight Schrute. I'm a paper salesman at a second-tier paper company called Dunder Mifflin. I'm the top salesman there, and I'm looking for a new challenge. I would say you guys have what? - 40 high-volume clients? - Try 80. I've got 90 clients myself. Better look out. Someone might run you out of business. I sure hope not. Me too. I think all of us have a tendency to view celebrities as sort of mythical figures. We don't really see them as real, so therefore, we don't judge them as real people. Are you serious? Jim, just show us a picture. - Come on. - Shut up, Kevin. But he's making all these fancy - It's a gut thing. - That's fair. Kev, do me a favor. Why don't you close your eyes? Now imagine that Hilary Swank comes into this office for real. She walks over to you and she says, "Kevin Malone, "I just read your online profile "and there's nothing I'd rather do than make out with you right now." Now you tell me something Is she hot? Does that end the debate? Or What are you doing? It's "is she hot?", not "would you do her?" Respect the game. This close. So why are you considering leaving Dunder Mifflin? My boss. Do tell. His insensitivity could border on the cruel. This is a man who does not listen to the needs of his underlings. - He's way - How's the interview going? - Very well. - Don't blow it. Linda, can I get a picture of you? - You want a picture of me? - I would. Could you just stand right over here? That would be great. Just something to remember the trip by. Just a little to your left. There you go. Good. - Perfect. - Can I have a copy of that? Grandma, I can't do this. What's going on? Little homework over here? - Let's see if I can help. - Right there. Math. That's not so hard. There are four of these. Ignore the parenthesis, right? Why is this little two so small? It's weird. You just don't Just go by the "x." The "x" means "times." So that means four times x-two. What is double four? - Eight. - Right. Excellent. Way to go. Nice. Don't put that. Ladies and gentlemen, even though the penis was fake, I kept expecting a second plot twist where we found out that Hilary Swank actually was a boy. I wasn't going to dignify this discussion by getting involved, and I don't even get the discussion. Hot is a temperature, people. But Kevin deserves to lose for what he said. So, yes She's hot. She's hot as heck. She's a female Boris Becker. Nice. Thank you very much for all of your help. Going to be an incredibly hard decision. Wait. Let me get something for you here. Here's some some references. Our top clients. You call any of them, I trust you'll hear some good things. - All right, thank you. - You're welcome. Excuse me, sir. I took the bus here and was wondering if I could catch a ride home with you. Of course. Thank you very much. Thanks for your time. I cannot wait to contact your clients. I look forward to getting your calls. Bye now. So long. We struck the mother lode! - Come on! - Wallace is gonna freak! He is going to absolutely freak. Someone's looking out the window. Go. Peel out. Go! Shoot. - We You drove over the thing. - I know. - God, what was that? - That's not good. Come on. She's hot. OK? Because if you are saying that Hilary Swank isn't hot, then you're saying I'm not hot, because, obviously, I'm not as hot as Hilary Swank. Darn it. - Come on. - Man. - My car! - Are you all right? - Not good. - Is everyone OK? - It sounded bad. - We're fine. We're fine. You folks have done enough already. You've done more than you could possibly know. Dwight, just shut We're just gonna call a tow truck. A tow truck is gonna charge you - Let me take a look. - No, you know He drove over the divider and then backed over it. It caused I'll be right back. I'm just gonna grab my tool box. Ladies, are we prepared to let the Kevins of the world decide anything for us? Anything at all? We don't even give him full Internet access. Wait, what? See that? The obvious symmetry of the face. It's the natural appeal of the scientific standard of koinophilia, features that are a composite average of many features. Yes, she's attractive, but she is not hot. How much longer is this gonna take? Let me give you some money for this. No, I sit all day. It's nice working with my hands. Coffee. That's too much nice. You're welcome. Disgusting. What is this, instant? That ought to do it. It's all better. Gosh, well, so long. - That looks great. - Drive safe. Look forward to hearing from you about that job application. Good-bye, Prince Family. Should be called the Sucker Family. "Here you go, shark. "Let me fix your fin for you and sharpen your teeth, "while I'm at it." Suckers. I'm just saying All I'm saying is Kevin's not necessarily a feminist. What will happen to that family if I call Wallace and give him this information? It's simple. Wallace would use that information to destroy them. Our sales are fine. We're doing fine. They're doing fine. - Could be better. - Why don't we live and let live? - Live and let live. - I'm not familiar with that. It's a James Bond It doesn't make any sense. Of course, I'm alive. - I'm not going to make this call. - Michael, you have to. Have you ever seen a lioness devour her cub? Have you ever seen a baboon devour its mate? Have you ever seen a racoon devour a squirrel? My heart says no. Your heart is a wonderful thing. But it makes some terrible decisions. That's true. - That's true. - Gosh. It has gone down the wrong path many, many times. Jan, Ryan Save your heart for love and use your brain for business. Right? If we don't do this to Prince Paper, then someone else will. Or worse yet someone else will do it to us. I am trying to be more optimistic in life. I've got, what? And my family history says I have less. Now the old Stanley Hudson would have found something to complain about with this actress. But that's no way to live life. Look at this healthy, sexy, pretty, strong young woman. Come on. She is hot. And it was a terrible war. So many died. Far too many died. But if Frodo hadn't destroyed the ring, then goodness itself might have died. You're right. You are right. I will call Wallace, and I will give him the customer list. And I will give him all of my info. You are doing the right thing. Good. So - Where are you going? - Just something I have to do first. - Where are you taking the client list? - Someplace safe where it can't hurt anyone. Michael, get back here! Don't do this! Shoot. Freeze. Stop. Give me the list! - I can't let you do this. - Those people will be ruined! It's business! It's not personal! Give it! Dwight, give it! We can't do this! Those people It's over, Michael. It's over. I'm not a shark. OK, time for the final vote. All those in favor of the resolution, "Hilary Swank is hot"? And all those opposed. - It's just ridiculous. - That's the thing. People just got entrenched in the view they had in the first place. I can tell when I was talking, you were not listening. This is great stuff, Michael. You are a titan of industry, pal. Good work. I'll be in touch. Thanks, buddy. Guess whose stock just went up, golden boy? I guess this is what they call a bittersweet moment. It is bitter because I slightly destroyed a wonderful little family. But sweet because David Wallace thought I did a good job. That's why I hate bittersweet chocolate. I don't even What's the point of that? Why not just sweet? I mean, who are you helping? - What is this? - Hilary Swank. She's hot. Damn it!   Last week i gave a fire safety talk. And nobody paid any attention. It's my own fault for using powerpoint. Powerpoint is boring. People learn in lots of different ways, But experience is the best teacher. Today, smoking is gonna save lives. Does anyone smell anything smoky? Did you bring your jerky in again? Oh, my god! Uh, oh, my god. Fire! Oh, fire! Oh, my goodness. What's the procedure? - what do we do, people? - the phones are dead. Oh, how did that happen? It's out in the hall. No, we don't know that. The smoke Could be coming through an air duct. Oh, my god! Okay, it's happening. Everybody stay calm. - what's the procedure, - everyone?What's the procedure? Stay *** calm! Wait, wait, wait! Everybody, now *** calm down! No! No, michael, no! Touch the handle. If it's hot, There could be a fire in the hallway. What does warm mean? ?? ??? - oh, what next? - don't run! ??? Here's a door.check that One out. How's the handle? I-it's warm. - ??? - well, uh, another option. Back to our options, jeez! Okay, Settle down, everyone. No bunching. Oh, i forgot my purse. Leave it, woman! - get out of the way. - go, go, go! Things can be replaced, fellas. People--human lives-- however, can-- Ah! My hand! That's hot! This one's hot, too! Okay, we're trapped. Everyone for himself! Okay. Let's go! - out of my way! - let's go! Get out of my way. Calm, please. Get out of the way! Have you ever seen a burn victim? - move it! - okay! Procedure, procedure. Exit options.where do we go, folks? Wha--use a what to cover theouth? A what? A rag. A damp rag, perhaps. ??Remember those procedures. What are the options? Okay, that's a wrong way. We've already tried that. Remember your exit points. - exit points, people. - oscar. - what's next? - oscar! Stay alive, i'm getting help! Pull me up! You're too heavy! I only weigh 82 pounds. Save bandit! How about 911? Anyone? 911. What do we do? Use the surge of fear and adrenaline To sharpen your decision-making. Okay, i am not dying here. Come on. What is that? What is that? The fire's shooting at us! What in the name of god is going on?! Yes! Yes, battering ram. Go, go, go, go, go! Help! I'm about to die! Attention, everyone! Employees of dunder mifflin. This has been a test of Our emergency preparedness. There was no fire. It Was only a simulation. What?! Fire not real. This was Merely a training exercise. So what have we learned? Oh, come on. - it's not real, stanley. - ??? - don't have a heart attack. - no, no, no. You will not die. Stanley! Stanley! You will not die. Stanley. Stanley. Barack is president! You are black, stanley! I'm gonna give him mouth-to-mouth. No, no, no. Don't give Him mouth-to-mouth for this. - no,?? Open your mouth. - michael.michael, michael. Come on, don't swallow it. - ?? - michael, michael. ??? Saving him! The office s05 ep13 How could you possibly Think this is a good idea? A lot of ideas were not Appreciated in their time. - electricity. - shampoo. You could have burned Down the whole building. I just want to say for the Record, i did not kill anyone. Stanley was attacked by his own heart. And he should be released from the hospital And back in the office in a couple days. Did you shout, "fire!", causing a panic? Yes, i shouted, "fire!" I shouted many things. I also shouted instructions on How to get out of the building, So you can imagine my Frustration as safety officer When nobody would heed of what--heeded-- - ???When no one "hedded"-- - ?? Take "hedded" of. N-no one would take "hedded" of my instructions. - heed. Heed. Take heed of. - so you-- - and, well, i don't see my coworkers-- - take heed of. Hee--heeding this right now. ?? Okay. This city Dwight. We are not mad, we are just disappointed. No, we are mad. Yes. We are.we are livid. But we are going to let this one slide. - no, we're not. - i am not a mind-reader, david. Look, this is a very serious offense. We have cause to fire you. Can you shove down? Instead Shove down, please. Instead, what i think we should do Is strip you of your title as safety officer. - no. - and we should take A part of his pay and donate it To the charity of your choice. Something that dwight doesn't like. Peta. Michael, you have to take Responsibility here. One of your employees had a heart attack. He could have died because of the Way you're allowing your office to run. Do you want that on your conscience? Do you? - michael. - you talking to me? Yeah. What? Well I guess we papered over that pretty nicely. It always amuses me when corporate Thinks they can make some big change With a 20-minute meeting In some fancy high-rise. What's the matter?You hungry? No, dwight, i am worried. A man's life is in my hands. Don't you worry about that. I got it covered. Okay? I am planning a bomb scare. That Should really get the blood pumping. That's not gonna happen. I'm tang over as safety man. What? You? - yes. - come on. - i'm a smart guy. I'll figure it out. - that's preposterous. - no, i will. - ??? Nobody should have to go to work thinking, "oh, this is the place That i might die today." That's what a hospital is for. An office is for not dying. An office is a place to Live life to the fullest, to the max, to An office is a place where dreams come true. Don't excite him. Don't make him excitable. Welcome back, stanley. Thank you, michael. It's true. Around this office, in the past, i Have been a little abrupt with people. Not maybe. Yes or no. No way. Uh-uh. Are you from another planet? Boy, have you lost your mind? 'Cause i'll help you find it. Did i stutter? I'm done. Good-bye. But the doctor said if i can't find a new Way to relate more positively to my surroundings, I'm going to die. Andy. A throne for your highness. I'm not sitting in a wheelchair. No, no, no. No debate. You are going to sit in that wheelchair Until you are back on your feet. ??? A, b, c--okay? And that stands for airway, Breathing, and circulation. Okay, you know what? That Could be a lile confusing Because in sales, a, b, c Means "always be closing." This is a farce.i should Be teaching this course. Shut it. Shut it. We found ourselves on the Less-prepared side of things When stanley had his When his heart went berserk. And i knew exactly what to do, But in a much moreeal sense, I had no idea what to do. So i thought we should Have a cpr training class. And course you can't get the practice dummy Unless the instructor comes along with it. Red cross, you know, racket. I can't keep doing this forever. It's been 20 seconds. Call it. Would you like to try next? Absolutely i would not. You know who i really think should go? Stanley. Oh, i don't know. That's not a good idea, Michael. He needs to rest. No rest for the sick. We are not always going to be there To coddle your heart back When it disappears to be working. What are you gonna do if you're by Yourself and your heart stops? I would die. And you're okay with that? I'm okay with the logic of it. Uh-uh. No, no, no. Come on. Get up. Let's do this. Yes, i had a heart attack. I would quit, but i'm too Old to find another job. And i don't have enough saved to retire. I feel like i'm working at my own casket. Come on, stanley. You're losing You. You're losing you. Do it! - michael. - this is you we're talking about. - michael. - okay, okay. I'll show them. Here we go. Stanley. All right. So assessing the situation, Are they breathing? No, rose. They are not breathing. And they have no arms or legs. No, that's not part of it. Where are they? You know what? If we come across Somebody with no arms or legs, Do we bother resuscitating them? I mean, what kind of quality Of life do we have there? I would want to live with no legs. How about no arms? No arms or legs is basically how You exist right now, kevin. You don't do anything. All right, well, let's get back To it.'cause you're losing him. Okay, too fast. Everyone we need to pump at a Pace of 100 beats per minute. Okay, that's, uh, hard to keep track. How many is that per hour? How's that gonna help you? I will divide and then count to it. Right. Okay.  Well, a good trick is to pump to The tune of staying alive by the bee gees. Do you know that song? Yes, yes, i do. I love that song. * first i was afraid i was petrified * No, it's-- * ah, ah, ah, ah * - * stayin' alive, stayin' alive * - okay, yes, i got it. You were in the parking lot Earlier. That's how i know you. * ah, ah, ah, ah * * stayin' alive, stayin' alive * * ah, ah, ah, ah * * stayin' alive, stayin' alive * * ah, ah, ah * * oh, you can tell * * by the way i use my walk * * i'm a woman's man, no time to talk * * music loud, women warm * * been kicked around since i was born * * oh, it's all right, it's okay * * you can look the other way * - * loo do do * - okay. - okay.okay. - * da da da da da da da * * stayin' alive, stayinalive * Yeah, okay, you didn't Maintain 100 beats per minute, And the ambulance  didn't Arrive because nobody called 911. So you lost him. Okay. He's dead. Anyone know what we do next? Anybody? Rose? I have no idea. - anyone else? - we bury him. Wrong. Check for an organ donor card. If he has one, we only Have minutes to harvest. He has no wallet. I checked. He is an organ donor. - he is? - yeah. Give me some ice and a styrofoam bucket. Here we go. - oh, my god! - dwight! Dwight! What are you-- What are you doing?! We search for the organs. Where's the heart? The precious heart. I'm not feeling well.i need to sit down. Stanley. - ??? - hey, stanley? Stanley. Are you okay? - oh, my god! - ?? - oh, my god. - dwight! - daddy? - dwight! - oh, my god. Can you tell me why you had to Cut the face off the dummy? I didn't think it was very Realistic in the movie, And it turns out, it's pretty realistic. We had to pay for it. Cost us $3,500. - $5,300 for a dummy? - wow. Okay, look. David, this is why we have training. We start with the dummy, And we learn from our mistakes. And now dwight knows not to cut The face off of a real person. Hope you brought your Appetitos, my lady, my tuna. A little movie popcorn. Uh, damn it. This movie, a lot of buzz. Not coming out for another six months. Mrs. Albert hannaday. So friendship with the nerd Dog has its privileges. We don't normally download films illegally. Because we're honest, hard-working people. And we don't know how. But andy does, so we have To watch it with him. Punishment fits the crime. And i want you  to meet my nana. Nana. This is sam. Hi. Nice to meet you, mrs. Hannaday. Please-- call me "lily." Let's play bridge. You can be my partner. All right Lily. What's going on? Uh, no one really knows, But pam's parents are going through a little Bit of a rough patch in their marriage. My dad spent the night at Our place last night. My parents have been Fighting for weeks and It kinda sucks. Jim's been great. But i'm gonna need to buy my dad a robe. He's not saying what he needs to say. Who? Jack black? Yeah. I mean, they just need to communicate, you know? If they said to each other what They're saying to everyone else, then-- Jim and pam Are, like, movie geniuses. They're catching things that Are totally going over my head. Hi, everyone. Corporate has given dwight two strikes. They are very, very upset with him. So as a disciplinary measure, He is going to have to Issue a formal apology. Dwight, have you prepared Your statement of regret? - i have. - let's hear it. "i state my regret." You couldn't have memorized that? I could not because i did not feel it. Okay, everyone.i am going to need You to sign this statement regret As an acknowledgement that you heard it. Okay? Everyone come on up Here.it's not a big deal. It is a big deal. You Almost killed stanley. Yeah, right. I filled him full of butter and sugar for Now, take a lesson from stanley and Jog on up here and sign this, okay? Make a line. Just form a line right here. Sign it! ?? Hi, dad. Yeah, jim has shaving cream. Check our bathroom. Lily? I'm in here. I, uh-- I'm sorry, i didn't, uh-- Realize you were in the bath. Do you want me to go? I want you to stay. Give me a break. I know it, man. You know, lily was supposed To be nicole kidman. Um, and it was gonna be Sophie's mom, not grandmother. But then nicole kidman dropped out So they went with cloris leachman With a small rewrite. ??Get that in there. - oh, yeah. - get that done already. I know, but if i get it deeper-- What is-- He was pretty talkative at breakfast. Wha--brea-- Breakfast? You mean when they were eating soup? I don't think that was breakfast. Unless soup--does soup symbolize breakfast? So he doesn't share with his daughter, But he shares with his daughter's fiance? Okay, you guys-- they're making out. - hey. - hey. Did my dad say anything about my mom? Mmm, nope. We mostly Just talked about cereal. What? I don't know. I mean, maybe he'll talk to You about some of this stuff 'Cause he can't really talk to me about it. - mmm. - you're good to talk to. I'm okay. I'm not great. And, um Everybody sit on the floor, Indian-style, like me. Ommy god, If you're wearing a dress, Please keep your knees together. Nobody wants to see that. Om. My goal is to make this office as peaceful A place for stanley hudson as i can. I think sounds have a lot to do with that. Here are some downloaded peaceful sounds. That one makes me think Of death. That's kind of nice. It is a beautiful, sunny day As we walk through the meadow. It is very spiritual and relaxing, And there are flowers, and It is sunny and beautiful. Now, up ahead, a castle in the distance. Don't open your eyes. What? Ohh. And you walk up toward the castle, And inside the castle are four men. And each of them-- none Of them have shoes. And they give you a funny cigarette, And you feel even more relaxed. And then you want ice cream. You want a big bowl of ice cream. So what kind of ice cream do you want? Yell it out. Chunky monkey. - too expensive. - chocolate. Racism is dead,stanley. You can have any kind Of ice cream you want. What do you want? What is that? People. Please,i told you to get Rid of the cell phones. It's my biofeedback machine. Oh,okay. What is that? Like a video game? It alerts me when my Stress level goes up So i can try to calm down. You have stress? Yes. During our relaxation exercise? Let me get you some water. No,no,i'll help you.  I'll help you up. - here we go. Here we go. - no,michael. - let me get you up. - would you step back?Please. - okay. All right. - please. - a little further. - okay. I think that thing is on the fritz. Oscar. Would you reach over And touch his thing? That's what he said. Right,guys? 'Cause of gay. Let's give this a shot. Hello-- Michael,i think you're what's Stressing everybody out. So it wasn't dwight after all. Looks like i am the killer. You never expect that you're the killer. It's a great twist. Great twist. Dunder mifflin,this is pam. Oh. Hey,mom. No. What did dad say? What did you say to mdad? What? After you talked,he called my mom And said he was gonna Look for an apartment. Oh,my god. Pam,i don't kno I--nothing. Truly,nothing. I mean,i--i just was honest With him and i-- I'm so sorry,i--i don't know. I'll call him again. So It was her parents or my parents. What could jim have said To make my dad want to leave my mom? And at what point in our marriage Is he gonna say it to me? I don't get it. Do i stress you out? Nothing stresses me out. Except having to seek the Approval of mynferiors. Speaking of which-- Remember when people used to say "boss" When they were describing Something that was really cool? Like "those shoulder pads Are really boss,man." "look at that perm. That perm is so boss." It's what made me want To become a boss. And i looked so good in A perm and shoulder pads. But now,boss is just slang Fo"jerk in charge." Okay,everybody. I figured it out. The reason that you are all So stressed around me Is that you are too Intimidated to tell me What you really think. You are keeping these feelings inside, And that is causing stress. So what is a solution? Solution is honesty, Laughter,and comedy. In short-- A vacation. It--what? No.no, I am talking about a roast! Of michael scott. Oh,come on! Who here has the comedy Central roast channel? You've seen it,right? Everybody gets together, And you start hurling Insults at the one guy, And everybody's laughing, And everybody is hugging each other. Michael,are you serious? You really want us to roast you? Mmm,si senor. - that's offensive. - it's not! It's not offensive during a roast. Anything goes. And i want you guys to really Get cracking on this. I want you to take me down. Don't hold back. I want you to really make fun Of anything about me. It could be my race, Could be the fact that i'mo fit, Or i'm a womanizer. Fair game. Whatever. I don't want to write Your stuff for you. But i just want it to be good. Oh,my god. Oh,man. Oh,my god. I consider myself a good person. But i'm gonna try to make him cry. I can already feel people's Stress srting to melt. I think they're very excited About paying their respects this way. I have got to make sure?? May i have your attention? Please sign in. Sign in on the sign-in sheet. The clipboard. This meeting is mandatory. If you do not sign in, Your name will not be counted. Thank you. Hey. This is your apology letter. That was the last signature i needed. Whoo! Welcome,welcome, Welcome! Welcome,welcome! You are all jerks. Just kidding. Not yet,anyway. Welcome to the roast Of mr. Michael scott. If you are here for The gravowski wedding, It is the second door on the left. So we all know how these work. Needs to get crazy. Take your best shots. I am going to sit right over "chair" And,uh,whoever wants to Come up and roast me, You may. Okay. Lower the mic for the midget. If you ever wondered Whether you were michael scott, Here's a quiz to help. If you ever put sunblock on a window, You might be michael scott. I normally don't enjoy Making people laugh. If you ever called The fire department 'Cause you--your head was Stuck in your chair, You might be--michael scott. I don't go make burgers where you work And then tell you how to make burgers. I have made a list of people That i would make out with Before i would make out With michael scott. A turtle. A fridge. Anybody from the warehouse. A wood chipper. Kevin. A candle. And lord voldemort. Anyway,happy birthday,michael! Yeah. You'd be so lucky! Good one. Michael-- You ran over me with your car. You posted a picture of my bare boobs On the bulletin board With a caption that said,"gross." Michael,you are the reason i drink. You are the reason i live to forget. @#$%&amp;*! Nope. No! Friends only. Friends only! Several times a day, Michael says words that Are way beyond my vocabulary. - i know where this is going. - do you? - no. - okay. Remember spider face? - nope. - okay. 'Cause the quote was,"cut off Your nose to spider face." Spid--okay. Yeah. Yep. How dare you all attack him like this. Oh,stop it,dwight. Michael is your superior. No,no,no. - okay,you should be bowing Down in front of him. -dwight,you're supposed to do it this way. Okay,no,they don't understand who they have. - that is the way you're Supposed to do it,idiot. - you're interrupting me. - i am trying to get your back. - idiot. Idiot. - idiot. - are you calling me an idiot? - idiot. - don't you ever talk to me that way. You pathetic,short little man. You don't have any friends Or any family or any land. Yeah! Well,i just want to take a minute To talk to y all about Something very serious. Once every hour, Someone is involved in an internet scam. That m is michael scott. He's supporting about Hey,you know what? Forgive me for caring,right? Well,you know, Michael is a great delegator. He never does any work himself--ever. And one time I walked in on him naked. And his thing is so small. How small is it? If it were an ipod, It would be a shuffle. Uh,can i make just A little announcement? In a professional roast, Usually the roaster will Say something nice About the roastee After they're done. Something about How much they love them, So just keep that in mind. Mike claims we're all a family. - isn't that right? - we are!We are a family. Oh,okay. So,um What's his name? All the way in the back,there. Oh,very funny. Mmm. What's his name? I'm thinking roy. Roy left years ago. What's his name? I don't believe I have had the pleasure. Michael,i gave you A ride home last week And we spent an hour in traffic. What's his name? Jefferson. Nope. His name is michael. * what i hate about you * * you really suck as a boss * * you're the losiest,jerkiest * * and you're dumber than applesauce * * we're stuck listening to you all day * * stanley tried to die just to get away * * well,it's true * * that's what i hate about you * * that's what i hate about you * * you * And now, A man who deserves no introduction, Michael scott. Thank you very much. Thank you.that was great. Great job,some great laughs. Really Really went after my intelligence,there. Dozens of online i.q. Tests might prove you wrong, But And my thing isn't tiny. It's average,so. Get your facts straight. So when i heard that There was going to be A roast in my honor,i thought-- Sorry. I have a frog in my throat. I decided to jot down Some quick thoughts about you people. First up,uh,phyllis and kevin. Dunder mifflin,this is pam. Uh,i'm sorry. Michael's not here right now. Can i take a message? Great. I will. Thanks. It's very unusual for michael Not to show up to work. My guess-- he's either deeply depressed Or an icicle has snapped off His roof and impaled his brain. He has this terrible habit Of standing directly underneath them And staring up at them. And i always say,"michael, Ta two steps back And stare at the icicle from the side." And he's like,"no,i Like the way they look From standing directly Underneath them." It was only a matter of time. Michael is so dumb That he tries to put his m&amp;ms; In alphabetical order. All right,kevin. Enough with the michael jokes. I think he got it Bad enough yesterday. I'm almost done. That reeks,and i'm trying to eat. Attention,everyone. I've just Got a text from michael. He says,"personnel day." Are we hiring? Yep. You're being replaced. I think he meant "personal day." I don't know. That's quite a leap,pam. I hope he's okay. I feel bad. Give it up. He's dead. Well,he just sent a text. What's a text? You know,sometimes, To get perspective, I like to think about A spaceman on a star Incredibly far away. And our problems Don't matter to him Because we're just A distant point of light. But he feels sorry for me. Because he has an incredibly Powerful microscope And he can see my face. I'm okay. No,i'm not. Uh,phyllis,there's a package for you. Sign here. Okay. Got it. Sam. Sam,sam. It's not that you dumped My granddaughter, And it's not that You want children. It--it's that you lied to me. Can't you see that? Can't you see? Oh! I' never trust you. Lily,no. Oh! Lily! Lily,please! Lily,stop! I don't care how much Time we have left. I don't care what my friends say. And i don't care what your mom thinks. Frankly,i'm pretty sure She's not making any sense. Please. Move back to my apartment. Lily. I'm not giving up. I'm not giving up. Lily. Lily! Push the reverse button! Reverse the button! Sam. Lily! Sam. Hey,dad. No,i know. Mom told me. Okay. Yeah,i'll see you then. So what did he say? Was it my fault? Yeah. He said that you told him How much you love me. About how you feel When i walk in a room, And about how you've never Doubted for a second That i'm the woman you want to Spend the rest of your life with. And i guess he's never Felt that with my mom, Even at their best. You okay? Yeah. When you're a kid,you assume Your parents are soul mates. My kids are gonna Be right about that. I guess it also means That sometimes love Affairs look different To the people inside them. I'm not insightful enough To be a movie critic. Maybe i could be a food critic. These muffins taste bad. Or an art critic. That painting is bad. Michael. It's really good to see you. Why are you wearing a turtleneck? Are you all right? Michael,i feel i was A little harsh yesterday. - yeah. - yeah,we're really sorry. I,um,i spent The afternoon in the park Trying to feed the pigeons. I guess they all flew West for the winter. And i-- i just had some thoughts That i wanted to Share with you people. - what? - well,i wrote 'em down So i wouldn't forget. Jim,you're 6'11" And you weigh 90 pounds. Gumby has a better body than you. Boom. Roasted. Dwight,you're a kiss-ass. Boom. Roasted. Pam,you failed art school. Boom. Roasted. Meredith,you've slept With so many guys, You're starting to look like one. Boom. Roasted. Kevin,i can't decide Between a fat joke and A dumb joke. Boom. Roasted. Creed,your teeth called. Your breath stinks. Boom. Roasted. Angela. Where's angela? Well,there you are. I didn't see you behind That grain of rice. Boom. Roasted. Stanley,you crush your wife During sex and your heart sucks. Boom. Roasted. Oscar,you are-- Oscar--ha ha ha! You're gay. Andy,cornell called. They think you suck. And you're gayer than oscar. - boom. Roasted. - boom. Roasted. All right. All right,everybody. You know i kid. You know i kid. You guys are the reason that I went into the paper business. So,uh,goodnight,god bless. God bless america. And get home safe. They say that laughter Is the best medicine, So stanley,you can throw Away those pills. You are cured. Actually,you s-- Better hold on to the pills just in case. This morning, the phone guy comes in, and he shows Michael that our phones have a P.A. function. And then he just left. This is your captain speaking. The office will be flying at an altitude of two stories. Look out your left-hand window, and you will see Vance Refrigeration. I am the ghost of salesmen past. Do not come near me! Yes, Michael Scott for Dr. Jocelyn, please. Hello, Doctor. I was just following up about my mole again. No, I was looking online about sebaceous cysts. I have not been squeezing it. Could I stick it with a pin? Toby Flenderson to the principal's office. Your mother called. And it appears that you wet the bed again. So you have to get home to wash your sheets because they're yellow and they're wet with your urine. You And at 6'6" from the University of North Carolina, Jim Halpert! That's pretty funny. You know what? Did I drop my - What? - What the heck - Is that - You find it? I didn't. I'll look somewhere else. Would you like fries with that? Please drive around. Proofreading: So. &amp; Valpi Episode 5x14 "Lecture Circuit (Part 1)" - Good morning. - Morning. You ready? And we're off! Like a herd of turtles. Pam and I have eloped. Actually, we just robbed a bank, and we are on the lam. Seriously, I am on a lecture circuit. Apparently, Scranton has the best sales of any regional branch. So David Wallace has asked me to go to all the branches except Nashua, so a little bit raw there But I am going to these branches and I am telling them my secret recipe for success. My 11 business herbs and spices in a sales batter. That. Well, that is Pam. Pam is coming along as my assistant and my driver so I can focus. And I like to pack heavy. He brought a sled. That is a toboggan. You never know when you're gonna find a snowy hill. Every magician has a hot assistant, and every rock star has a roadie, and Pam is my hot roadie. I love being on the road. but I especially love the time-and-a-half pay, 'Cause I have a mortgage now. Gotta bring home the bucks. Don't say "bucks." That's not ladylike. Here we go! So, what we do is we drive all day - and stay in hotels together at night. - Separate rooms. - That goes without saying. - I'm gonna say it anyway. Look at what you're wearing again. Have you ever seen a magician's assistant? - This is a new cardigan. - Kind of Maybe you could tie it around your waist or lose the shirt underneath or something. Screw you. Excuse me. That is no way to address a superior. Screw you, too. - What was that all about? - You forgot her birthday. It was yesterday. Go ahead. You do it. I insist. After Phyllis blackmailed Angela, Michael asked them both to step down from the party committee 'cause there was too much drama. - What he said was - Easy. There was a problem with having one head of the party committee. She becomes too powerful, so he appointed two heads. - Party-planning is - I am a salesman. - the stupidest thing I've ever done. - This is humiliating. That's on my side. So this is fun. My birthday was yesterday and everybody forgot. I got really dressed up and excited, and no one said a word. There wasn't even a party. I think sometimes people are really mean to the hot, popular girl. Can I turn on the radio? I need silence or Sam Kinison to prepare. But then you fall asleep and there's nothing for me to do. Then listen to your iPod. - That's dangerous. - Well, then You know what? Let's just talk. That's OK. I can I'm fine. I'll just play a song in my head. You're nervous about seeing Karen again? Since she was the other woman? Actually, you were the other woman, so. That was a long time ago. Is that why you're wearing makeup today? I'm not even wearing that much. I hate the idea that someone out there hates me. I even hate thinking that Al-Qaeda hates me. I think if they got to know me, they wouldn't hate me. But Karen knows me and she still hates me, so. This is a nice office. You don't have to lie. Through here. - Who's that? - She's out of your league. For your information, I've been with lots of beautiful women. Sexually? This conversation is over. I am single now. What we have here is the ultimate smackdown between the Nard-Dog and crippling despair, loneliness, and depression. I intend to win. We wanted to say we are very sorry. - Screw you. You're dead to me. - If you say "screw you" one more Screw you. I don't forget your birthday. - I would never do that. - Guys, guys. We want to make it up. What can we do? I guess my only wish would be that nothing so terrible would ever happen to anyone else ever again. It's good that it happened to me because at least I can bear it. What kind of cake do you want, imbecile? Ice cream. Point at the Dunder Mifflin. Hello, Rolando. How are you? I'd like you to meet Pam. She is our receptionist. You know what? Maybe you guys could go out on a little friend date sometime. You're late. Everyone's waiting in the conference room. Karen will be right here to take you over. Don't be nervous. - Just picture her naked. - Stop it. - That's what I do. Steal my trick. - Please, cut it out. Hi, guys. - Is that Jim's? - What? Of course not. My head just exploded. Thank god. For everybody, right? You're huge! That's incredible! God. Sorry. Sorry, my head is I'm just I'm trying to figure out the last time that you and Jim had sex. Let's just get this over with, shall we? Ten. Ten months? Are you kidding? I'm not done yet. This fits in the palm of my hand. You haven't blown 'em up enough. Why have you chosen brown and gray balloons? They match the carpet. What is that? "It is your birthday", period. It's a statement of fact. - Not even an exclamation point? - This is more professional. It's not like she discovered a cure for cancer. I can't believe how bad this looks. Are you trying to hurt my feelings? Because if so, you are succeeding. Fortunately, my feelings regenerate at twice the speed of a normal man's. - Good then. - Have you collected the money? - I am working on it. - How much do you have? $6. That's how much you and I contributed! Damn it! I said I was working on it. Trying to see what CDs she's got. It's good to know the deets about the girl you're wooing. Feist. That is so awful. That is the worst news. I have to go. I have to do a presentation. I'll talk to you This is going to be hard for me to speak today because I just learned that my father has died. He didn't! He is alive. And this isn't even a cell phone. This is a calculator. But you bought it! And now you can't return it. Or can you? No, you can't. Do you need to go pump? Not gonna have to do that till after I have the baby. I am wondering, what are you talking about? I am talking about how you all need to sell an experience. Like I sold you one The idea that my father had died. But now we think you're a liar. Would a liar bring mini mounds bars? I am a theatrical person. Growing up, I always thought I would become an actor because I have these memorization tricks that I use. For instance, I learned the pledge of allegiance by setting it to the tune of Old MacDonald. I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America And to the republic for which it stands One nation under God With a woof-woof here And a woof-woof there Here a woof, there a woof, Everywhere a woof, woof You get it. I don't know you. But I need to know you in order to sell to you. That is why I have asked you to go around and tell me your names. I have an amazing pneumonic device by which I have now memorized all of your names. Shirty. Mole. Lazy eye. Mexico. Baldy. Sugar boobs. Black woman. I have taken a unique part of who you are, and I have used that to memorize your name. Baldy. Your head is bald. It is hairless. It is shiny. It is reflective. Like a mirror. "M." Your name is Mark. Got it. It works. It's very insulting. But it works. I would like you to give this a shot. What do you say? But we already know each other's names. Then it will be easier for you. But I still think it's worthwhile to give it a try. All right, everyone. Meeting's over. I still have more. Can I please see you in my office, please? She is pregnant. She is knocked up. "K." Karen. Pam, let's go. I can't accept these prices. They just cut our budget. Brought you guys some coffees. Stanley, I know you have adult onset diabetes so I put Splenda in yours. How many did I put in there? One, two, three, four Splendas in your coffee, Stanley None in yours, Julia 'cause I don't know how you take it But if you'd rather Four Splenda. Are you crazy? I actually only put in two but that's not how the song goes. - Are you out of your damn mind? - Are you out of your damn mind? You bring an angel like that into this office and you don't even set me up with her. We're not friends. I didn't think about it. We are friends. We're friends. And you let me down. You really like her, huh? I really like her with all my heart. Give me two clients for her. I grab this, and I turn it on and I say, "Prepare yourself "for the Utica chain store massacre!" That is incredibly dangerous. - Don't worry. The chain is off. - No, it's not. I think I'm just gonna distill all of this and send it in an email to my team. Email's not scary. This is an opportunity. - Don't blow it. - So, when are you due? In about a month. That is wonderful. Congratulations. It just all happened so fast. It's really amazing. Congratulations. So, is there a guy or a person or a sperm machine that did this to you or? My husband impregnated me. His name is Dan. - This is us. So dorky. - He's cute. He's a dermatologist. We met at a bar. Can you believe that? - What is happening there? - Yeah. Don't even. That's really dorky. - It's really sweet. - No, it's really dorky. You were right the first time. So how are things in Scranton? - How's Jim? - They're good. Jim's good. We're engaged. That's so great. That's great. I'm so happy for you. Old hatreds dissolve into new friendships. It's a really wonderful moment. I have to take care of things, so Andy will be taking over things here. You're in good hands and give my best to your mother. Let's see. With regards to billing, should we send bills to you or to your boyfriend's house? No, it could go straight to our business address. That makes sense. How does your boyfriend deal with your phenomenal success? Is he just, like, totally threatened by you or Actually, I don't have a boyfriend. Really? Is that That's so weird. Stop everything. I'm about to ask out this girl and I'm completely panicking. My desk is over This gal She's really into you? I mean, I've seen her, like, three times today, and we love all the same music, and whenever I walk into a room she totally looks up. Say no more. This is how I got Squeaky Fromme. No small talk. Just show her who's the boss. Just go right in and kiss her. It sounds risky. Have I ever steered you wrong, Jim? Wait, what? I would give that lecture a solid B+. Although, for the record, Karen - Kind of mean. - I like her. Really? No, honestly. Tell me what you really think. I'm serious. - I'm really glad I came. - Why? Because 'Cause I'll never wonder ever again if I did something wrong and now I have closure. She's happy and I don't know, it feels good. - Thanks for walking me out. - My pleasure. There's all kinds of weirdoes out here, so. - You must be freezing. - I am about to die. Will you wait here while I go get my jacket? No, it's OK. this is my car. Listen. You're a new client, and as one of my new clients, you will always be taken care of. And that is the Nard-Dog guarantee. What's a "Nard-Dog"? This is the Nard-Dog. What the hell? I'm sorry. I thought we had this energy and I'm a mess, and I just had my heart broken, and you came in today and you're so pretty. - You're incredibly pretty. - I just got out of a relationship, too. - It's really hard. - Right! Do you want to talk about it? Go to a mall or something, - just walk around? - I don't think so. That's You're right. It's too soon. Definitely too soon for me. So, I'm glad we got that out of the way. I'm gonna be in touch with you in three months. I'm gonna call you about that order and maybe about that mall walk. Take care, Julia. Sorry I tried to kiss you. We lost the account. Damn it. - How old's Kelly? - Who is this? It's Mose. Who do you think it is? Mose doesn't know how to use a phone, so joke's on you. They only have numbered candles. How old is she? Do you think I'm calling you for your best approximation? I'll call you back. I have here Kelly Kapoor's personal and confidential file. Allow me to share. "Kelly Kapoor spent April 1995 to December 1996 "at Berks County Youth Center." Juvie. "According to past employers, it in no way affects her job perform" Are you asleep? I'm just thinking about what you said. About Karen, about closure. You remember Holly? She used to work for H.R. Remind me. Blonde hair. Nice boobs. Not too big, not too small. Perfect boobs. Of course I remember Holly. She was the love of my life. What you and Jim have times 100. Just she She just left. And I didn't I never got closure, you know? I never got closure with her. I haven't talked to her since. I haven't seen her since. And I feel like I need to go to Nashua and get closure. I feel like I need that. Let's go. I'll just blow off the lecture at Rochester. Screw 'em. Let's do this. I'm collecting $3 from everybody for Kelly's party. - I'd like to contribute. - Great. There you go. I am on a lecture circuit. I'm going around to all the branches, and I'm telling them my secret recipe for success. I have now memorized all of your names. Shirty, Mole, Lazy eye, Mexico, Baldy. Then I turn it on and I say, "Prepare yourself for the Utica chain store massacre." - How's Jim? - We're engaged. - My God, I'm so happy for you. - Well Thank you. You remember Holly? She used to work for H.R. She was the love of my life. She just left, and I never got closure. And I feel like I need to go to Nashua and get closure. Let's go. Proofreading: So. &amp; Valpi Episode 5x15 "Lecture Circuit (Part 2)" Two? I didn't eat lunch. I didn't eat all my lunch. Hello, everyone. Ice cream. Nice, Kevin. Looks good. Angela, you're more chipper than usual. I am proud to announce that there is a new addition to the Martin family. She's hypoallergenic. She doesn't struggle when you try to dress her. She's a third-generation show cat. Her father was in Meet the Parents. Needless to say, she was very, very expensive. - How much? - $7,000. For a cat? I could get you a kid for that. Where'd you get the money? I sold Andy's engagement ring on eBay. Wait, you didn't give it back? He wouldn't have wanted that. Her name is Princess Lady! Seven grand. I gotta see that little bitch. I have something better than a picture. Come on. You have your cats on Nanny Cam? I usually try to take leave when I get a new cat, but I'm out of vacation days. And this company still doesn't recognize cat maternity. When somebody has a kid, sure, take off a year. She's right. I had my 2nd kid just for the vacation. Right. Anyways I just want to make sure Princess Lady is acclimating well. She means more to me than anyone. Any cat, you mean. And person. So detour. We're adding Nashua to the lecture circuit so Michael can confront Holly and get some closure. Nashua sounded very excited on the phone. I don't think they get a lot of visitors. Because their office is only accessible by cross-country skis. I've been driving too long. - What did you do? - Stop yelling at me! - What did you do? - I didn't do anything! What did you learn in there? I bet you learned things. Like how to fashion a shiv? What the hell's going on? Why don't you tell Jim where you were from ages 14 to 15? I was kickin' it. In juvie. What? Juvie nile detention center. - Where they send teenagers for - Got it. What did you do? Dwight, sounds like she was 14, so maybe we wanna go a little easy. If she's old enough to get married, she's old enough to follow the law. What did you do? My boyfriend dumped me, so I stole his boat. He told me it was his boat. It was actually his father's. I thought it'd be really romantic, like Thelma and Louise, but with a boat. And it was the worst year of my life. I can't believe that you are making me talk about this on my birthday! I thought you said yesterday was your birthday. You know what? I got you a cake. You did? I want to see the cake. - I hate it. - How do you hate it? It's a cake. There's no flowers or toys or There's nothing on it. Where did you find a cake like this? It doesn't have my name on it. Do you know what my name is? - My name is Kelly! - Right. I forgot if there was an "e" between the "l" and the "y." I still don't know. I don't even know what the theme is. What's the theme? - Birthday. - Frosting. Those aren't themes. There's always a theme. There's always a theme. Nice job on the cake, Bozo. Next time, I'll let you get the cake, and I'll scream at the birthday girl. A little bit more closer to the sign. - Do I look OK? - You look good. - Hi, can I help you? - Yes, you can. I am Michael Scott, regional manager of the Scranton branch. We were expecting you. Have a seat. Is Holly Flax anywhere here? Actually, she's on an H.R. retreat for the next three days. She's not here? If you need to get in touch with her immediately, you could talk to A.J. He's a salesman here. He's her boyfriend. He's just over there. She has a boyfriend. I'm so sorry. How could she do this to me, Pam? She's not doing it to hurt you. I can't do the presentation. Just Thinking about seeing him and thinking about him getting to hold her and getting to kiss her. It's just Listen, when Jim was dating Karen, I didn't want to come to work. It was awful. I hated it. I wanted to quit, but Please, come on, I'm going through something. When Holly gets back, everyone'll tell her what a great job you did. And then she'll realize what she's missing. And then she'll move back to Scranton. And her boyfriend will die. Maybe. Maybe. One step at a time. You can do this. I can do this. I think there could be snacks or Why would we Is that what I think it is? Good God! That one ugly cat is humping Princess Lady! - Awesome! - Stop it, Mr. Ash! Bad cat! That is very bad. You stop it right now! - I swear, he is fixed. - I know fixed. That ain't fixed. - No way. - No, listen. You can't let what you see sully your image of them. They are good, decent cats. I've gotta go. I'll be back in an hour. Stop that! The other one's watching. So all we need is a theme and cups and ice and punch and a cake. Busy. What's that show that she's always talking about? Is this how you are with Pam? She must want to shoot herself. - I could use a little help. - I'm a little busy. We have a lot to do, and you are putting up a very effeminate sign. - Is that what you've been doing? - It's not effeminate. It's festive. You've been making that for something that we can just announce to the office? Everybody, the party's now at 3:00. I know, I just read it on the sign. Good morning, Viet Nashua! Sales. Sales is what "bwings" us together today. How do we deal with clients who say, "Frankly, my dear, I don't give a damn about paper," and get them to show us the money? We are going to find out today. Show of hands. How many of you are salesmen? Let's see the salesmen. I know what the rest of you are thinking. Salesmen are the worst. They are awful. They are so arrogant. They think the whole place revolves around them. Handsome. Good listeners. Funny. Mr. Wonderful. So You're a salesman. What's your name? What kind of name is A.J.? What, do you race cars? I'm a salesman. That's why I raised my hand. You're funny. Very good and funny. Tell me, A.J. Are you dating? Is there somebody you date? Why, are you interested? I have a question about discounts from distributors. We will get to you. So you're dating somebody. Is it serious? It's pretty serious. Does she ever talk about me? - Excuse me? - What does this have to do with sales? It's all connected. Shut up. Does she ever mention Michael Scott? What are you talking about? Does it feel good? - Does what feel good? - Your life. Legs are sort of giving out. Long drive in the car. So let's just We'll just continue. Get off the floor. I can't do this, Pam. Just read Just read the cards. - Michael, you have to - No, I'm OK. I'm all right. That was weird. It's all part of the presentation. It was confusing, right? Because confusing situations happen to us all the time in our jobs. I'm just trying to bridge the gap between what just happened, and the fact that I'm going to be doing the rest of the presentation. Sales is like a box of chocolates. You never know which vendor you're gonna get. Forrest Gump. Blazer Freckles Penguin K.D. Lang Holly's boyfriend. These mnemonic devices help to make a connection, and then also to help you memorize names. I have a chainsaw! Cutting down the competition. Where is that bad cat? You know who you are. Excuse me, Petals. I'm looking for Mr. Ash. He's a bad cat. Bad, bad cat. Do you hear me? Bad. You were bad. You look at me when I talk to you. Do you hear me, Mr. Ash? You look at me. I'm talking to you right now. This is getting weird. Is she cleaning the cat with her tongue? - Has this been on the entire time? - I have no idea. I was looking at pictures of food on my computer. Sorry I'm late. I want to get that image out of my head. The psychological issues that go behind licking a cat are not things I want to go into. Also, I'm pretty sure she coughed up a hairball. Don't look up. Want some pie? I went through Holly's things. - What? - I stole a sleeve of her sweater. I also stole something off of her computer. A document called "Dear Michael." You did what? I shouldn't have done it. It just I couldn't help it. She never sent it to you? She didn't. I'm gonna read it. Under no circumstances can you read that letter. It's a violation of her trust. How? - Because she didn't sent it to you. - I know. You're right. I could read it. That wouldn't - I could read it. - You don't have to do that. Go get your laptop. What? I'm not in love with her. You have to write my suggestions down too. I'm not writing "horse hunt." - I don't even know what that means. - It's in the name. So far our ideal party consists of beer, fights to the death, cupcakes, blood pudding, blood, touch football, mating, charades, and yes, horse hunting. Forget horse hunting, it's stupid. Is there a birthday that you remember that you loved? Here's one. It was dark, warm, wet. A sudden burst of light. An intense pressure like I'd never felt before. Father, dressed in white, pulls me forward. - Mother bites the cord. - Stop. Forever stop that story. That's disgusting, and it doesn't count. So give me another one. Schrutes don't celebrate birthdays, idiot. It started as a depression-era practicality, and then moved on to an awesome tradition that I look forward to every year. What about you? When I was seven, my dad took me to the Natural History Museum in New York. We looked at fossils all day. And at the end of the day, he got me a little plastic triceratops. It was awesome. That's cool. You know what's even cooler than triceratops? Every other dinosaur that ever existed! Didn't see that one coming. It's deleted. Well? She still has feelings for you. She said that? Is that what it said? What did it say? I can't tell you specifically, but it's not over. You're sure? - Happy birthday. - Surprise! It's not a surprise. - This doesn't look good. - What? You have a cake. You have a delicious cake with your name spelled correctly? - Told you. - You haven't heard our theme. You don't hear a theme. You see it. Why is there a chiclet on my cake? That's the best part. It represents a pillow or a television. - Our theme, if you will - Because the fun part is you decide on an hour of television or an hour of napping. That's our theme. I love it. OK, good. So what's it gonna be, Kapoor? Can she pick a half hour of each? Then pick TV. - Take a nap. - TV. Watching TV at work is really cool. Take a nap. Nothing good is on right now. Bonnie Hunt is on. I have been watching TV all week. I choose nap. - All right. - OK, nap it is. Everyone out. Get out! We're gonna be eating cake at our desks. Let's go. Move it! Let's go. Come on. I got this. This is for you. And Happy birthday, Kel. You've got one hour. I'm too excited to sleep. Great cake. Birthday time is over! Go make up for all the work you missed when you were taking your nap. Many happy returns. I feel great. So good to have closure. We should go apologize to Roy or something. - We don't need to. - Who have I wronged? Who have I wronged? What about that fat guy from Stamford that insulted? - We should find him. - You mean Tony. Jabba the Hutt. Pizza the Hut. Fat guys like pizza. Pepperoni pizza. Pepperoni Tony. Man, was he fat. So, so fat. You know what, forget it. I know me. When I saw him, I'd never be able to apologize to him. Too fat. Big fat fatty. Good morning. Can i help you? Yes,i'm from techstar about a new phone system for you. I was wondering if i could talk to michael scott. I'm sorry. He's not in right now. Really? He's never around when i come by. Shoot. They have new phone systems now that can ring directly to a salesman,or someone presses star and they go to accounting. Basically,95% of my job. But i'd like to see a machine that puts out candy for everyone. Vending machine. How about i make an appointment to come back? That way i know he'll be her That is a great idea. Great. Um oh,boy. Let's see,he's really Michael scott,manager.Hi,how are you? There his. - Nice to meet you. - Great. Yeah.Hey,look at that. I can assure you we don't need a new system,though. Happy with ours. Hello,may i help you? Jimbo. Jim? Okay. I'm,uh,i'm gonna bgoing. What was that? That was funny. Thatwasfunny. Let's go do it to somebody else. presents ytet-   season 5 episode 16 Oh,look at that. Cupids and hearts. Really shoving our faces in it this year. You doing okay,bud? I miss stacy. Yeah,i hear ya. It's been four mon since i wawith holly. And she was way hotter than stacy. - So if you think you're hurting--  I can't even imagine. This is our first and only valentine's day as fiances. You're only engednce. Well,present company excluded,but-- Really,jim. - On cupid's birthday. - Yeah. She's So i received my first valentine from a secret admirer. "Roses are red,violets are blue," It's time for your dental cleaning and maybe a check-Up,too. Look at those. How nice for you. Uphere front andene teofr.Fi ce beautiful. I think they would look better right here. They're very pretty,and i wouldn't want them to fall. Just about everybody in this office is single right now, Including me,and everyone is experiencing an incredible amnt of emotional pain. Especially me,because of my great capacity for emotion. And it is my first valentine's day since holly, So i think that i am well-Qualified to understand That these people need to be protected from having love shoved into their faces. Pam,really?They're back? I can't see them when they're on the floor. They're for her to look at,michael. - Could i have a word with you,champ? - Yes,let's have a word. Yes. Um,jim. Today's a ry difficult day for a lot of people in this office. - Oh,i'm sorry. - Yeah. And the sexy looks between you and pam-- The general sexiness,the flowers-- It's creating a bit of a hostile work environment. - I understand,yeah. - It's so sexy it becomes hostile. Oh,i actually thought we were keeping it pret low-Key. - Well,if you guys insist on having your own private little love fest - We do. That none of us can be a part of You can't be a part of our relationship,michael. Then we are going to have our own private valentine's day party. - That sounds fun. - So suck it. - Yeah. - Yes. Hey,everybody. I just invited jim to suck it,and i am cordially inviting all of you to a special convention-- A-- A lonely hearts convention this afternoon. Singles only. Yeah!Deal with it,pam! So we may not have someone in our lives that we love, But we do have each other. Having trouble finding a vein? Yeah,a little. How about now? I've trained my major blood vessels to retract into my body on command. Also,i can retract my penis up into itself. I am about to give blood. The gift of everlasting life. The transfer of my bodily fluids-- N wow! That's a big needle. - That--  You're gonna need to lie down over here. Okay. - Hello. - Hi,i can't talk right now.I'm sorry. Oh,okay. I'm really nervous. Yeah.Me,too. Yeah? - When i get nervous i sort of clam up and-- Oh,well,that's fine. It's better for me just to be quiet. Yeah. - Yeah. - Can i point something out to you? - Sure. - You're actually talking a lot. Yeah?Sorry,that's the other thing i do when i get really nervous. Okay.Here we go. All right,here we go. Oh,god. Just relax. Yep,i'm good. I feel like a human juice box. Oh,god. Uh,hawaiian blood punch. Oh,that's gross. Type o-Cean spray. God,stop. Stop it. - I want to pick the movie. - I get to pick the movie. Um,why don't you guys come and have lunch with bob and me? We'll take all afternoon. Michael is terrified of bob. What do you think? I have a lot of work to do this afternoon. Those mines aren't gonna sweep themselves. So.We're in. What? I looked at the bag. I looked straight at the bag. - That's not good. - Could you distract me for a second? Just talk about things that don't have blood in 'em. Well,okay. Uh-- Bags. - What?That-- Sorry,that was bad. That was mean. Um,a hat. - A hat. - A hat with no blood in it. That is full of soup. You're cute. - What? -You're done. Oh,already? Ah,we did it! I was so nervous about this i don't think i ate for three days. Is he okay? Oh,my god.How long was i out? What? Excuse me,waitress. Where did the lady go? Oh,she left. Okay. Oh,wait a second.Wait a second. That's hers.This is hers. She ft her glove. I need her name if i'm gonna return her glove. Oh,i'm sorry,sir. We can't give out that information. What are you doing? Decorating. I'll help. Now it's just a stupid baby. Yeah. Thanks. It is so nice to go out with another Anything to get out of that office,huh? I know. I honestly don't know how you can work w I and that other jack-Ass and that new jack-Ass. He's talking about michael,dwight,and andy. Oh,yeah.I understood. Well,here we all are. Alone but together. No flowers for us. Relationships? We don't need no stinkin' relationships. I think we should all go around and tell our worst relationship story and then get past it. Just blow through it. Yeah? Kelly,what about ryan? He treated you pretty terribly,yeah? Well,his heart was in the right place. Yeah,but now his heart is in thailand-- Along with the rest of his body,having random sex. Okay.Sorry. Let's-- Who else? Oscar? I don't think so. Come on.I'm sure there's something you need to get off your chest. - Thank you.- Youanna-- Just-- Anything? You sure?I'm sure whatever you did wasn't your fault. Okay,well,we'll-- Who else? Everyone here who's bowled a 280 please raise your hand. No way.280? That's impressive. Okay.Noeveryone here who's bowled under 70 raise their hand. Yikes. - Come on,bob.Raise your hand.- No,bob,not-- No! - What? - One time.You just love bringing up that one time. - Don't you? -I do,i do. Jim uses a six-Pound ball. That is a lie. Yes,he bowled five frames with this pink,sparkly thing until a little girhad to ask for her ball back. But that girl must have had monstrous hands because the holes fit. No,you just have little dainty fingers. You could always model ladies' jewelry. Nobody asked,bob. Do you risk telling them how you feel? Do you say something that you can barely admit to yourself? - Oh,god,what did you do?- So-- Wait,not that i approve of any of it,but-- I was stupid.I told him. Was he into you in,like,a gay way? Moron. If he was,there wouldn't be a story. He told me he wasn't gay. Really sad. I'm not done yet. Oh,my god. A week later,a friend of mine calls me up and he says," I just saw him in a gay bar in kansas city. "  Oh,no. Well,then it's a happy ending,because he was gay. You should call him. My worst breakup was actually two breakups. Two different men. I was in love with both of them,and when things went bad,they had a duel over me. Yeah,dwight and andy.We were here. No,this was years ago when i was living in ohio. John mark anjohn david. Angela,you had two sets of different men actually duel over you? I guess i have. All right. Who's next?Where's andy? He's on one of his honeymoons. What? He made non-Refundable deposits on his honeymoons, So he's just knockin' 'em off one at a time. I think today he's hot air ballooning,and later he's got a couples' massage. My worst breakup was with stacy. It was a sunday morning. We were reading the par. And i said,"oh,my god. I think the eagles could clench the n.F.C. East. " And she said that we're done. You know what,ys? I don't think we need to do this. You're right.Okay,everyone,back to work. No,no,no,no.I mean,have this kind of party. I look around and i see all these beautiful people who are alone on valentine's, And i think that there are other single people out there,too. We just ne tfind 'em. There's a girl out there for all of us. Maybe even in this office park. There has to be a way to get all these lonely people together. A net?A giant net? No,not a giant net. - A-- A-- A--  What do you have in mind? I was thinking maybe like a mixer. - Oh,god.That's a terrible idea.- Old-Fashioned meat market. - No. - I don't think it is. Lonely people mixing with one another? Breeding? Creating an even lonelier generation? You're not allowing natural selection to do its work. Kind of like the guy who invented the seat belt. These people need love. And i am going to get it for them. Who cares if we sell a little bit less paper today? A great boss cares more about thhaceppiness of his employees than anything else. ******** I am going to be cupid,and i am going to shoot my sparrow at unsuspecting victims, And they are going to get hit,and say,"i'm in love! I was hit by cupid's sparrow. " Funny little bird,but he gets the job done.. No movement. Ah,still early. Eh,it's not that early. So how you holding up? I'm okay.Feel a little lopsided 'cause of all the blood they took out of my right side. No,no,i meant about being single today. Exactly. Oh,here we go. - Hello. - Hello. Dwight k.Schrute. Why don't you introduce me to your little friend? - Dwight - Babe alert! Hello,i'm michael scott.Welcome to our little shindig. Oh,hi,i'm lynn. - Lynn,follow me.Come on in. - Off we go. For you,we have one of our top people. Kevin malone. Kevin?Come out here.Show your beautiful self. Hello. So run with the ball. Run with it,kev. Where are you from? I'm from here. Y-- Okay. Well,he only gets better. - Thank you,michael. - Okay. I can untie any knot. I'm serious. Name a knot,any knot.Go ahead. Uh,i-- I believe you. You shouldn't believe everything you hear. In fact,there are many knots that i cannot untie. So where does a woman as charming as yourself find herself employed on a day such as today? Um,i work at a place that does catalogs for community colleges and small businesses. You must use a lot of paper. Oh,god.Tons of it. What's the rule about when people are in the bathroom? I think if you ordered hot food,you're allowed to eat. Damn. They've been in there for like ten minutes. Look at that. Bob ordered hot food. Yes. And i think they gave him too many fries. We should help him out. All right,the circle drive-In,they show old movies. It's really cool. That does sound cool. I used to go there with my fiancee. Before she left me. No,i-- I mean,before i left her. She left me. Stupid! I think i blew it. It all happened so fast. So fast. So erik,you mentioned before that you are in tool and dye repair. I am. Meredith recently had a total hysterectomy. So that's sort of a repair. L right.I'll let you guys talk. It's going very well.People are mixing. A lot of hope. 'Cause that's what you hate to see-- When hope gets crushed. Sorry. Thought i heard somebody coming in. Um,so it's not too late. And the kind of discoun we're talking about are not-- Hold on,hold on. Michael,why do you keep looking at the front door? - No reason. - Is somebody after you? Why do you always go to that? Has anyone ever been after anyone in this office? Hey,it just takes one. Nobody's after me. I just-- I met a woman when i was giving blood and i thought she might come by. You met a woman when you were giving blood?That is so romantic. It's not a big deal,really. I just-- You know,met mebody.We hardly talked. I picked up her glove,so i was hoping i could give it back to her. Oh,my god,that makes it even more romantic. This is like a modern-Dayenchanted. It's like a fairy tale. She could be your soul mate. Oh,not likely. Three billion women on the planet,most of them live in asia,so the numbers just don't add up. - It's possible. - She could be. Believe me,it's nothing. I hardly even talked to her. We just-- We were lying there next to each other. I think our blood bags touched. Here they come. - What? -No,just kidding. Seriously,though,that's enough. Well,just cover it with the broccoli. - Oh,great,i have to cover it with-- Do you think they dined and dashed? Well,they didn't dine. So yeah,maybe they just dashed. I thought we we having a nice time. We were. Yeah. - Empty. - Mine,too. Oh,boy. - Okay. - Oh,my go Is this the party? Nah. Okay,then. So where were we? Ah,bowling. Yep,yep.Yep. You didn't eat much there,jimbo. Oh,initially i did. Want some meat? - Oh,sure. - Little piece. No mushroom,though. - Forgot. - Yeah. Thank you. I'm sorry we did not have a chance to talk more. Yeah. I get very nervous talking to pretty girls. Seriously. Feel how sweaty my hand is. That's really sweaty. Are you on email? Oh,yeah. Cool. - Okay,bye. - Bye,kevin. Good valentine's. So basically the greater volume you decide to buy in,the greater discount we can give you. - Okay. - Okay? - What's up?-Look,i'm-- I'm gonna go. Before you go,i'd st love to get a firm commitment on this. Um  you know,maybe sign? Look,we already have a paper supplier. Okay. Well,thanks for wasting my time tonight. Idiot. God! You don't deserve her. Thanks,michael. Hey,if anybody wants to go-- - We can stay a little longer. - Really? Yeah. Yeah.Sure,michael. No,this is great. We'll hanout.Absolutely. Yeah. Oh,thanks. Michael,it's time. You know what?You guys-- You guys can head out. I'm-- I'm gonna soldier on a little bit. Come on. We'll all go. Yeah.Yeah.Let's go.Yeah. Okay. Four months ago,i dated a woman named holly. And,um,this is actually the first time that i've even considered getting back into that arena again. You know what? Sometimes it's not about whether cinderella gets her slipper back, But it's about the fact that the prince even picked up the slipper at all. There's a lot of princesses out there. You know,they have all different sizes and shapes of feet. And hands. So i think i think my odds are pretty good. Pardon me.May i have a chocolate chip cookie? I gave blood earlier and i'm still feeling woozy. Of course. That's weird. You got a cotton ball and tape and we've been using band-Aids. I,uh-- Oh,i feel so woozy. I just-- It's band-Aids. Ah,damn. That's no problem. - Hang up. - Sure. - Knock, knock. - On the phone. - I know you are. Knock, knock. - You can fax it over. Yeah, 5-7-0 - 5-5 - 5-9-1 - 0-1 - 7-4 - 7-5. - "Flive-ling." That makes us look unprofessional. They would never know it was me. Here we go. Who's there? - Buddha. - Buddha who? Buddha this bread for me, won't you? Great. I need something to wipe my hand. There's butter on my desk. - A classic. - I got a knock-knock joke. Michael, please? Please let me. - Who's there? - KGB. - KG - We will ask the questions. What the hell was that? What are you doing? - Stop that. Come on. - You like that? What are you doing? Mine was part of a joke! Mine was retribution. No more knock-knock jokes. - That's it. - Ding-dong. - Who's there? - KGB. - Dwight, get the door. - I'm not answering the door. - It's the KGB. - You get it. I'm not answering. You answer it. - I'm not gonna answer it. - It's the KGB! The KGB will wait for no one. It's true. Proofreading: So. &amp; Valpi Episode 5x17 "Golden Ticket" Good morning, Michael. I am not Michael. I am Willy Wonka! Good morning, Mr. Wonka. Your messages. Thank you very much. What are those? Tell me please! Jelly beans. They are not just ordinary jelly beans, little girl. These are extraordinary jelly beans! The Willy Wonka golden ticket promotional idea is probably the best idea I've ever had. It's probably the best idea anybody has ever had. Three days ago, I slipped five pieces of gold paper into random paper shipments. This entitles the customer to 10% off of their total order. It will be a day for them that is full of whimsy and full of excitement and full of fantasy. I have written these things because it is my responsibility as manager of this branch to "profiligate" great ideas, and I think I've done my part with the golden ticket promotion. Now it is your turn. I want to hear some great ideas from you that are just as good as mine. We own our own delivery trucks. We could lease them out on the weekends. Too many words. Good ideas are simple Golden ticket. Free paper. Jim, we're a business. Post-its. That is a golden ticket idea. NASA took five or six golden ticket ideas to get men on the Moon. Golden Girls That's a golden ticket idea, right? How great was that show. Golden Grahams, another Is it I don't get this. No, you don't. What will be the state of this company if I am the only one coming up with the great ideas, right? I think I should call her. Why is it so bad for me to call and ask her to lunch today? You're making it too easy for her. You're just conveying, "I like you just the way you are." But I do like her just the way she is. That's not what we agreed on. What are you doing? Why don't you go on a date with her? Try to spark up an ongoing joke, and then in a month or two, if it feels right, you'll know. You don't have to wait that long. You don't have to wait a month to ask her out. Ask her. You're asking him to give up all of his power. What power? Andy, Pam and Jim are all telling me how to deal with this girl that I like. I don't like getting advice from more than one person at a time. I'm a textbook over-thinker. You can't let a girl feel good about herself. It will backfire on you. Every compliment has to be backhanded. "I like your dress, but I'd like it more if you had prettier hair." That's psychotic. - Do guys actually do that? - Guys with girlfriends don't. That's low, Tuna. Hey, Tom. What's that? You found a golden ticket. One of my clients found a golden ticket. No, congratulations. - Tell me. - I'll take that down. Was it a spoiled little girl with big lips? - I'm on the phone. - Or an odd little boy with a cowboy obsession? Invite them on the tour! It's Blue Cross from Pennsylvania. Really? That's kind of a big client. How much of a hit is 10% of our Blue Cross account? - That's gonna hurt. - Hold on one sec. Hold on one sec, Tom. What's that? You found five golden tickets? And does it say "Limit one per customer"? Nope, it doesn't. How do you not spread out the tickets into different shipments? I thought I did. OK, I'm gonna call corporate to make sure that they know I didn't lose half my sales. You didn't. That It'll be fine. It'll be good. You idiot. Start over. Sir, I placed a bunch of golden tickets into five separate boxes, and somehow they all ended up with Blue Cross. - How does this happen? - Were the boxes near each other? Irrelevant. I put three pallets on the truck to Blue Cross once a week. They use a lot of paper. I'm going to ask you something, and I want you to be honest. What is a pallet? My golden ticket idea OK. Why would anyone think that this is my golden ticket idea? There's a one in thirteen chance that this could be anybody's golden ticket idea. That Dunder Mifflin. This is Pam. Hi, David. No, I'm sorry. He's not back from the civil rights rally. I'll have him call you the minute he gets back from the Lincoln Memorial. When Michael's skirting a phone call, he gave me a list of places to say he is. "Stopping a fight in the parking lot." "An Obama fashion show." Whatever that is. Or "Trapped in an oil painting." I'm gonna save that one. Nobody panic. The good news is - they can't fire all of us, right? - They can. - No, they can't. - Yes, they can. You don't know what the hell you're talking about. What do you think shutting down a branch is? Then we're screwed! I am just a net that traps all of your crappy subconscious ideas and adds a little bit of my own childhood memories and whimsy, so I lost a ton of money today, and I've a mortgage, so I'm pissed, too. Jim is with me. Absolutely not. I'm mad at you. It is not my fault that you bought a house to impress Pam. That is why carnations exist. That's not why. We need a golden ticket idea to get us out of this mess. Does that mean an idea that blows up in our faces later? Good one. Don't get that. Please. I've got a golden ticket idea. Why don't you skip on up to the roof and jump off? That is not constructive. Dunder Mifflin. This is Pam. Hi, David. He's having a colonoscopy. All right, I'll find out if he's out yet. Hello, David. I just got back from my procedure - What the hell is going on? - How are you doing? - Fine. What's going on? - My colonoscopy was an examination of my large colon and the distal part of my small bowel with a camera. Why did you okay this golden ticket idea? We're going to lose a fortune. How could you let this happen? There is an explanation that involves me not letting it happen. And I just don't I don't know. - How could you not know? - I think We might have hired an outside marketing consultant. We might have hired OK, what firm? You're breaking up. OK. I think it might have been an inside consultant. Was it the sales department? Was it Jim? OK, was it Dwight? Come on in. Good to see you. Have a seat. I just wanted to congratulate you on that great golden ticket idea. That was your idea. Who told you that? You did. Several times. That was your idea. You were dressed as Willy Wonka. - I'm not taking credit. - Wasn't my idea. - I'd love to, but I can't. - Wait. I wrote it down in my diary. - You don't keep a diary. - Yes, I do. You've just never seen it. "March 4th. "Dwight came up with the best idea today about golden tickets." Hold that thought. March "Michael came up with golden ticket idea to give 5 customers 10% off for 1 year." - Why do you have a diary? - To keep secrets from my computer. You know what? You came up with this idea. I remember you told me that you loved the Willy Wonka movie - when you were growing up. - Impossible. - Yes, you did. - I wasn't given candy as a child, so a movie that fetishized it that much would have made no sense to me. Plus we weren't allowed to see movies. Do the math. - What are you writing? - "Had conversation with Michael "about taking credit for an idea that wasn't mine. Discussed movies." Would you like to go to lunch with me? Just the two of us? With all my heart. You are throwing a lot at me. All I'm saying is that's the first date, so just keep a respectful distance. Right. I don't think Jim means that you shouldn't touch her. - No, that is what I mean. - Shush. A playful touch on the arm or on the back, it can show your interest, and it's really romantic. - Like that? - No. Stop it. Don't touch her, don't talk to her, don't look at her. Put your heart out there like that, it's liable to just turn into this blackened carbon brick. It has barbecue sauce of shame and rage, and two hot people with a perfect relationship would not understand that. We think a lot alike. Sometimes you will think something, - and I will say what you're thinking. - What am I thinking right now? Nacho chips. I was thinking about how the skin is the largest organ of the body. Let me just cut to the chase. I want you to fall on your sword for me. Not gonna happen. I did fall on my sword once. I was running with it in my belt. Won't happen again. Why do you even want to stay at Dunder Mifflin? What's the point? You're cooped up in there all day. You don't get to do your farming. You're not dating Angela anymore. It doesn't matter if you get fired for taking credit for the gold ticket idea. It doesn't matter. Me on the other hand, I would be lost without this place. You, way too manly. What about Shoe La La? It's not ready yet. I have an idea for a fancy men's shoe store called Shoe La La, and it's just men's shoes for the special occasions in a man's life, like the day that you get married or the day your wife has a baby or for just lounging around the house. May I have your attention, please? I have an announcement. Mr. Dwight Schrute and I just returned from a wonderful stroll together, and although I probably will never do it again, I had fun. I really had fun with my best friend, Dwight. These aren't announcements. You just don't care about the information. I love working here, and I do not wanna leave. He doesn't love it that much. It wouldn't be such a bad thing for him to be fired. I mean, like we were talking about, that is why he has come to the conclusion We discussed the fact that I'm cooped up here instead of experiencing the whole wide world. Plowing my own acres, going around shirtless all day. Experiencing freedom. That's it. That's it. You can't put a price on freedom. - Try me. - That's why you've made the decision. - I haven't made a decision yet. - You kind of have. You cannot take the fall for him. - He said he would do the same for me. - He can do the same, right now, by getting fired instead of you. So what are you gonna do? I'm gonna go back to work. After I write you up for insubordination. There he is. Get in. What's it gonna be? What are you gonna do? What's it gonna be? Are you gonna do this thing for me? How are you? Good to see you. Nice surprise. Dwight and I were just having a very unfortunate conversation. That's too bad. Yes, it is. But it had to be done, didn't it? Hopefully nothing that can't be undone, because, Dwight, I owe you an apology. The head of Blue Cross just called. They were so excited by the golden ticket discount that they have decided to make Dunder Mifflin their exclusive provider of all office supplies. Congratulations. You're welcome. I just want to say that this golden ticket idea is one of the most brilliant initiatives I've ever seen at this company, and how about a big round of applause for Mr. Dwight Schrute! All right, Dwight! This is huge. That's what she said. - Very funny. - Dwight, great idea. Great idea. How'd you come up with that idea? - Inspiration. - Really? - How? - Never know when it's gonna strike. - How did it pop into your head? - Just "boom." Give me the details. You're talking to Dwight Schrute, the biggest Wonka fan I know. You've been talking about that movie for years. I even made fun of you when you dressed up as Willy Wonka to pitch this idea, - and for that I apologize. - Apology rejected. Thanks so much for helping the company. - Good work, kid. - Thanks, old man. This is great. I wanna get you on the horn with the marketing people in New York. - They should meet you. - Great idea. Pam, could you set up a call in there in about 15 minutes, please? Sure. Could I be part of the meeting also? You have too much to do around here. I don't wanna take up your time. Let's face it. This meeting sounds like it's Wonka fans only. He's never seen the movie. All right. Hey, guys. I have with me Dwight Schrute. - Dwight, take it away. - Listen up. Here's the deal. I love candy, sweet sugary candy, from the second it touches my tongue to the moment its metabolized by my stomach acid, so naturally I liked Willy Wonka. Wait, do you guys hear that? There's not a dog listening in? I hear panting. No dogs. So, I love Willy Wonka. The golden ticket scene is so inspiring to me that that's where I came up with that idea. There is no movie called Willy Wonka. It's called Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory. Based on a book called Charlie and the Chocolate Factory. I can't vouch for that. But I do know this He is a liar. He has taken my idea. - That is my - We are gonna call you back. - What is going on here? - Here's what happened. It was all my idea. You called me and you were really angry at me and I got scared, so I had Dwight take the fall, but now it turns out that it's a great idea, and Dwight will not confess. Can you believe that? - It is my idea. - How dare you? It is my idea. I'm filled with good ideas. Thousands of good ideas! You are? Good ideas? Did you come up with toilet buddy? It's a net, a circular net you put inside the toilet to catch your change and your wallet from falling into the toilet? - Formerly known as toilet guard? - Horse boat! A canoe built around your horse so you can go from riding to water travel without slowing down. - Horse boat! - Toilet sponge. It's a hollowed out sponge that is more absorbent and softer than toilet paper. - I have a lot of toilet ideas. - 'Cause they're easy. - They're not easy. - Toilet piano bench. Women's urinal! Everybody has to go to the bathroom. Enough. Please. Enough. Is this true, Dwight? Is this true? It's Michael's idea that he forced on me on threat of death! What do you want me to do now? What am I supposed to do now? David, I will be honest with you. I do want the credit without any of the blame. I am going back to New York. Pam, do me a favor, don't send me those notes. I am gone. When they look back on this day in the history books, all that will be remembered is that I had a good idea. And that's what I'm going to write down in my diary. And that is what I want you to write down in yours. I am. In my own words. I wanna see it. I wanna see that. Give me the diary. I'm just gonna say to you everything that I'm thinking. I think you have the best smile. I'd like to take you out to dinner and a movie. Nice. Boobs. Well, it's his funeral, so Who is it? - KGB. - All right. I just got out of the shower. One second. When you are done, open the door. Hello in there? I'm late so I have to brush my teeth. It's a whole routine. We have other houses to visit. If you wanna come back then, that'd be fine. We'll come back at - How is 4:45? - I get home from work around 6:00. How about 5:15? You can try it. That might work. - Very well. We will come back at 5:15. - All right. Since it is your 15th anniversary at the company, I thought it might be appropriate to begin the festivities with a 15-minute round of applause. - I like it. - Followed by a 15-minute moment of silence. I don't know. Is it classy enough? Enough with the classy, OK? I just feel like after 15 years at this company Bravo, by the way. That we should celebrate with a classy event, a night to remember. You're right. This party has to have all the excitement, drama, and intrigue of my time here. And of course classy. And classy, yeah. You agree cause he's wearing a tux, don't you see what he's doing here? Last week, Dwight sent out a memo about the dress code so this is me showing him that I'm taking it very seriously. Here's one. A string quartet playing "classy-cal" music. You know That's good, but it's not classy. I need something classy, like the opening of a car dealership. That's it. Or Mr. Peanut. Mr. Peanut is not classy. He is a regular peanut. He just happens to have a cane, a monocle, and a top hat. - That's what makes him classy. - OK, how about this? An ice sculpture shaped like you, covered in chocolate, covered strawberries. You're trying too hard, and that's just not classy. The thing about classy is it's a state of mind. I'm sorry, I just don't know what classy is then. Let's try this one on for size. And I apologize, because it's right off the top of my head An ice sculpture Of you, completely surrounded - by chocolate-covered fruits. - Strawberries? - That's inspired. - I said that! Not classy. - Not classy at all. - Dclass. French! Classy. Proofreading: So. &amp; Valpi Episode 5x18 "New Boss" Hi, can I help you? I'm Charles Miner, here to see Michael Scott. Sure. Just one second. Have a seat. There's a Charles Miner here to see you. Miner? I hardly know her. Are you coming out now? Who have we here? It is Prince Charles Miner. At your service. Everybody, this is Sir Charles Miner. And he is the new VP for the Northeast region, So just give it up for this big guy, right? Give it up. Here he is. There he is. - Hi, everyone. - Hold that thought! I want everybody to go into the break room, I have a little surprise for you. Go ahead. You too. Would you escort our guest in there? Come on. Here we go, don't be shy. Don't be shy, you're one of us. Stall him a little bit. I'm going to get the fish. I wish you would've told the new boss was coming in. I didn't want to make everybody nervous. I mean, I could've brought a change of clothes. You look dynamite. What are you talking about? Very slick. Let me get the fish. Originally founded in 1866, Scranton quickly became one of Pennsylvania's largest anthracite coal mining communities. Surprise! There's nothing in here. The real surprise is in the conference room. Let's go! Come on! I'll finish it up later, but essentially what we're talking about is Surprise! As you can see, I turned the bagels from O's into C's, for Charles. - Took me all night. - This is what you did last night? I met this guy at corporate last week, and we were just digging each other's vibe. I was totally grooving on him, and vice-versa. And besides, the last two people to have his job were Jan and Ryan. The former was my lover, and the latter my best friend. So who knows? I do. It's going to be mental. It's going to be mental. He's like a black George Clooney. - Really? - I don't see it. I mean, he's okay, he's not unattractive. Hey, how you doing? I'm Jim Halpert, from sales. I just wanted to say if you need anything, let me know. Why are you wearing a tuxedo? I didn't think you'd notice. It's funny actually, there's another salesman out here, Dwight Schrute, he sent out this memo as he always does, and it was about professionalism in the workplace, and he singled me out. So I just had to mess with him. You'd understand it if you'd read the memo. There's probably one in the drawer. It was pretty crazy. But Not more crazy than wearing a tux at work, I grant you that. So, I'm going to - Your name's Jim? - Jim Halpert. Just going to let you get back to it. He just had to wear his tux today. - I thought it'd be funny. - Took him 40 minutes to get ready. All right, let me introduce you to some of the troops. Accounting, front and center. Come on up here, I'd like you to meet somebody. - This is the accounting department. - I come from accounting, too. Nerd alert. This is Oscar Martinez. He is latino. And he just got out of a long-term relationship with a man, Gil, who broke his heart. But he didn't bring that into work. It did not affect his job performance. And I'm very proud of him for that. Hey, Oscar. It's good to meet you. This little hell-raiser is Angela. She has slept with a bunch of different guys in the office. One over there, in the orange. Where's the other? You know, I don't need to know everyone's sexual history. Well, perfect. Because we have now arrived at Kevin, and he has no sexual history. How about I just say hi to everyone at one time? Good, good. Everyone, please give it up for Charles Miner. And thank you for the C-shaped bagels. - That's great. - Above and beyond. You know we're in tough times and we're not immune to this economy. - True. - But the goal is to, you know, fight our way through this. Stanley Hudson. Are there going to be layoffs? - No, absolutely not. - Hold on, Michael. Thank you. Stanley, you know We can't make any promises, but we'll try everything to avoid that. Do you have specifics? Michael should've filled you in last week. Due to the economy, there's a lot of worry going around, - I didn't want to worry people. - You didn't tell them? Why don't - What I told Michael - Charles is gonna tell you is that we are cutting Which means we will no longer be matching 401k contributions. And all overtime requests will need to come through the corporate office. Fantastic. - It's not official. - It is official. And actually guys, I'm encouraging branches to consider a freeze on discretionary spending. Such as salary benefits, et cetera. - Et cetera, insurance. - Not salaries Petty cash, supplies and you know, parties. Things like that. - What about your party? - OK, you know what? I think this has been great. I think this gives us a lot to think about, doesn't it? Charles Miner, ladies and gentlemen. He has a long trip home. Thank him for coming, we have to get back to work. - I'm going to stay for the day. - You don't have to. I've got this. This was just a meet and greet. It's more involved than that. I'm gonna set up in here. I am thrilled that the new boss has taken such an active interest in all of the responsibilities that I'm supposed to have. Thrilled. David, it was my understanding that I was not going to be managed. What gave you that idea? - It was my understanding. - I see. Why don't we just leave that position vacant? Truth be told, I think I thrive under a lack of accountability. Look, Michael. Charles is very qualified. Get to know him. I really think the two of you are gonna make a great team. - But the branch is still mine? - You're still the branch manager, yes. And if you need anything else at all, just let Charles know. Ask about the party. Right. Are you coming to my 15th anniversary party? - I'll give it my best shot. - No, the other thing. If we hired Cirque de Soleil as salaried employees, will that help us with the year-end tax stuff? You think he hung up? I got off the horn with David Wallace, and he said that you and I should try to get to know each other. And I agree. So, what I would like you to do is, tell me something that you've never told anybody before. Come on. What's your wife's name? Where did you work before? Saticoy Steel. Beautiful. See, African-Americans have such a rich history of unusual names. No, I worked at a company called Saticoy Steel. You're not from paper? - Does David know this? - Yeah, he just wants a good manager. Well, that actually is a excellent segway into really what is my only point. I don't need to be managed, Charles. And if you want to pick up some tips, observing here and taking them to the other branches, it's all good. Jan would mostly come by when she was super horny. And Ryan would come by to visit his parents and do laundry. So - Are we clear? - That's not how I plan on doing things. I'll just bounce that off David, see if it comes back. I'll tell David what he needs to know. Sorry. David wants it this way. Whatever David wants Michael Scott calling for David. Tell him to call me ASAP as possible. Come on, no. You have to charm them. David Wallace's office. Hey there, gorgeous. How you doing today? - I'm good, thank you. - How's it hanging? - All right. - Listen. My name is Michael Scotch. And I just wanted to say that I've got David Wallace's son in the trunk of my car. If he doesn't get on this phone in five seconds What are you doing? - David Wallace's office. - Hi, Stephanie. Michael Scott again. I just spoke with Michael Scotch. The son's going to be returned, everything's fine. And I really need to talk to David. Please hold. Charles Miner. Hello, who is this? - Who is this? - I was never given a name. Can I help you? I don't think that anyone here Hey everyone, lunch is on me today. - That is so unnecessary. - Are you kidding me with this? - On the day that I bring in breakfast? - It's no big deal. I wish you had told us sooner. Because I was going to go to the vending machine and get an egg salad. You still have that option. - Thanks again, Charles. - You're welcome. Nobody thanked me for breakfast, except Charles. You say, "no more parties," and then you spend money on lunch. I think it's a little hypercritical. I do this for every branch I go to. If you do not like it, then I think there are some bagels left over from this morning. Damnit, Stephanie, put me through to him. Is that him in the background? Pick up the phone. Should I seduce him? No, no one wants to see that. I just realized that I used the 2008 calendar to do the spreadsheets for January and February. I may need to come in this weekend to fix it. You wanna do some overtime this weekend? You know what, Kevin, I applaud your initiative. Yes, you may Sorry, Michael. No, Kevin, right? I'm gonna need you to do that during office hours. This is my branch. You don't ask Charles, you ask me. I say "approved". That's not the way it's going to work. No, it is not. No, it is not. - So we're on the same page, great. - So we're on the same page, great. - Seriously. How old are you? - Seriously. How old are you? I can tell Michael's mood by which comedy routine he chooses to do. The more infantile, the more upset he is. And he just skipped the Ace Ventura talking butt thing. He never skips it. This is bad. - Five-years-old. - Five-years-old. Dude, stop. - That's great. - That's great. Stop it. - I'm going to walk away. - I'm going to walk away. - You need to stop doing that. - I'm kidding around! Relax everybody. It was just a joke. It's fine. Boy, so touchy. PPC, let's continue our meeting in the conference room. And then out of that cake pops another stripper holding a smaller cake and then an even smaller stripper pops out of that one. - What is that smaller stripper holding? - A cupcake. It's cupcakes and strippers all the way down. What exactly is the PPC? That's the party planning committee. They spend hours planning parties. Excuse me, guys. - What's going on in here? - Party planning. Not your concern. This doesn't seem like a good way to spend company time. Really? How would we come up with great ideas like Jim's? Go ahead. - I would like to get work, actually. - What you got, Jim? What is a two-way petting zoo? You pet the animals, they pet you back. It's a great idea. And we have a cake in the shape of a bale of hay. It's just a regular-shaped cake. But it's cool This isn't a good use of company time. You're talking about my anniversary party. Everyone except for Michael, go back to your desks. - Thank you very much. - Here we go. - I'm dissolving this committee. - What? Come on, this is a work place. It isn't designed for your vanity. News flash: I've been here for 15 years. Headline: you have been here one day. End of story. You have no right to cancel my 15th anniversary party. End of story. - I don't care if I've - End of story! hurt your feelings or you do not agree with my methods, but it is over. You know what? I'm going to New York! And I am going to talk to David Wallace, I'm going to tell him everything. And I'm sorry to say you're screwed. And you know what? You are gonna be through. And I'm sorry. I'm sorry to do that to you. Right. Do you even know how paper is made? It's not like steel, you don't put it into a furnace. If you put paper into a furnace, you know what would happen? You'd ruin it. Come in. All right, Charles, I got to be honest, I think we really got off on the wrong foot here. And truth be told, I'm a smart guy. And a hard-worker and a great number two for the office. - Number two? - Second in command. To my goal. I didn't know that position existed. At first, it was a made up position for Dwight, just to make him feel better. Assistant to the regional manager. But then he lost that and Michael gave it to me. You're the assistant to the regional manager? - Assistant regional manager. - Any responsibilities come with it? No, not exactly. Do you want to keep this made up position? It's important to you? All right. I will - let you get back to it. - Would you OK, where is he? Is this the meeting you've been in all day? - How did you get here? - I drove. Cancelled, my 15th anniversary party. Just pulled the rug out from under me. He said, "no figs". I've already bought them. And I don't have a place to store them. So I feel like I've been sort of boned. Did you talk to him about this? You've talked to him all day, obviously. Did you talk to him about this? I didn't know about the figs, specifically Then I don't get it. It doesn't make any sense to me. Because I thought in the new system, that I was supposed to talk to Charles and then Charles talk to you, and that will dilute any need for me to ever talk to you again. - That's not exactly the new system. - Clearly, that's what you wanted. and I've sacrificed a lot. I've put having a family on hold. - We didn't ask you to do that. - And I've never gone hang-gliding. And I've never driven my car to the top of Mount Washington. OK, it was nice meeting everyone. I will see you in a couple of weeks. Excellent. It was very nice meeting you, Charles Miner. See you. See you. And for my next trick, I will make my career disappear. I can see our kids facing obstacles, behind half black and half indian but it's so worth it. There's just me here. I am gonna get him to buy me a prime rib tonight. I think he left. What? Move! Hello, Charles? Is that his scarf? Charles and Kelly? Absolutely not. He is a sophisticated man. He does not need to go dumpster diving for companionship. I don't understand that, after 15 years of service here, I have to get in the car and drive to New York in order to talk to you. That doesn't seem right to me. That doesn't seem fair. And I think that I've earned more than that. You're right. I get it, Michael. Here's what I'm gonna do. We will move some money around, and I will personally see to it that you have your party. You'll have your figs. I will be in attendance, it's gonna be great. How's that? I quit. What? You have no idea how high I can fly. I had no idea when I got into that car to go to New York that I was going to be quitting. I got on the ramp, and I was like, "two hours, two hours to go. "Feelin' good. Crank some tunes. Should have peed before I left." Get to the good part. Get up to building. Revolving door broken. So I have to take the normal door. At least he's in the building. I was so nervous, it was the wrong building. I had walked into the wrong building. He finally has a story we really want to hear. And he knows it. OK, focus, focus. You're in the right building. You're with the right people. - What happened? - I looked at Wallace and I said, "I quit." And as I turned to leave, I looked back and I said, "You have no idea how high I can fly." You didn't tell him how sick of him you were? Why would I do that? Wouldn't it feel good to tell him that he's incompetent That he's wasted Maybe spit in his face. You have thought about this a lot more than I have. I just winged it. I love a good quitting story. It makes me feel like I have control over my own life. Gives me hope. Maybe I'll have one of my own someday. But I dream. Proofreading: So. &amp; Valpi Episode 5x19 "Two weeks" About a week ago, Michael gave his 2 weeks' notice. Surprisingly, there is a big difference between Michael trying and Michael not trying. Michael, is that scotch? Scotch and Splenda. Tastes like Splenda, gets you drunk like scotch. Clinky clinky clink. Come on. Come on, come on. What am I gonna do? I'll tell you what I'm gonna do. A little bit of this, a little bit of that. I'm gonna stay up all day. I'm gonna sleep up all night. I'm gonna give it a and I'm gonna stop worrying about calories. Maybe you should go into your office, close the door, and make some calls about jobs. - I have a job. - For four more days. Do you have any leads? You don't understand At my level, you don't look for a job. - You are headhunted. - Have you called headhunters? Any good headhunter knows that I am available. Any really good headhunter will storm your village with overwhelming force and cut off your head with a knife. Right, 'cause that's what we're talking about. I need you to go over these client lists and indicate any wrong or false data. Your "I need you to" is my command. Can I talk to you? You can talk to me for as long as you want because I have all the time in the world. I just wanted to tell you that What's that? What is this about? 'Cause you're leaving and everything. It's a farewell. So I hope I get to work with you some day again. Me, too. - Is this wine? - Busted, yes. I already have wine. Isaac Silby here for the interview. Have a seat. It'll be a few minutes. You interviewing, too? Interviewing? For? Regional manager. Yes, I am. For regional manager, I've decided to go with an outside hire. For obvious reasons. - Where you from? - Philly. That's a drive. Well, this is one of the few places that's hiring. It's It's brutal out there. - When will the new copier be ready? - I'm working on it, Kev. You said it would be ready by today. And it is today. - It'll be ready soon. - "Soon" could mean anything. "Soon" could be three weeks. Is that what "soon" means to you? Sometimes. Then come back soon. During the course of business, a copier goes through something called "normal wear and tear." - I think it's 75 cents. - That's a lot. Bandit, no. Yesterday they delivered the new one. But they didn't set it up. So my day just got a little more interesting. It's monster.com. Singular. You work in paper long enough, you get to know the players. Hi, you've reached Prince Paper. We are sad to inform you that after 40 years of serving the community, we are no longer in business. Thank you for your support and may God bless you. What am I gonna do? You want me to come into your office? All right. Close your eyes. - I'd prefer not to. - Just close your eyes. I'm going to start my own paper company. You're starting your own paper company. Why? 'Cause I know paper. I know everything there is to know. Do you know that the industry is in decline? God, I practically invented decline. I know paper. I know how to manage. - I have a name. Close your eyes. - I did that. It added nothing. Just close 'em. "Michael Scott Paper Company." You want in? Do you want to be a part of this? I am not gonna do this. - and you are not going to, either. - Obvious - Agreed. Except - Here's the thing. What I wish for you is that you land a job at a company that "a," exists, and "b," has a salary because they're set up to do that kind of thing. What's up, Chuck? - What are you doing? - Nothing. Just talking. Michael handed in his notice. Did you also I didn't. - After you. - No, I'm staying. You want me to translate the german instructions? I'm sure they're pretty much the same as the english instructions. Typical american arrogance that got us involved in a war we never should have been in. World War II. Fine. Do the german instructions say what this is supposed to do? Deutsch. Let me see here. It is either an incense dispenser or a ceremonial sarcophagus. My german is pre-industrial and mostly religious. Listen, this order form Instead of "Dunder Mifflin", is there any way I could get it to say something else? Like "Michael Scott Paper Company"? Somebody's been talking in bed. Pillow talk. Listen, Michael. Have you really thought this through? 'Cause it's a big risk. This is a dream that I have had since lunch, and I am not giving up on it now. You could give it up though, right? And almost no one would know. Before you got here, I'm the one who landed all of these clients. Half of 'em, at least. I can do it again. I know the market. I know the price points. I'm on it. Don't worry. So how do I do that? You can scan it. And then you can upload the image, - then you can copy - Could I take a piece of paper and just tape it with transparent tape? Good. Thank you very much. So that is why I have to leave at 5:00 on Tuesdays. It's to pick up my little sisters from school. We're really tight. We're like the Kardashians. - You can run this stuff by Toby. - I don't like talking Come in. I didn't realize you were with anyone. But I wanted to bring you the brochure on that accounting seminar that I was telling you about earlier. We're in the middle of something It was so much fun last year. There was a sundae bar. I didn't have any You know, to stay trim. Did Michael just let anybody in his office? I loved invite us in all the time. He was like, "come in." I am aware of the effect I have on women. So you should be heading back to your desk. You'll let me know. She's such a special person. She's turning 50 this year. I'm starting my own paper company. No way! - In this climate? - In all climates. It's going to be worldwide. And I'm looking for some talented salesmen to join me. That's where you come in. It's a very intriguing concept, isn't it? Michael is starting his own paper company. What do you think about that? - Your own paper company. - Can you believe it? We'll see. It's a nugget of an idea right now, so. - Right. - Potential. Lots of potential. What a courageous venture. It's very courageous. Very exciting. Location is hard for me, with the farm and the responsibilities so With the farm. You getting to wherever I'm gonna put my thing. Think about it. Let's put a pin in it for now. I would love to put a pin in that. Everyone, can I have your attention? This is the moment you've all been waiting for. Right? Little Miss thing wants attention. It's a G-44. It's not ready, Kevin. I am at a crucial point where I have sunk four hours into that copier. And I am not gonna let it beat me like that wireless router did. - A note in my food? - I made it sterile. Just to say "sterile" doesn't make it so. I am offering you the opportunity of a lifetime, to come work for me. Do you have a business plan? A funding request? Market research? Financials? You need those things. Most new businesses, they don't make a profit till at least two years. And then your margins will be razor-thin. Best-case scenario, you don't cut a salary for at least 5 years. Can you go five years without a salary? - Five years? - You already have the job. - You don't have to convince me. - It's just not prudent. Can't you see I'm urinating? Listen. You don't need to answer me now. Just I want you to think about it. I am starting my own company. You're not letting me finish, and you just lost out on $1 million. No, I didn't. You know what? I had a great time at prom. And no one said "yes" to that, either. How's it working? Let's see. It's fine. I did it. I learned everything about this machine. I know all the buttons, even the inside ones. I know all the error messages. I could do a bound book in plastic with offset colors. Which feels You ready? I can't pretend I haven't seen that. I'm gonna ask you to stand up, walk out, and you can't take anything. I have immunity. It's my two weeks Not if you're starting a competing paper company. You really think Hank is going to be loyal to you? Please escort Charles from the building. Come on, man, let's go. I always thought Michael got a bad rap. He's a good guy, and he's super funny. Maybe I should tell him before he goes. He's all the way over there. Well, here we are. I would just like to You're done, Michael. All right, then, everybody. I'm out of here. - What is he doing? - It looks like he's saying something. I think he's singing. I can't believe this is really happening.  and I feel free. And just like that, as mysteriously as he arrived, he was gone. The whole office feels darker. You know? It's just a sad, dark day. - He's gone. - I know. You don't have to kiss his ass anymore. Michael's like a movie on a plane. It's not great, but it's something to watch. And then when it's over, you're like, "How much time is left on this flight? "Now what?" Don't look down. Look straight up. Come on. Please. For employees only. Angela, Kevin, help me out. I need a few things. Then I'll be gone. Why is it that you asked everyone except me, Angela, Creed and Meredith? I was going to. I wanted to, but I had to start somewhere. And you didn't want to start with us? Of course not. But now I want everybody. Buddy. Buddy. Jimbo. Did you have time to think about my offer? I did, but then I thought about something else. So which way are you leaning? It is tempting, but I am 100% leaning towards passing. Did anyone see the client list that Michael was supposed to be working on? Let me know if you find it. We don't have much time. Just act normal. Don't look at me. Stop. Don't look down. He's gonna see me. Not all the way up. Keep 'em at a normal height, OK? This is not Michael talking right now. This is your future. I am your future. You are older and you are very happy now because you went with Michael Scott, right? So everybody, come on down, and let's just crawl out of here together. All right? Come on. Are you doing your best here? Are you being the best that you can be? Everybody who's gonna go with me, I want you to stomp your foot. All right. Come on. You're coming with me. Come on, Phyllis. Here we go. Here we go. Get up. All right. Time to go. Time to go. Jim, let's go. Come on! - What are you doing? - I think maybe Hank should be here. No, I don't need Hank. You're gonna mess with me? I'll tell you something, Charles. I don't even care because I've got nothing to lose. All right. It's not worth it. What? I'm going with him. What? I'm going. You can't be serious. Michael, wait! I'm coming with you. You are? It's gonna be great. Great. Except I don't want to be a receptionist anymore. Right. - Executive assistant. - Salesman. All right. - Deal. - Deal. - Well, Jim? - Still no. Well, let's go. All my stuff is still upstairs. - Are people watching? - Probably. It's not how you leave an office. We're having a company meeting here. - I will bring all your stuff home. - OK, I'll see you later. See you later. So we had a personnel change today. Shouldn't affect our day-to-day, but until we get a new receptionist, I want Kevin on the phones. Phones. Also, there's been way too much wasting time. So Stanley I want you on top of that. I want you to be my productivity czar. Good. That's it on my list so, no excuses, guys. Let's get going, OK?   You gonna answer that, kev? Right. Thanks. Dunder mifflin. This is kevin. Please hold while i transfer you. Oscar, your mom. Charles is having kevin cover the phones for a while. How do i say this diplomatically? I think kevin is doing exactly as well As anyone might have expected someone like him To perform in a position like that. Please hold. Andy, phone call. No, stay there. Kev, i thought we nailed the whole transfer thing earlier. Yeah, i wrote it on my hand. But then i washed it. It's transfer, extension, then transfer again. Okay. Andy, get ready. - transfer, Extension - Here we go. - transfer. - Ah. Oh, man. It is 134. - Kev. - Kev, come on. Hustle. - You are murdering the nard dog. - this is kev Please hold, and i will transfer you. - You're bad at this too. - just Don't answer that call. Just transfer the damn call. Your call is very important to us. Please - hey! - Ho! Andy bernard. My maid died. The office 520 Today's my first day at my new job At michael scott paper company incorporated. You know, apple computer started in a garage. And we're starting in a condo. Soe cealady have a leg up on apple. Look, it's official. Oh, good, my hooker's here. Kidding. Hi. Michael, you were expecting me, right? Yes, i was. Yes, i was. A you wearing anything under the robe? That is inappropriate, pam. Come on in. This looks great, michael. Thank you. Would you like some french toast? Yes, please. What shape? - Square is fine. - All right. Just wanted to fill you in on a few details. As you know, i will be running the branch while we search For michael's replacement, So please feel free to come to me With any questions or concerns. Yeah. Where will you be staying while you're in scranton? Stay? In a hotel. Charles, where were you born? Actually, i meant questions More about the day-To-Day operations of the company. Okay. Yeah? How are operations at the company? Just day-To-Day. Okay, let's go over non-Discretionary cuts. Okay, guys? thank you - So - can you please stop that? - What? - You're breathing very heavily. - His is how i breathe. If you have a problem-- - No, it's not. Okay, jim halpert. - I need your eyes up front. - Oh, no, i was just no, hey, hey. I just want to hear, "yes." Yes. Good. As i was saying oh, no, the new boss do not find jim adorable. Oh. So what do you say we get started? After breakfast. I'm full. So how you feeling about the new company? I feel good. Wow. You excited about the new mpany? Yeah, i'm excited to start the company. After breakfast. We did that. So what's next? Michael, just stop for a second. - Michael, stop for a second. - No, i'm whipping it. - No, i know you are. - Just let go. - Just let me have the-- - Let go, please. - Just give me-- - Fine. Oh, i'm sorry. I'm sorry. I can't do this. This is pathetic, isn't it? I am such an idiot. I gave up the only job i ever loved to do this? I have egg in my crocs. I never see him drink. I never see him eat. I don't think he even uses the bathroom. Oh, he does. He does. I feel weak today. I felt much stronger yesterday. Like benjamin button in reverse. You know, michael, when i feel overwhelmed i'm not overwhelmed, pam. I know. No, i'm saying that when i feel overwhelmed, Something i like to do is make a list. Make a list of things to do And then start with the easy stuff. - Whatever calms you down. - Okay. First, work out. And, hey, look, you did that. Check. Eat an enormous breakfast. - Check. - Don't patronize me, pam. I think you should get dressed. I'm not getting dressed. I'm not getting dressed. I have too many things to do before i get dressed. I need to find 100 clients. Michael, that seemsmpossible. It's totally impossible. We need to come up With one realistic thing that we could do today. Assemble a sales team. A dream team. Great. Okay, ryan. No. What? Why? He's everything i'm not, and everything i am. He's the whole package. No, we're not gonna hire ryan. Um, oh, vikram! Best salesman i've ever met. - Okay. - He worked at that telemarketing place. - We'll find him. - Okay. Oh, also, we have a meeting this afternoon With a potential investor. - Really? We have an investor already? - yeah Maybe. Barbara kevis. She invests in local businesses. And i'm putting together a little presentation for her. Michael, that's fantastic. Yeah, i guess it's not so bad. Got a few things cooking. - Um. - Hey. We need to get you dressed. I have doubts about this too. But when one person freaks out, Sometimes it weird makes the other one calmer. That's one thing i've learned about relationships. I hate that i just used the word relationship. Hey. You look great. - Let's go. - All right. Ah. You a soccer fan? Oh. Oh, yeah. I'm so embarrassed. You weren't supposed to see this. This is like my secret obsession. Well, that makes two of us. - No way. - yeah I hate soccer. But guess who doesn't hate soccer? Charles minor. I was actually in germany for the 2006 world cup finals. Oh. You bastard. That should have been me. Yeah, i love the sport. I love the sport. - All right, man. - Cool. I've never been a kiss-Up. It's just not how i operate. I mean, i've always subscribed to the idea That if you really want to impress your boss, You go in there and you do mediocre work. Halfheartedly. Next on the list, open the mail. Oh, wow. Michael scott paper company. Okay. Very official. "Dear mr. Scott, "Please be advised that it is in violation "Of yourondominium agreement To conduct a business headquartered "In your residence. The penalty of forfeiture of residence" No, okay. It's fine. It's fine. We're just gonna add, "find office." How are we gonna find an office? How can we pay for an office? ??? Song parodies. Okay, okay. Achy breakfart. Great. Let's sing it in the car. No, no, no. My stumps. Likemy humps, but a guy with no legs. - Yeah. - We can do this. We can do this. Whoa, and he just goes boom. - Yeah. Score. - That's pele. You know your soccer, man. I prefer maradona. Diego maradona from argentina. I didn't know we had so many soccer fans in the office. I mean, to be fair, i was the first one To talk about it, but what about you, jim? Are you a fan of the game? Oh, no. No. Not really. Well, it's not for everybody, i suppose. That's 'cause i'm more of a player. - Yeah? - Youet. - Really, jim. I had no idea you played soccer. 'Cause you never, ever talk about it. - Well, i do. I play. - Wow. - You can be so modest sometimes. - Maybe we should get back to work. Maybe you and charles should kick the soccer ball around. Maybe we will someday. Maybe you will tonight after work. What do you say? That's a great idea, dwight. Great ideas are just part of what i bring To the table. I don't try and be anything that i'm not. What do you say, jim? Huh? Wanna play some soccer? - Jim, what do you say? - Hey, anybody else? - I'm in it to win it. - Sounds fun. - Game on. - Okay. See you on the field there, bro. - See you. - See you on the field. I can't wait. Yup, i used to play soccer in school. From second to fourth grade. I was on the orange team. - We got vikram. - You got me. Where are we going? We have a meeting with an investor today. Yes, we do. So get excited. But i have to go to the bathroom real quick. If you'll excuse me, i'll be right back. Okay. He seems really confident. - He can be. - Confidence-- It's the food of the wise man, But the liquor of the fool. Hmm. I'm looking forward to getting to know you better, vikram. Hey, i would like a pair of size nine, please. - It's michael. - I'm swamped, michael. Happy birthday to sally in lane 27. Okay, imagine a company that has no memory Of your past misconduct because they have no files. He's taking a long time. Is it possible he's bowling? I mean, you know him better than i do. Yes. Yes, it's possible. Well, it has alwa bn a lifelong dream-- Michael. What's going on? - I am-- - Hey, ryan. - ??? Excuse me. Yes? - This wasn't on the list. - Yes, it is. - No. It's not. - Yes. It is. When did you add this to the list? Pam, everyone deserves a second second chance. Ryan, just out of curiosity, How much do you get paid here? $60,000 a year. You get paid by the year at the bowling alley. What do you make, secretary? Back to work, shoe bitch. I told you guys, i'm really busy here. Would you like to come to work For the michael scott paper company? What size shoes are you guys? - Uh, nine. - What are those? A men's ten? No. - Look what he's doing. - What is he doing? He's stealing 'em. Okay, okay. - Oh, my gosh. - He's already paying for himself. Sorry! - Where is it? - Right here. Hey, come on, guys, tse are prime selling hours, you know. - Minor - oh, there he goes. - Sees his partner, halpert - yikes. - He looks up, defend doyle - oh, man. He shuts him up. come on He shuts him up. - Yeah. - alright oh! Goal. Man, i can't wait to play with you. Oh, it's gonna be the worst. Do you guys wanna hear about thailand? - Oh, yeah. - Sure. It was indescribable. Sounds awesome. What sort of investing club is this? Vikram, you ask a lot of questions, and i like that. Hey, na. Hi. - Na? - Michael. People turn to their families All the time when they need help starting out. And if my na's investment club can help The michael scott paper company become a reality, Then i'm sure that's what she would have wanted. Does want. Well, i'm sure that you must all have very, very busy schedules, So i appreciate you meeting with us here today. What this is is a business that i have worked toward My entire life. Hey. I have assembled what i believe to be The most exciting, sought-After talent In the industry today. Ladies and gentlemen, i present to you the dream team. From our very own scranton, pennsylvania, pam beesly. Pretty pam is always reaching for the stars, And someday she may just surprise us all And grab one. Meet vikram. From his humble beginnings as a-- Stay standing-- From his humble ginnings as a prominent surgeon, He risked it all to become the most successful telemarketer In the lipophedrine industry. And do not call it a comeback. The youngest vice president in the history of dunder mifflin And recent bowling alley employee, ??? ??? Of a splash in paper. - So let's hear it. - Okay. I have spent the last 15 years Learning the ins and outs of the paper industry. With a lean, mean fighting crew and low overhead, I thini can perform the same business At a much, much higher rate of profit. How do you expect to turn a profit in this economy? By wanting it more. By working hard. What's your mission statement? My mission is stated as follows: I will not be beat. I will never give up. I am on a mission. That is the michael scott guarantee. Come on, oscar. What positions do people play? - Wing. - Leg. Jim, what do you play? - Left. - Forward or half? - Forward, definitely. - Okay, striker, huh? - Striker. - Let's see what you got in those legs. All right. - All right, let's do it. No, no, no. No, there's supposed to be the kickoff. Kickoff. My strategy is to touch the ball as little as possible. Chalk it up to teamwork. All right. And i offer same day, free delivery. Michael, i don't know about this. Nana, i really think that papa would want you To do this. I'm not so sure. Well, what ist exactly? What-- What specifically? It doesn't have to be paper. We could sell medicine and other see, this is what concerns me. We could just give him a chance. It's not much money. Well, this may not be the right time, But i need more than i originally asked for. It's ???? an investment club. - Okay. - I love you, michael. I do. Okay. But no. I mean it. No. I thought nana raised some good questions. What kind of a name is nana? It means grandmother. Oh, sweet jesus. Look, i'm sorry to do this, But can you drop me back at the telemarketing building? You know, michael, you want to succeed? You got to apply the same-- Get him, jim. Come on, tough d, jim. - AH! - Oh, my god. Oh, wow. Jim, what the phyllis, are you okay? Are you okay? No, i swallowed a crown. Why'd you duck, jim? - What? - Yeah, jim, why would an experienced scer player Like yourself duck at the very last moment? Okay, i'm just gonna go get some ice. Does that make you feel better? Huh? - I-I'm sorry, phyllis. - Oh, yeah, jim's sorry. Do you get tnt? The station? Do you get tnt? Yeah, i have cable and satellite as a backup. Yeah, i know, two not-So-Great things in a row. Well, well, stuff happens. Right? At least we got ryan. The ry-Guy. We should call him ry-Bread. We don't have to call him that. Unless you like it. We could call him that. I can't do this. What's that? I can't do this. I had a real job. I sat ten feet away from my fiance. I had health benefits. I was just feeling impulsive. I should have gotten a tiny tattoo on my ankle. Yecch. I just keep getting bored. And i let things build up and build up, And then i do something too big. Like this. Who does this? Well, you know what? My mom always used to say that average people Are the most special people in the world, And that's why god made so many-- We don't have any money. We don't have an office. We don't have anything. Well, we should make a list. Lists are good. Lists are good. Lists are good. First on the list, let's get you out of the car. All right? Okay. How come out of everyone in the office, I'm the only one who went with you? Is it because i'm that stupid? I mean, your own grandmother doesn't even believe in you. I want you to listen to me. Because i want to tell you The situation that we are both in right now. Okay? You quit your job. I quit my job. We both quit. Those are the facts. That's what happened. Now what are our choices right now? Because, you know what, kiddo? You quit. - Yeah. - So what are our options? Well we can start this paper company. We can try. Or that's it. That's o only option. Because we quit. Pam, i do my best work when people don't believe in me. I remember in high school, My math teacher told me i was gonna flunk out, And know whai did? The very next day, i went out, And i scored more goals than anyone In the history of the hockey team. See what i mean? I thrive on this. I thrive on it. So i'm gonna go inside. I'm going to make some calls. I'm gonna get us an office space, And i'm going to show you Why you joined this company, all right? You gotta have some extra space, billy. Work with me here. There's gotta be some sort of secret office That you have lurking around. Something awesome and free. And you keep it off the books. Oh, no, not there. That would be humiliating. I did what i had to do. I stepped in. I took charge. That's what being a man is. And earlier today, i was freaking out. Pam stepped up. She was the man. Don't think a woman can be a man? Well, then that's your stereotype. Not mine. Okay. I could work here. I could see this. It's right in the middle of the pap belt. Are you good? Yeah, i'm good. You good? I'm good. You know what they say. Keep your friends close. Michael. - You're back. - Yes, i am, charles. Except this time you have no legal right to kick me out. Because i have started my very own paper company Right here in the building. If i were you, charles minor, I would watch your step. Because the michael scott paper company is about to open A big old can of whoop-Ass on dunder mifflin. Actually, a six-Pack. We're gonna open a six-Pack of whoop-Ass. He looked scared. It's britney, bitch. And i am back in the form of a new company-- The michael scott paper company. Okay. Not gonna make this one. Love thhair. - Good morning, michael. - Hello. They took away my parking space, But they can't take away my pride. I would like to invite you all to come along with me On a journey. Welcome to theichael scott paper company. The office 521 You know, i thought we could take the customer on a then then we could You realize you're not actually talking to me, right? - Then - Hey, kelly? Yes, charles. You wanted me. Oh, no, i meant-- I meant that kelly. The new receptionist is also named kelly. So kelly kapoor has decided to hover around my desk So that she can run into charles' office Every time he calls for kelly. She thinks that if she says "you wanted me," enough, He will, in fact, want her. It's not the worst plan she's ever had. Oh, and, kelly Yes, charles yes, you wanted me. Okay, i'm gonna call you kapoor, okay. And you hannon. If we're changing names, can i be erin? It's my middle name. Erin? Okay. That's very pretty. Thanks. Well, you know what my middle name is? Rajani ghanda-- And i hate it! I hate it! I thought rajani ghanda was a boy's name. We are in the heart of it. And the surge of water carries our business Out to the sea. What should we do now? We wait and hope that people show up To the pancake luncheon. ??I think i have done absolutely everything you can do To prepare for the day. I've updated our contacts. I have gotten quotes from suppliers. I have sent out an e-Vite for our big, Grand-Opening pancake luncheon. Six yeses, one maybe, only 11 nos. and 788 not yet replieds. But of that group, 782 have viewed it. I'm going to need ??Coupon for unparalleled customer service. I make that one copy And i become the girl who makes copies. And by the end of the day i'm receptionist again. And the worst part is, i like making copies. The paper comes out all warm and stuff. And it's cold in there, 'cause it's technically a closet. What do you think? Let me check. Oh, no! Clearly a hunter Who knows how to throw an outfit together. Thank you. Yes, i am taking andy hunting after work. Not long ago we were sexual competitors. I used to hate him, hate him, hate him, hate him. I studied him to figure out why i h.?? But that blossomed into a very real friendship, As these things often do. You should come into town this weekend, man. Yeah, we'll hang out scranton style. Hey, you said you were gonna be out of town this weekend. Please don't listen to my phone calls. Yeah, she's like, um She'd probably be a six in new york, But she's, like, a seven here in scranton. Then the boss is my old boss from dunder mifflin. It's a small space. Hey, jim, can i get a-- hi. Hi. I need a rundown of your clients. Can you give that to me? - Sure. - Yeah? - Yeah. - Okay. What the hell is a rundown? When did you need that rundown by? - As soon as possible. - Okay. - Just get it right. - Yeah. Gotcha. Of course. I'm gonna dive into the rundown. I'll be exhausted, 'cause it's like a triathlon. Did you want to close this? Close--Keep it You know, there's a ghost in this office. Really? A woman was murdered on this very floor in 1816. Haddie mcgonagle. she was a prostitute. Why was she in this building? No, this whole place used to be a brothel. There was a tavern on the ground floor. - That's crazy. - Yeah, isn't it? She was bludgeoned to death By the business end of a riding crop. - Oh, my god. - It was gruesome. They say she walks these hallways. If you ever feel a tapping on your shoulder, That could be haddie, begging for her life. And it could mean that you're next. Just kidding. You finding everything okay? - Yeah. - Yeah? Got some ice. Oh, this is awkward. So i'll see you guys around. ??Buddy. Hey, ryan, could you get to that copy from before? ??Ter at that stuf that is so insulting. How is it insulting to say that you're good at something? Because the thing that you're saying i'm good at Is pushing a big green button a bunch of times. I'm not judging it. It's like I could run gm, but i couldn't fix a car. It's not saying that one is better than the other. Seriously? 'Cause it sounds like one of those Is better than the other. - what the hell?! - Listen, listen, listen, listen, listen! I need somebody to make a copy of this! Because i don't make copies. I'm the boss. Got it? - I make originals. - Yeah, i make originals too. - Shut up. - stop it! Stop it! Bickering stop it! - Really. - Yeah. not much. What's up with you? No, that's okay. I'm in the bathroom. Hey, you been watching damages this year? It's so good. No, you gotta tune in. It's as good as anything on hbo. Hey, does blue go with tan? Somebody just make the copy. I have, like, a blue shirt. I don't wear a lot of colors ?? Just make that copy, okay? Seriously? This is what's so important, Putting naked pictures on the desktop. That's me and my friend jasmine, from thailand. I don't want to look at your friend jasmine's boobs all day. You could be hot too if you made any effort at all. Like how? Dying my hair blonde? This is from the sun. Oh, yeah, i bet. They're getting on my nerves, mom. Both of them. R thinks he's too good to be here, And p is not as much fun without jim. ??Mic c hear you. I'm on the phone. Please. Mom, i'm gonna have to call you back. P is being a giant b. ?? No, don't take that. Give that back. - Give it back for what? - ?? What are you?? - ??Ina make a spread sheet. - You're gonna make another spread sheet. - Yeah, exactly. - ?? - It's my turn. Come on! Ryan! - ?? They always say that it is a mistake To hire your friends. And they are right. So i hired my best friends. And this is what i get? Hey, buddy, what are you up to? nerthin. ?? ??to erin earlier, I noticed that your pupils dilated And your skin?? And i'm assuming a little bit of blood rushed In.?? ??Well, a little bit of blo rushed into ne as we. So where does that leave us? The last thing i wanna do is step on your funk, man. And i yours. So i will cede her to you. - No, that's ridiculous. - No, no, no. Look, you've been here longer. And besides, i'm a better wing man Than i am a boyfriend, so I just want you and i to hang out, you know. Just ??N up. It has come to my attention that some people in this office Are not getting along with other people in this office. And i think i have come up with the reason why. This office space is too small. - Definitely. - Okay. There are four corners in this room. Each corner is to be a personal space For each one of you. Whichever corner you want. And make it your own. - We could work from home. - Or you could fire one of us. - Whoever has less education. - Okay, guys, thank you for the offers. But i want you to get pumped about this corner idea. All right? One, two, three, Wha do ?? Corner idea. No, you're supposed to say rock the house! - Rock the house. - How would we know that? Hey, dude, do you know what a rundown is? Use it in a sentence. can you get this rundown for me? Try another sentence. This rundown better be really good. I don't know. But it sounds like the rundown is really important. Charles asked me to do this rundown Of all my clients. Why don't you just ask him-- No, i can't. It was, like, hours ago. What have you been doing? Try another sentence. Last night was crazy. Jojo yeah. He did a doughnut in the parking lot In front of a cop. And then he yells, "hey, cop, you like doughnuts?" Then we drive off. ??Noust stayed there. I want that new phone. No, the other one. No, the other one. No, you know which one i'm talking about. It's the one-- No, the one with the awesome browser. no, not that one. that's my corner. I thought that was your corner. No, this is where i work. I can't relax in the same corner where i work. ??Myorner's the one with the copier? Pam, i don't make the rules. Yeah. ??I wish my ipod couldmake phone c No, i don't want an iphone. I know what an iphone is. You started on that rundown yet? Oh, this is just something i'm takinoh.Eak with.?? But i will get back to the rundown, - right now. - Okay, great. Hey you know what, Do you have a rundown that i could take a look at, Just so i know what type of rundown you're looking for? Just keep it simple. Keeping it simple That's what i'm doing. But i am working hard on this one--Real hard. You're working hard on this? No, not--Not too hard. Not hardright.?? ?? I mean, why work harder than you should? no, i-- - Can i help you? - No, thanks. - Hey. - Hey, i'm here to see charles. Okay. - Hey, charles. - Hey, pam. I know you're a very busy man, So i'll cut rito the chase.?? Okay. I'd like my old job back. I don't know what to tell you-- The job's been taken. Well, i could come back as a salesman. I have experience now. Or i could come back as your personal assistant. You know, sort your mail, set your appointments. I know all the people. ?? Personal shop?? No. Well, it was great catching up with you. And i'll see you around the building. Okay. I'm just gonna sit here for a little bit longer, If that's okay. The air smells so good. I don't remember it smelling so good. The chairs ata?? Oh, hey! Stanley, phyllis, come on in. Welcome, welcome. Let me give you the tour. I get it. Do you need to see more? - It's really cute. - Thank you. You remember ryan. And pam is around here somewhere. She's upstairs talking to charles. What for? I don't know. Are we staying till 5:00? ?? Maybe the michael scott paper company was A huge mistake. I should leave. ?? ???That'l Get your free pancakes. They are delicious. They are nutritious. They are complimentary. Young sir, would you like a free pancake? I'm texting. I don't want to get my hands sticky. Ryan, enough with the texting machine. Come on. And tuck in your shirt. You're the face of this company. - Hey, pam. - Hey. You sorta disappeared there for a while--Where you been? Yeah, i needed to take care of some stuff. Yeah? That's as specific as i'd like to be. Well, at least you're still being honest with me. There's the rundown you asked for. I may have expanded some areas that you weren't prepared for. Great, fax that to everyone on the distribution list. sure. Do you want to look at it first? Do i need to? No, no, no, i just Wanted to make sure we have the same format. So the distribution list is gonna be my-- - What's that? - The one i have. I'll use the one i have. Just faxing my dad a rundown. ?? Ll, but we're ea do you have a card??? Nope, i don't have a card, but i'll do you one better. A little scrap of paper. ?? These are terrible, boss. You've gotta make 'em in a circle So that they cook evenly. - They're shaped like paper. - I don't even want these. ?? * ?? * * ??? * ??I like that song. you're good. - You're good. - Thank you. That was great, but it's just sort of-- It's still a little choppy like. But don't worry, it's hard. I mean, it took me a while too. It's like What? Oh, my god, you heard that? I'm so embarrassed. - I'm so, like, rusty. - It was good. You're really coming along. It's really technically proficient, ??But yort or soul in it. Really? Hey, you want to sing with me? * almost heaven * * west virginia * * blue ridge mountains * * shenandoah river * In german! * ?? * * ??? * * younger than the mountains * * blowin' like a breeze * * ?? * * to the place i belong * * ??Virg * * ?? * * take me home country roads * Take it, andy! * take me hom?? * * to the place i belong * ?? I once had a dream that i was eating??Ut butter an. And let me tell you something, it was delicious. So the next day i decided to make that sandwich. And in real life it is disgusting. It is a disgusting sandwich. And the reason i tell you this story Pick up the phone. Just-- Dunder--Michael scott paper company, this is pam. Hi, russell from the pancake luncheon. How are you? Well, we'd like to do business with you too. ?? ??? - keep going. - tell him we have free delivery. we already offered free delivery. ??They doknow that. i can offer you free delivery?? At ace tod God! Okay. 20 boxes? Uh, i can do-- Just a second. - ?? - I can do 20 boxes at $43 a box Great. Write it down. - ?? - ?? - ?? - Just say the word. And i guarantee That you will be satisfied. 'Cause your satisfaction is our guarantee. We guarantee it. We look forward to doing business with you too. Thank you, russell. - Yes! - I made a sale! - You did. - ?? yeah - We did it. - She did it. ?? ??? ?? Who would have thought that the thing That would save this company would be work? And pancakes. In the end, this day definitely had its ups and downs. I realize that we don't have the biggest office. Which is a surprise because But we have people with the biggest hearts. And i think for a small company, that is real-- Someone went to the bathroom. That is really what's important. Literally, every song is better a cappella. Name a song. Cherry pie. Warrant. - Better a cappella. - No. - Really? - Yeah. Name another. Enter sandman. Metallica. Better a cappella. Rebel yell. Billy idol. Oh, way better a cappella. - Really? - Yeah. Things are a little slow here, And there's only so much cold calling you can do in a day. Turns out there's no limit to the number of cheese puffs Yocan throw at someone's face. We're getting pretty good at it. Proudly presents season5 episode22 Andy put down a bunch of deposits On stuff for his wedding with angela, But then she was sleeping with dwight Forseveral years. Wait,no,that can't be right. The timeline's messy. Anyway,now we are going bargain hunting In the haunted graveyard of their love. This is my solo. Ba dum bum bum Ba dum bum bum Ba dum bum m Ba dum-- I'm confused. Am i walking down the aisle toyou can call me al? Trust me,you will not be walking. You will be boogie-Ing. I am extremely interested. So how much will all of this cost? Well,12 guys,airfare,three nights in a hotel, Food per diem,table up front for merch $9,000. I don't know. It-- It seems like a lot For an a cappella group From a college we never went to. Did you even hear the music i just played for you? What's wrong with you? Seleeves are cutting off my circulation. Not enough blood getting to my hands. I think you look nice. Doesn't charles know he's compromising my attack readiness? It'sot a dress code. It's a death sentence. - Looking good. - 'Kay,thank you. It's a straight jacket! Okay. When michael was in charge, This place was like the roman empire. And the wild west. And war-Torn poland. And poland. There was just a lot going on, So what you wore to work Was the least of anybody's worries. And in that chaos, I soared. - Hey. - Hey. Ed's tires is thinking of making a change. Is this good? They have some great kitchen ideas. Oh. Okay. Ed's tires,huh? It's small,i know. I really appreciate it. Thanks,michael. What-- Whats this? It's for your trouble. Wh-- I don't need $6 to help a friend. No,no,listen, As a friend,i want you to have it. Michael,you know i can't take this. Yes,i do. But don't forget you owe me $10. That was four years ago. Why don't you let it go?Michael. What was up with pam being all pushy and negative in there? I think she just didn't want a crucifix cake. It scares me to see you going down a road that i went down. Am i going down a road? When i see her bossing you around like that, It just makes me wonder If this thing really has the legs To go the distan. It's so scary How right the things you're saying are, And you're coming at it with almost no knowledge, So of course i trust your opinion on this. I know a few things about love-- Horrible,te awful,awfulthings. I was gonna use today to purge my inbox, But now something much more pressing has come up. Ed's tires. Why don't you tell them That we have fewer clients, So that we can spend more me with each of them. Also try to discuss it over indian food, And try to mention how you distrust women. I'm not gonna do that. That is smart. That would not seem genuine. - Ryan? - I can get there. Good. You take the lead on this one. Also,dnoforget that he has just gone through a messy divorce. Oh,awesome. Bring it in.Morning cheer. U-G-L-Y You ain't got no alibi you ugly You ugly You mama says you ugly Go michael scott paper company! I'm here. I'm part of this now. You needed to speak to me? Dwight,take a seat. I prefer to stand. Less blood clots. Nah,that's weird. You're gonna sit. Great. You know,dwight, It has been quite a transition for all of us. Are you happy with the way things have been runnin' lately? Why do you ask? Do you mean compared to the way things ran with other bosses? Comparisons arhard. I've just been impressed with your performance, And i wanted to make sure good work doesn't go unnoticed. Your concern is noted. Yeah,i like your work ethic. You're sofocused. Like a wolf. Thank you. And i wanna start givin' you more responsibility. What do you say you and i go out for a dri this week? Really? Definitely. It's firm. I need you to get me the prices That you're charging ed's tires, So i can undercut dunder mifflin. I don't know that i can do that now. You know,uh,something's come up. Oh,n-- Is it mose? Did you put the cover on that well? No,mose is fine. I-- I roped it off. It's not about mose. Listen,things are changing here,michael. They're changing fast. I'm not following you. Imagine Someone has a personal hero they really wanna help, But then there's this new guy, Very cool,very will smith-Esque, Who would not like it if he helped his hero. Personal hero,cool new guy. Okay,i think i'm getting your drift. Good,so you see what i'm saying? Crystal clear. So is this for a movie that you're writing? - No. - Can i use it? No. Dwight,are you talking about us? It is possible that i could be talking about us. Someone could say It is like the situation that we are in now? Itisthe situation we are in now. So,i would say That the old boss has always been good to dwight, And he was there first, So he has dibs. You respect dibs,don't you? I'm not a barbarian. Good. Will you et me in I will. - Dwight. - Yes? Is the cool new guy charles? I've said too much. Is it stanley? Hey,andy. You know,i been thinkin' about what you said,and "Noishe." i just don't know if i can do it. That's interesting,because what i hear you saying Is that you do want to do it,which means you can do it. Believe me,i broke up with angela, And i'm,like,the happiest guy ever. I mean,i'm so happy. I'm so happy. Like,total freedom,you know? It's just that pam gets me through the day,you know? I really rely on her. I'm pretty emotionally needy. And you know what? I am here for you. Let me be your traveling pants. Ah,what'd you do that for? You know that i was doin' this. Totally. Okay. Hello,dwight. What's with the shirt? Are you all right? I'm sorry,michael. Hi,michael. Oh,my god. Run! Run! It's a setup. Setup! No,mich-- Michael. Dwight,run! Michael,no. Let's beool,okay? You be cool. Yes. Just-- What's goin' on? We need to talk about our two companies, And how we should behave. Dwight tells me you've been pestering him for company info. Mm-- Do Dwight would not-- - He did. - I did,michael. I was upset about the shirt sleeves at first, But now i'm okay with it. Michael,i want you to stop pestering my salesmen, And i want you to leave dunder mifflin alone. Do you understand? Iunderstandnothing. Wow. Michael,are you all right? It was a setup. Dwight told charles. He told him. Tell us what you're talking about. It's like a girl says she'll make out with you, But then her boyfriend is waiting around the corner With a pee-Filled balloon. Wcan't help you if you don't just tell us what happened. I got hit in the face with a pee-Filled water balloon, Pam,okay? I don't know how they did it. They filled the balloon with pee. A funnel? I don't know. Is that clear enough for you? Hey,jim. I just totally blew a sales call. Bro,i do that all the time. Yeah,well,with you it's different,okay? 'Cause i just-- I just suck. I just-- I suck! Tuna,be nice to my friend jim,okay? Why? When i look in the mirror, I don't like the face that looks back. Well,so what? Your body's a ten. - Forget it. - Jim. I said forget it. - Dwight schrute. - Hello,traitor. I think you have the wrong number,michael. I want you to listen to me,friend, And i want you to listen to me good. I am going to come at you, And i'm going to come at you hard. I'm going to steal all of your clients, And then i am going to kill them in front of you. Michael. - I'm just getting hardcore with him. - Finally. Yes,and hear me,dwight, When i say i brought you into this rld, And i can take you out. Bill cosby. Mr. Schofield,please. - He's in a meeting. - Damn it! Is mr. Schofield there? If you'd like to reach an outside line, Please dial nine first. So,you think michael's going after the whal huh? I have a long relationship with harper collins publishers And mr. Schofield. I'm not worried. You sound worried. And you have bad skin. Oh,look,everyone,we're all making observations! Well,if yocould do me a big favor And tell mr. Schofield that michael scott has tickets To the wilkes-Barre penguins game this weekend, And if he would like to join me Hello,daniel. How are you? I sure do. Yes. Wantedo thase k,of ficedid kathy ever make jv? Look at that old dude and his rolodex go. I spent a month putting that rolodex on his blackberry, Which he now uses as a nightlight. Wow. High score? And no,i cannot lower my current prices. Hold on. Hello? Mr. Schofield,thank you so much for taking the time to talk. I wanted to discuss your contract with us-- Oh,you're considering him. I thought michael scott left the paper business After his nervous breakdown. Michael has been talking to my biggest client. Master and apprentice Pitted against one another For the fate of the greater scranton area paper market. So it's not exactly likehighlander,but still. Hello,dwight. I've been expecting your call. What do you want? I would like to arrange a truce. So you heard schofield is considering a switch, And you want mercy? Meet me in our spot in four minutes. No. No. You think i'm going to fall for that? - There's no - Michael. Meet-- Okay,go to the spot, And then walk 100 feet. In which direction? Toward the sun. - At what time? - Noon. That-- You have two seconds. Michael. Sorry. Dwight. Michael. I hope you're not recording this conversation. Good. I cannot believe that y sided with charles. You were making me do things that were not all right. So you just rat me out? You could have said no. And not come through for you? If you want a truce, I will give you a truce. - I want a truce. - I do too. Let me take you and your whole company out for lunch at alfredo's. Cooper's. I had fish yesterday. Damn it. Dwight-Elicious. Where you at? Oh,hi,michael. I'm so sorry i'm late. I got stuck in traffic. Really? That's weird. We didn't see any. - I hit a bear. - What? He's technically fine. I imine the true horror will be When he wakes up in a zoo. Hey,listen,will you do me a favor And order the meatball parm for me, - With extra cheese? - Yeah,sure. Good. I will see you very soon,all right? Okay. See you in a bit. Dwight hit a bear. He'll be here in a sec. - Sounds neat. - We can spend a couple days there. Oh,my god,i think we've been robbed. Did you enjoy your lunch? Dwight,not now. We've en robbed. No,michael,you were sabotaged. No,dwight,we were robbed. How would you even know? You're still stuck in traffic. You? Me. What about our truce? I broke it. - On purpose? - Yes. Why? You think this is some kind of game? No,this is a war, And i will not stop. I will not rest. You have no idea what kind of enemy you've created. You have unleashed the wolf! Be that as it may, I have your meatball parm sandwich here, And i am going to eat it. And i knew that you would do that. Their meatball parm is their worst sandwich. Oh. Bastard! Hi there. Dwight schrute here. I was just calling to see if michael scott paper Was meeting all of your paper needs, And how is brenda,age four,ponytail, And simon,age seven? Oh,you don't say. Schrute,dwight. And on the back he wrote, "Great salesman,better friend." "Tall" and "beets." And say hello to cheri, Who is your black wife. I see you're begging for mercy,huh? Well,you will find none here. Dwight,do you mind if we talk? Sure. That'd be fine. If you keep coming after us, The michael scott paper company cannot succeed. This is war,and that is what happens. Oh,one more thing. I'm going to have you listen While i ea your biggest client. Oh,no. No,no,no,no. Oh,uh,oh,i'm turning you down right now. You can hear me,but i can't hear you. Mr. Schofield's re ady to see you now,mr. Scott. Oh,great. Mr. Schofield's ready to see me. Thank you so much. Don't let him in! He's a traitor! Michael! Walking in the door Michael. Good to see you. Mr. Schofield,good to see you. And i'm closing the door. Now,when dwight tells you That he will keep prices steady for a year, I think he is speaking out of turn. - Really? - Yes. He does not have the authority to say that. I,on the other hand, Am the president,the owner,and the founder. It is like you are buying software from bill ges. Are you saying you invented paper? Okay,okay. Oh,god. Okay,tuna. - Hey,guys. - Hey. Hello. Excuse me,can i have your attention,everyone? He's the deal,everybody. Jim halpert is very upset and disturbed. I don't know if it was something you did, Something you said,a look you have him. Maybe it was nothing at all, But here's the deal,okay? It stops now. I guess i could be nicer. Andy,i think jim is messing with you. Oh,really? - Okay. - Yeah,okay, What the heck is happenin' here? Two things i need you to understand. One,pam and i are very happy together, - Uh,that's not what was - And two, That stuff that happened with you and angela is a bummer, Ani ow that you don't think you're ever gonna find someone else, But you will. I promise you. You will. Oh,man. He got me so good. I learned something about myself today. I wish this was a sofa, 'Cause i feel like i could sit here and talk for hours. What is that thing that dwight always says? Paper is the soil in which the seeds of business grow? It's not the soil! It's the manur paper is the manure! On-Time delivery is the soil! - Uh,hel,dwight. - Spin move. April 13th,2002. Dwight,i'm in a meeting. That's very rude. I barge because i care. April 13th,2002, That is the date when you tried to switch paper providers Foan obscure sociology textbook, But were hung out to dry When the price of glossy stock increased. Maybe we should schedule a meeting on our-- La,la,la. Continuing. Notice my persistence and recall. Continuing! You called dunder mifflin, And your order was filled Within an hour! I'm going to pull a date ouof the air right now. April 13th,2002. That is the last day That you evaluated your paper needs. Is it not? We all know that the economy is bad, And bloated companies like dunder mifflin - Come on. - are going to fall by the wayside. Two of their branches have closed within the last year. The michael scott paper company however, Has opened a new branch this very month. What he's not telling you is that he will abandon you. Why don't you guys just email me your best offers, And we can finish it up that way. That sounds like a fantastic idea. I will see you this weekend for the penguins. Box seats as usual. Uh,okay. Sure. - Good,good,good. - I will see you. Thank you,mr. Schofield,for your time. Much appreciated. Oh,and tell me,um, How's your gay son? Excuse me? I color code all my info. I wrote "gay son" in green. Green means go, So i know to go ahead and shut up about it. Orange means "orange you glad you didn't bring it up?" Most colors mean "don't say it." How is tom,the homosexual sophomore? I wanted to start a company,not a war, Because in a war, You always fight those you are closest to. And the great tragedy of the civil war Is that brother fought ainst brother. For what? What purpose did that serve? Apart from abolishing slavery? In that case,war was the right choice. This doesn't feel as important,though. That's just how the world works,i guess. It's 4:30 in the morning. Do you know where your kids are? If you are Ryan's parents or Pam's parents or my parents, you do. They're gonna be in this van. With me. Who am I? Nothing to fear. I am just a 44-year-old guy with a paper route. Time to make the donuts! Come on. No, I promise I won't do it again. Come on. De-nied! We've been making 5:00 a.m. deliveries for a couple weeks now. Ever since I've gotten clean, there's something about fresh morning air that just really makes me sick. Time to make the donuts! Boner patrol! Arrest that man! Your donuts make me go nuts! We got the van at a used car lot. We think it says "Alleluia Church of Scranton" in Korean. It was either this or an old school bus with an owl living in it. You didn't happen to bring any coffee, did you, Michael? - Milk and sugar. - Awesome. You're a life saver. - Wait, is this just milk and sugar? - That's what I said. Do you drink this every day? Every morning. We're doing okay. A couple weeks in and we're having fun. We have 20 Excuse me. Sorry. Sorry, no. It's It's a paper company now. It's not for the church. Proofreading: So. &amp; Valpi Episode 5x22 "Broke" Who covers Bans Pet Grooming? - They're my client. - No, they were your client. They just called, they're switching over to Michael Scott Paper Company. Shame, Jim. I expected more. In the last month, we have lost ten major clients to Michael Scott. What can we do? They keep undercutting us on price. I don't want excuses. I want improvements. This is unacceptable. Hey, boss. I'd just like to point out that I have be here less time - than these guys. - Why are you telling me this? I just think the bar should be lower for a newbie. Is this something you really want to have said? I don't want to have said that. But I think it's important that you know it. I don't know what to do to inspire these people. - OK, maybe it's my fault - It's not your fault. Some people just don't want to be inspired. I wrote a memo to all departments asking them to find ways to save money. But I got your memo. Thank you. I'm putting my foot down when it comes to expense reports. Waste not, want not. Well said, Angela. Been there, done that. You know what we need? We need some couches. We should really consider getting a delivery guy. You know what you would love? It's if we built a loft. Why would I love that? - Can we afford a delivery guy? - Like in a dorm room. You put your desk underneath, you have your loft up top. You can sleep up top. - I know what a loft is. - Most dorm rooms don't even have that. - Most do in the magazines. - Let's see what a delivery guy costs. We should look into that. Or we just go for the loft. Would you let Charles know that David is here, please? We've been expecting you, David Wallace. - Charles and I were waiting for you. - There he is. There he is. How was the trip up? A lot better than a month at the Scranton Radisson, I'm sure. It hasn't been that bad. These people are the salt of the earth. You couldn't ask for a better way to learn a company. I feel like I should be thanking you. The conference room is ready if we want to get started. I just want to address everyone first. Take your time. Stanley, pay attention. Hi, everyone. Look. It's no secret It is no secret that Michael Scott has siphoned off a largchunk of our core business. I'm here I just want to reassure everyone that we think this is just a temporary setback. Maybe, and I don't know, if you had just returned Michael's call, none of us would've lost clients. I've been wondering that myself lately. Wee just gonna get started. We're gonna figure this out. Rest assured. - Jim, can you come in with us please? - Jim. Hold on. You know, David, Dwight's been my guy. I find that extraordinarily surprising. He shows promise. And Jim, I don't He's been disappointment. - We'll bring 'em both in. - Great. Dwight, come on in. Also Jim. Come along, afterthought. How much can we afford to pay a delivery guy? - If these numbers are correct - They are correct, sir. Then you can't afford to pay him anything. A lame attempt at humor. Swing and a miss. Your prices are too low. Lowest in town. Why do you think Staples and Dunder Mifflin can't match? Corporate greed? Our pricing model is fine. I reviewed the numbers myself. Over time with enough volume, we become profitable. With a fixed cost pricing model, that's correct. But you need to use a variable cost pricing model. OK, sure. Right. So Why don't you explain what that is So they can under - Explain what that is. - Explain what you think that is. - Just explain. - As you sell more paper and your company grows, so will your costs. For example, delivery man, health care, business expansion. Whatever, yeah. So At these prices, the more paper you sell the less money you'll make. Our prices are the only thing keeping us in business. They're actually putting you out of business. Hold on, hold on. Ty, I would like you to crunch those numbers again. - It's a program. There's no such - Just crunch 'em, please. Crunch. Did it help? Hi, Jerry. Michael Scott. This is slightly embarrassing. I'm going to have to ask you to pay me a little bit more money for that delivery we dropped off yesterday. We did. We got the check. But we're just going to need a much, much bigger check. When a child gets behind the wheel of a car and runs into a tree, you don't blame the child. He didn't know any better. You blame the 30-year-old woman who got in the passenger seat and said, "Drive, kid. I trust you". Now would corporate approve a temporary price reduction for returning customers? - God, no. - Stupid. Makes us look weak. I agree. It just I say we fill Michael's office with bees. My apiarist owes me a favor. Really? Does he do good work or No, Jim. I use a bad apiarist. Fellas, why don't we take a five-minute break? And then we will come back, start fresh, sort this out. Five minutes exactly. - Dwight, can I talk to you? - Sure thing. I saw you called. You're just out of business? We have maybe a month. - I don't know what I'm gonna do. - Don't worry about it. - We'll figure it out. We'll be okay. - That's what Michael said. Only this time we will be okay. Idiot. Idiot. Idiot. - My new "Dwight" ring. - I like it. Good, right? Idiot, we're starting back up. This is Dwight, by the way. Don't worry. Did I ever tell you about the day that Steve Martin died? - Steve Martin's not dead. - I know. But I always thought that the day that he died would be the worst day of my life. And I was wrong. It's this. You want to hear something sad? I would love that. So Jim and I are getting married and the wedding's really expensive, so I tried to get a job on the weekends to earn extra money. I applied to Old Navy, Target and Wal-Mart. None of 'em called me back. Not even for an interview. I never went to Thailand. Really? I went to Fort Lauderdale. Was it nice? Yeah, it was amazing. There was a great pad thai place, though. I love pad thai. You never had pad thai. There's a lot I haven't done. This is the projection of over three months. - We still have the inventory sitting. - That's assuming he's gonna Let me float something out there. Can I just say something? There is a hive of bees outside the front door. We kidnap the queen, extract her alarm pheromones, place them on a flushable wipe, put that in his bathroom. I can't believe I'm about to say this, but the cheapest option is to make Michael an offer. Yes, I was gonna say the same thing. We should buy him out. But you didn't. Oh, man! If only Michael had children. That's how you really apply the pressure. - What is wrong with you? - Jim, you're pretty close with him. You think they'd be up for hearing an offer? I don't know. They've taken a good deal of clients. I guess I could go down there and try to nudge them in the right direction. You know what? Why don't I do it? Michael adores me. I'm the man for this job. - Charles, you got my back? - Jim, I think you should go. OK, so I'll be back in Back in a bit. - Can I talk to you? - We're not hiring. - Actually here for something else. - I can't make you laugh right now. You know I love a good guessing game, but why don't I tell what I'm here for? Turns out you've made a pretty big dent in the Dunder Mifflin sales. - Nice. - David Wallace has asked me to come and see if you would be interested in Dunder Mifflin buying you out. Seriously? - Are you being serious? - He's bluffing. What you don't understand is that this company's worthl We don't have I'm here to learn as little information as possible. All I really need to hear is if your incredibly successful company would be receptive to a buyout. - Maybe. - Three yes. I will see you titans of industry upstairs. We're not only tight-ends, we are also quarterbacks. - Missed the last part. - That's a pun. Got it. OK, so you're not going to reveal in any way - that we're broke. - Of course not. That we're having any problems at all. Just to reiterate, none of us is going to say anything that might indicate we are going broke. There is no way in hell that I'm going to say that we're broke. I'm really worried I'm gonna say it. You're fine. We have to come from a position of strength. - Put it out of your mind. - It is. I'm good. Michael Scott Paper Company to see Mr. David Wallace. I believe we're expected. How the turntables In order to expedite these negotiations, we are prepared to make you a very generous offer. And we are prepared to reject that offer. - You haven't even heard - Never accept their first offer. What is your second offer? $12,000. Are you kidding me? That is insultingly low. I don't even want to hear what your first offer was. What do you hear? Here's the situation. Your company is four weeks old. I know this business. I know what suppliers are charging. I know you can't be making very much money. I don't know how your prices are so low but I know it can't keep up that way. I'm sure you're scared. Probably in debt. This is the best offer you're gonna get. I'll see your situation and I'll raise you a situation. Your company is losing clients left and right. You have a stockholder meeting coming up and you're going to have to explain why your most profitable branch is bleeding. So they may be looking for a little change in the CFO. I don't need to wait out Dunder Mifflin. I think I just have to wait out you. I don't know that I can get this. I do have to go to the board for approval. How's about $60,000? - We'll have to talk - What? - We're gonna have to talk about this. - Just amongst ourselves. Please take the room. Be right outside. Take your time. - $60,000? - We are so rich. Jerry, the one who got away. May I ask why you're leaving the Michael Scott Paper Company? Really? Please hold. May I have your attention? The Michael Scott Paper Company is broke. What? How'd you hear that? They've been calling their clients and begging them to pay more money. They're desperate. Which can only mean one thing. They're total failures. Great work. I mean, great detective work. 'Cause this must be the first case you've ever cracked. You don't crack a case. At has a pejorative connotation. Like calling a policeman a cop. You solve a case, and yes, I've solved plenty. So how long can they stay viable? What are your top five cases? - I'm gonna answer Charles. - Because you've solved zero cases. One. Case of the beet bandit. Missing beets from all over the farm. No footprints. Inside job. Mose in socks. Case closed. Do not go anywhere near the conference room. Done. Because you have embarrassed me for the last time today. - Got it? - I'm not following you. You two are morons. Got it. Get out. So you've thought it over, yes, and you accept our offer. We can finally put this whole thing behind us? Can you give us another minute please? How could you do this to me? You just cost me $60,000. - Why would you get the whole thing? - It's a lot of money. But we need money coming in every week. We need jobs. Wouldn't you rather have a fishing pole than a fish? I would rather have $60,000, honestly. No, Michael's right. Jobs are safer. Agreed? Agreed. But that's all, OK? - Discuss these things - Shut up. I want my old job back. I want my old parking space back. I want a Sebring. They don't make them anymore. And I want Charles gone. I am not firing Charles. He's very valuable. - That's very kind of you to say. - I need him gone. - Then I want Pam back. - You already have a new receptionist. Sales. - Pam's not a salesperson. - Yes, she is. At the Michael Scott Paper Company - in its heyday. - That's right. - Please continue. - And Ryan. Ryan cost Dunder Mifflin hundreds of thousands of dollars. You know, David? I don't care if Ryan murdered his entire family. - He is like a son to me. - Do you realize what you're asking for? You're talking about salary plus health benefits. And dental this time. Insurance, taxes, social security for three people. This is a lot more than 60 grand. It's a multi-million dollar buyout. These are our demands. Your company cannot be worth that much. Our company is worth nothing. That's the difference between you and I. Business isn't about money to me, David. If tomorrow my company goes under, I will just start another paper company. And then another and another and another. I have no shortage of company names. That's one of 'em! These are our demands. This is what we want. Our balls are in your court. Deal. Can we have the room, please? Can you believe it? Great job! Right here! That's what I'm talking about! There are certain defining moments in a person's life. The day he is born. The day he grows hair. The day he starts a business. And the day he sells that business back to Dunder Mifflin. What have I learned from all of this? It is far too early to tell. I am flying high and I don't even want to think about it. I just want to enjoy it. You're done. At least once a year, i like to bring in Some of my kevin's famous chili. The trick is to undercook the onions. Everybody is going to get to know each other in the pot. I'm serious about this stuff. I'm up the night before pressing garlic And dicing whole tomatoes. I toast my own ancho chilies. Jesus. It's a recipe passed down from malones for generations. It's probably the thing i do best. the office S05 ep24 Someone is returning! He started his own company, and now he's back. Who could it be? I'll give you a hint. He is a man. A man you have missed with all your heart. A man who has ruined all other men for you. Who is it? - Who is it? - Who is it? It's michael scott. Hold it up. Conference room, five minutes. Well, i guess the first order of business Is to welcome back me and pam and ryan. And how about casual friday again, huh? Reinstituting casual friday? You all look great. What i want to do right now Is try something a little different. I'm going to throw it out there, starting with this meeting. I want you guys to run it. I want you to say whatever you want, Take it away. Your meeting. Wh-What are you doing? If there is something That you would like to say as a group, Then by all means, you may say it to me right now. Okay. - Yes. - People are dressed inappropriately. Take it up with toby. What i want you to do Is i want you to look inward. And i want you to reflect. And i want you to say something different. Can you give us a hint? When i needed salespeople for my new paper company, Everyone here turned their back on me. Am i going to ask them to beg for forgiveness? No. Am i going to ask for a big, crying apology? No. Am i going to ask them to slit their wrists for me? No. I just want a tiny, microscopic version of that. Oscar, what were you going to say? Nothing. I didn't say anything. All right. Do i still have a job here? Not important. Okay, all right. - Yes. Yes, you have a job. - ?? Frankly, you have a job because ryan and pam Are starting with us as salesmen. - Wait, what? - How is that going to work? It's going to work very smoothly, Because pam and ryan are bringing over a ton of clients From michael scott paper company and-- You mean the clients you stole from us. Yeah, aren't we getting those clients back? No, you lost those clients. - I call foul, sir. - Okay. You were bought out. So the company then bought out all of the stolen clients. Okay, dwight, let me explain something to you. I set the rules and you follow them. Blindly. Okay? And if you have a problem with that, Then you can talk to our complaint department. It's a trash can. Don't fall in love with me, kid. Boscov's at the steamtown mall? It sure looked good on the mannequin. - Well, you have good taste. - Well, thanks. I sure wish i had more time to talk to my clients, though. What? Isn't that what you said to a bunch of my clients When you were stealing them? That i didn't have enough time for them? Oh, i, um Close your mouth, sweetie, you look like a trout. The man is wearing sandals. I don't need to see oscar's toes at work. Gross! I mean he looks like he just got off the boat! Can't you just not look at his feet? Excuse me? You're so educated, aren't you, toby? So trained to deal with a hysterical woman. I don't want to look at his feet. Do your job! Well, i was in the seminary for a year And dropped out 'Cause i wanted to have sex with this girl, cathy. ??Followed her to scranton. Took the first job i could find in h.R. Later she divorced me. So no, i wouldn't say i have a passion for h.R. - There you are, my friend. - Oh, thanks, man. Pamela. - Thanks, michael. - Yep. Fresh hot ink. "New file system." Trust me, stanley, You're going to want to read this memo very carefully. ??I am not changing the way i do my files. No. No. This goes for all of you. Believe me, You are going to want to heat my words. When held over heat, The invisible ink will reveal That everyone should meet at the warehouse immediately. Do not ask me where i got the invisible ink. Urine. It was urine. I'm sorry you're offended by my shoes, But i'm not going to drive home to change. - I could loan you a pair of socks. - No. No, they're clean. I was going to wear them to volleyball practice later. I don't think so. Andrew bernard. Okay, what are you still doing at your desk? What are you still doing not at your desk? Did you even read the memo? All my files are now in reverse alphabetical order-- No, you idiot. There is a code embedded in the memo. Listen, you need to round up all the salesmen, Except for ryan and pam, And get them down to the warehouse pronto. Oh, it is on like a prawn who yawns at dawn. Stop doing rhyming poetry. Just tell them, please. God, the simplest thing. We're in crisis mode here, do you understand? The two unqualified so-Called salespeople Are being favored Because they all failed together. And frankly, i'm not convinced that michael and pam Didn't have a thing going while they were gone. Can i address that? - No, you're too close. - Okay. Stanley, how do you feel About those two taking your clients? It's not right. I don't like it. He doesn't like it. You don't take my clients away And give them to a secretary. No offense, jim. I think she's very pretty. Her face is okay, but. Jesus! What-- What are you doing here? I don't know. I saw a crowd. I thought there might be a dogfight - or something-- - Get out! We need to do something. I'm thinking maybe a coup or we take ryan hostage. - Those sound too harsh. - No, i'm not saying we do those things. I'm saying something like those things. - Of course. - What is like a hostage? Excellent question. We could write a strongly-Worded letter. Words will never be enough. Strongly-Painted picture. - No, pictures are too interpretive. - Can i just say something? I know that tempers are high, But i think the best way to handle this Might be to just talk to michael directly. Well, that-- That's a great idea, jim. Oh, i totally see your point. Okay, we'll talk to michael directly. So uh, meeting is over, i guess. - I'll see everyone upstairs. - Great, see you upstairs. Come on. Now is the time for action. I'm talking action-- - That was great. - I know. - Why are you so mad? - You look so classy in that picture. I do? Well-- Where is that bowl? - Hey, you have a second? - Michael scott paper company only. Yeah, i think you're gonna want to cool it with that, 'Cause it's starting to upset the other salesmen. - Okay, well - tough. I will-- No, no. I'll talk to them when they all get back from the bathroom. This is awkward to talk about But there may or may not be-- But definitely is-- A mutiny forming in the warehouse right now. - Against who? - You. - Us. - What? It's gotta be because they all want their clients. The old michael scott might have taken this, But not the new michael scott. They are in for a bitter surprise. I am not to be truffled with. Six weeks ago, None of these people wanted to come with me. You two were the only ones with the stones to follow. That was us, right there. We were something else. What you gotta do Is you gotta go down to that warehouse And you gotta crack some skulls. Chiklis style. Yeah, the commish. Yes, but chiklis shield style. - Okay. - Not commish style. Yeah, yeah. The shield. It's crazy what's going on out there today, huh? I know. Yeah, it's kinda-- Sometimes it's best just to stay out of it. That's true. That's right. Yeah. Want to play a game? Hey, gang. Where you been? Lunch. - Where'd you eat? - A restaurant. What'd you have, stanley? I had a salmon salad. With water, no ice. I was going to get a soda, But the waitress talked me out of it. Her name was flo, she had black hair. I had mexican food. So since you guys already ate, You won't be eating the stuff That you brought with you for lunch, will you? stanley. Is that egg salad? - Andy brought some salmon. - That looks great. Dwight, is that a meat sandwich? You guys hungry? I can eat. I'm going to have some of this meat sandwich. It's pony. What kind of sauce is on your salmon? Dijonnaise. Thanks for going out, guys. Hey, meredith, can i talk to you privately for a second? About what? Your outfit. What? What's wrong with my outfit? You-- You might consider pulling it down a touch. It's ri-- It's riding up a little high. A bunch of prudes. You know, oscar's allowed to wear sandals, But i'm not allowed to wear open-Toed shoes? Is that how it goes? Meredith, your boob is out. Fine. No! Meredith, too far! Damn it, meredith, where are your panties? It's casual day. Happy? Toby! Toby, toby! Toby. No. If you do that, i'm gonna do that. If you do that, i'm gonna do that. If you do this, i'm going to do that. Well, what if i just do this? You don't want to do that. I'm just hiding out until all this stuff blows over. With creed. Playing chess. At work. He's winning. I feel like i'm describing a dream i had. I'm sorry you feel that way, mr. Bart. Is there anything i can do to make things better? Give me the phone. Give me the phone. - Exactly. - ??That's my client. - This is your first complaint in ten years. - ?? - Things have been generally good. - Give me the phone. Tell him dwight schrute wants to talk to him. - Look, uh, mr. Bart - hi, mr. Bart. - At these prices with this service - Hey, it's dwight here. - Give me the phone. - You're not gonna find this anywhere else. - Dwight schrute here. Hey, don't hang up. - No, no, no. Sir, don't listen. I know times are tough right now, And i laud your thriftiness. - Ryan, hand the phone over. - Ryan! Stop flustering me, everybody! Who let this boy on the phone? Mr. Bart! I cannot believe you lost that account. He was my client for ten years! You made him lose the account By screaming at him the entire time. It's okay, ryan. You're a secretary! What do you know? - Okay. - And you're a temp. And i'm taking your phone. - I'm confiscating this. - Hey, hey, guys. You know what i want you to do? Shake hands, get over it. That was not a shake, dwight. We want our clients back or we quit, michael. Who quits? Me. And me. Me too. You guys gotta be kidding. No, we gotta be deadly serious. We'll start our own paper company. The schrute-Bernard- Lapin-Vance Stanley paper company. I love it. I love this idea, and i fully support you. As a matter of fact, i'm going to give you some seed money. There you go. There's some seed money for you. And you can take it, no hard feelings. But if you stay, i want an apology, And i want a big one. - You want us to apologize to you? - Yes, i do. That's completely backwards. It's frontwards. Michael, you thought you were attacking corporate, But we were the ones who got hurt. You should be apologizing to us. - That's right. - Right. Michael, you always said we were a family. Then you went after us. No matter how i look at this, i am in the wrong. And i have looked at this thing, Like, a hundred different ways. From my point of view, From their point of view And the bottom line, i am in the wrong. I'm the bad guy. I need you to arrange a meeting Between me and the sales staff Without ryan and pam knowing. Gasp. Are you talking about a secret meeting? Whatever you guys did earlier. I don't know the first thing about secret meetings. - Just do it, okay? - I'll do-- - Get 'em there. Get 'em there. - I'll do the best i can. Are you kidding me? - Deceit does not come easy to me. - Okay, okay, okay. I really love your outfit. Thank you so much for saying that. I can't believe that toby thinks this is inappropriate. You look like j-Lo. So from the bottom of my heart To the top of my heart, i am sorry. Are you giving us our clients back? If we could just focus and go down the line, And everyone would say, "apology accepted," I think we would all feel better. And then we can break out my gift to you-- Complimentary white chocolate bark. Nobody likes that stuff except for you. They wouldn't make it unless people liked it. Michael, just give us our clients back. That's all we care about. Okay. If i give you your clients back There won't be enough clients for pam and ryan, And i promised both of them that they were gonna be salespeople. - So? - Fine, have your clients. I can see that's what you wanted all along. Okay. However, i rescind my apology. - Okay. - That's fair. You are not reacting at all as i had hoped. What'd i tell you about building forts in my warehouse? Michael gave all of our clients Back to their old salespeople, So now there's not enough for both me and pam to stay on. He can only keep one of us as a salesperson now. He'll make his decision by the end of the day. I think you should get it. You really grew into it. I think you should get it. You've changed a lot And you'd be good at it. If you really think that, will you tell that to michael? That would go a long way coming from you. Yeah. Thanks. So hey, I want to set you up with my daughter. Oh, i'm engaged to pam. I thought you were gay. Then why would you want to set me up with your daughter? I don't know. Jim. Can i talk to you for a minute? Sure, let me just finish this turn. And bingo was his name. Let's go. Challenge. I need your help. This whole pam/ryan debate is screwing with my head. I don't want to be biased, but i am very close to ryan. - You know that. - You're close with pam too. - she's nice, i guess. - You know what? Best thing to do, pros and cons list. Pro for ryan, he went to business school. He's my number one choice. - Well, that's-- - I like his hair. Cons, ryan. He defrauded the company. - He has never made a sale. - Okay. - He definitely stole my ipod. - That sounds pretty biased. You didn't hear my pros. Environmentally-Conscious 'Cause his mom drives him to work every day. Okay. Pam, pros. I like her. I think that she is a fast learner. Cons, she doesn't always follow through. Sh-- New york and the whole art school thing. And roy. She has a weird voice. - That's not true. - I don't need to tell you that. I think she'd be a really good salesperson. I don't think you are being totally impartial, though, Because you haven't said one bad thing about pam. - And i won't. - Okay. So be it, then you've lost credibility. And i'm going to go with my gut, and that's ryan. ?? You're right, sometimes when she is tired, She can be a little bit shrill. But that's not a weird voice. Take it easy. man! Honey! I want you to bring the garbage out. 'Cause i'm not going to have sex with you Unless you bring out the garba-- I have a very difficult decision to make. It's like last week i was at the video store. Do i rent devil wears prada again? Or do i finally get around to seeing sophie's choice? It is what you would call a classic difficult decision. You don't understand clothing, toby. You're dressed like this amorphous blob of khaki. All right, look, what you gotta understand Is when you come to work, you give up certain rights. Listen up, flenderson. You're being weak and ineffectual. I'm cowboying this meeting, okay? Here are the new rules. Okay, earth tones only. Also, women are forbidden to wear pants. All right, come on. Sit down, dwight. - No. - I'm running this meeting. - That's debatable. - It's not. ??It's not. Sit down or i'm writing you up. where has this guy been? Casual fridays are cancelled. Let's just not do it anymore. - No, it is a solution. - You're running from the problem. There's not a single appropriate outfit In this whole-- Except mine, quite honestly. Pam, can you come in here, please? Have a seat. ?? Well, there's no easy way of saying this. So i think i will just drag it out. - Since the dawn of time there has been-- - Just tell me. I gave ryan the sales job. There just weren't enough clients for the two of you. So i had to-- - No, okay.Okay, i get it. Yeah. - I'm sorry. Sorry. Why are you giggling? Is this a joke? Michael, is this-- Did i get the job? - Yes, you did. - I did? - Yep. - For real, you're not kidding? - No, you-- No. - I did?! No, you're the best person for the job. - You're going to be great. - Oh, michael, thank you. Thank you. Thank you. You will not be sorry. You should've seen your face. Oh, man! that was classic. I really thought i didn't get it. - Oh, really? - Yeah. - 'Cause you said i didn't. - Oh, man. That was really good. - That was really good. - Oh, what about ryan? I don't know, i offered him his temp job back. We'll see. He was not happy at all when i offered him this job, And then i told him he didn't get the job, so. Yeah. Maybe you shouldn't fake fire people anymore. I don't appreciate you telling me what to do. So clean out your desk, you are through here. Thanks, michael. What's our receptionist's name? Erin. Could you send her in? Erin. Michael wants to see you. - Hello. - Hi. Have a seat. This is very difficult to say, But no one here likes you in the office And we are going to have to let you go. Hank, would you come up here, please? Hank is our security guard. - Oh, i can go. - He will be ushering you out. Oh, your face! - Is-- Do the people-- - No, i'm kidding. No, you're not-- You're not fired. Yet. Do they not like me, though? - I don't know, actually. - Okay. Oh,my god! I can't believe it! I just won an art contest. Thanks. I still don't understand why you wanted me to say that. Shut up. I got her! Not cool,dwight. Not cool,man. S05E25 Oh no! I still have the lease On the michael scott paper company, So occasionally i will sneak down here For a little coffee and dancing. I actually dance all the time. Tiptoeing around corporate,it is a ballet. When i am breaking all the rules,I'm break dancing. And expresso. Guys,i'm scared. I'm really scared. I think i'm growing into a giant, Because look at this normal-size coffee cup. Looks so tiny in my giant hand now. - Anybody want to go to lunch with me later on? - I do. Okay,how about a woman? Pam? Oh,i can't do lunch. I was just sending you an eil. Jim and i need to leave early today To meet with our contractor. - Oh,really? Okay. - Just sent it. What about the rest of you? At dunder mifflin,there is a very strict No-lunch-with-the-boss policy. And i don't know who instituted it. I think it started right after my precessor stepped down. But at the michael scott paper company, I really enjoyed having lunch with pam and ryan every day. So rules be damned,I want to have lunch with these people. Who else? I don't do lunch. I'm doing five small meals a day now. Now that i'm back to doing the job Of a temp again, I find that food is one thing i can control. Okay,anyone? Anyone at all. Accounting? I am accounting on you to go to lunch with me. No,i don't want to stay late to have a two-hour lunch. Mhael,we have a lot of work to do. - What?! - Work. Oh,well,god! What happened to you people? We are just office drones. We are office drones. All we do is work Is work If you don't take out his battery, He just keeps going alda Oh,no,your battery fell out. I was just learning to love. Hi,guys. How are you doing? Erin,how many times do i have to tell you? It is not necessary for you to ask uhow we are doing Every time you interact with us. You're right. I'm sorry. Now,how can i help you? Did somebody here leave a map in the printer To youngstown,ohio? Attention,office. Who here is planning a trip Tooungstown,ohio? I will take your silence to mean That you're all hiding something. This location is the superior court-- So if someone's going to a court,big deal. It is a big deal. 'Cause there's only a handful of reasons Why someone would ever go to a courthouse in ohio, And not be charged with a crime. To claim ainheritance from a deceased relative. To obtain a learner's permit At age 141/2 instead of 15. - Erin,let me see your birth certificate. - Sure. There are other reasons to go to ohio. We're getting married today. So it turnsut it's the closest place To get a marriage license Without a three-day waiting period. - Tell 'em how it happened. - Okay,so we're going through all the wedding plans, And boy,it is complicated. - And very expensive. - Very expensive. 'Cause you say you want a small wedding And that's great. - But then you have to invite-- - You can't leave anyone out. - No one. - Okay,just get to the good part. Right. Oh,so this morning We are having breakfast together And i just looked up from my cereal And i said, "you know what i want to do today? I want to marry you. " I had just woken up. I didn't look cu. That's how i knew heth me eaofntfi icet. Michael? Are you gonna be working down here? Do you want these down here? No work! No work! No work! I come in here to relieve frustration. - Well,i like to swim. - That's good. ou have a cool place to come hang-- If you ever want to come down here,Door's always open. - Lock's broken,so - Thank you. Come on in. Hey,hey,here we go. There we go. - Now you got it. Now you got it. - Yeah,i do got it. Hey,you want some espresso? - Gotta keep yourself dehydrated - That's rule number one. Okay. I love it. I love it. Guys,i believe that i have figured out What is up your butts. There's no reason to be scared. The bad man is gone. Charles is gone. Charles really did a number on these guys. They are way too focused on work. When i was in charge,This place was like dave &amp; buster's. People just hanging out,having fun,eatin' apps. I don't know,it's like Dave died or something. Daddy's here,and daddy's gonna take care of you. Please don't refer to yourself as our daddy. I am your big daddy And i am gonna kiss the boo-boo. Widdle andy is afwaid. - Andy'safwaid? - Yes. - Are you all afwaid? - No. Daddy's here for you,my widdle angels. Okay,i think that i have figured a way To get you guys out of your funk. - What? - Funk is the problem. - And the solution. - That makes sense. I have taken my downstairs office, And i have turned it into a place to hang out. A place where unattractive and attractive people Can get together to meet, to greet,To see the ones that you love. To love the ones that you see. Is this our punishment for not wanting To have lunch with you? Why don't you get over lunch,oscar? Everybody else is pastt. All work and no play Makes michael a dull boy. This is like a haunted coffeehouse? No,dwight is confusing you. It's more of a disco. A haunted disco! With coffee,but without the haunting. It's a combo dance house coffee bar? It is a daytime disco on the ground floor Of an industrial office building. - It's a cafe disco. - Exactly. - So,like,a disco cafe. - No,no. Not even close. I can't force you to go down,but i can entice you. I'm gonna be down there. Erin will be down there from time to time. And all-you-can-eat espresso. Well,kevin,i guess it is just me and you. Holdin' down the fort. - This place is great. - Thank you. Oh,my god,kevin. I am still on hold. You were supposed to get the answer from michael And come back up. - Sorry. - This is a no-work zone. Please respect the lei. Yeah,respect the lei. Come. - Kevin,stay. - Kevin,come. Stay,stay. - Come on,right now. - Cookie,kevin. Cookie. There is no cookie,kevin. Is there a cookie? - Wha-- - come on. Oh,for goodness sakes,kevin! There's no cookie. Come on! Come. I wanted a cookie. Completely unacceptable. Now i know what the founders of philip morris felt like. You just want to give people a smooth,fun way to relax. And suddenly you're just some terrible monster. Here we go. Oh,what the hell. Yeah Hi,jessica. Is bob in? Oh,he's on a call. - I'll just duck my head in. - It's pretty important. He wouldn't want to be disturbed. Can i give him a message before he gets off? Tell him i'm going dancing downstairs in the storage closet Between the bathrooms that used to be a utility shower,And he should join me there. I'll let him know. Phyllis? I like. All right. Back. There you go. There you gogood. Ooh,show me some attitude. Oh,god! Oh,no,no,no. What did you do? You didn't do that. You're okay. Let's lie down. Here we-- you wanna go down? Sorry. That's okay. That solved the problem. It's right here. I got your text. Who's philip? No,no,no. - Who tipped you over? Was it philip? It's my back. - It's her back We just-- we need-- okay,let's-- - call a doctor. You know what,we're gonna take care of you. We're gonna get you help. Come on. Come on. - Come back. - No,no,no. This is no good. Back injuries are common. Not as common as knee injuries,But more common than than wrist injuries. - I don't need a history lesson,okay? - What do you think history is? Just-- we need to get her out of there Because no one is going to want to go in there With a woman writhing around on the floor. Wait,wait,wait. But most importantly,We need to get her some medical attention asap. Stat. Rrroar! Ramming speed. Here we go. Here we go. Out of the way. Move it or lose it. - You having fun? - Oh,my god,what happened? Oh,just having too much fun. Phyllis,we're gonna put you in here. Dwight's gonna take care of you. What? No. I ought we were going to the hospital. If you want to get sick,you go to a hospital. Okay,dwight. Okay,good. I do not want anybody to worry. What happened to phyllis? Ooooh,you know. Nothing. She's-- We were hanging out at cafe disco, And she had a flare-up of an existing injury. But she's a tough old bird,so Can you please go back to work Instead of masterminding these situations Wherein we hurt ourselves. Okay,fine. Phyllis did injure herself. But she injured herself having fun. And i don't think she would trade that memory for anything. I would like the memory of a day uninterrupted By this nonsense. You all took a life here today. You did. The life of the party. - Erin - Yes? I want you to go downstairs,And i want you to shut it down. You mean,like,unplug the coffee machine And bring it up here? I don't care; bury it. I hope you're happy. Okay,i'm gonna need two able-bodied men. Cafe disco. More likecrappedisco. Oh,bad. There's girls in there. - Where? - The other room. - What other room? - Down the hall. - There's girls in there? - What'd i just say? - You get me my sandwich? - Forget the sandwich. Girls. Girls! I guess they got what they want. I am eating alone. Might as well be dinner. Comfy? All right. All right. Just relax. Relax,okay? - Dwight. Dwight! - Come on,relax. This shirt wasn't doing you any favors. If my assessment is correct,You grind your teeth? I do. No kidding. She sits three feet from me. It's the most annoying thing. Like children singing christmas carols. Oh,yeah,i'm wanting the vibe down here. Ashley,you made it! You invited someone? Was i not allowed to do that? I don't know,i've been here eight years,And i've never-- rude. I'm not sure,but i'm pretty sure Cafe disco is dead,But i can still hear the music in my head. I hear it too,boss. Better than imagined it. That feels good,dwight. - Tell me where it hurts. - Right-- ooh! Right there. You've got a knot in your crest. This remedy has been passed down in my family for generations And it always works. My grandfather was told that diamond dancer Would never race again. They were wrong. He came in ninth in the apple creek derby. And his jerky came in third the following year. A majestic beast. So fast,so tender. Welcome,welcome. Cafe disco. I am michael scott. - Hey,angela,welcome to-- - stop it. Angela,angela,angela, May i interest you in a triple expresso, Or perhaps a dance? No. I didn't come down here to get wet and wild. - I just need you to sign these. - All right. There you go. - You need to sign them all. - No,no,no. One signature for every song. Look,i hate to bethatperson, But i just don't like the general spirit of music. I know,i know. Angela,a lot of people doubted cafe disco at first, But it is a magical place. You have to give it a chance. If these walls could talk,they would say, "this is a magical place. You are safe here. We are talking walls. We're not going to eat you. " No! This is oil from the gland of an otter. It keeps their fur water-resistant As well as traps heat. Now i need you to lie still for an hour. An hour? I can't stay here an hour. girl. Boss,this used to hang from my windshield,But it belongs in here. Hey,thank you,creed. You really get this place. No problem. I'll just have no idea who's driving behind me now. Look out. Here we go. Here we go,okay-- something's gonna happen. Here we go. I'm gonna go with the python. Oh,but the r so scary. No,please I find the rattle soothing. Puts me to sleep. I think bob's gonna cheat on me with his new secretary. What's so funny? When i say it out loud,it-it's so silly. Hey,hey,angela,no-- no cleaning up! You are forcing me to be down here. Am i not allowed to have some fun? No cleaning up. These are for you. They're beautiful. You ready? We should probably stop by. It would mean a lot to him. Jim and pam! Can you believe this? It's really happening! You wan dance,dwight? Ordinarily i would say no. But you need to move to reduce lactic acid build-up. Also,this song is fantastic. Mind if i steal my wife? You can't steal what is legally your property. Are those staples? This dance competition is not over. What dance competition? I was just dancing casually with my friends,ya! Yeah,right! You guys are the best for coming. You don't have to stay if you don't want to. I understand. - Oh,we're gonna stay. - Really? At least for one more dance. Oh,ho,not me,not me! Get out of here. Cafe disco! Come on,man! We're not even on the "y. - " This is so cheesy. - Yes. - I like cheesy. - Me too. You know,i think maybe i want aweddingwedding. - Me too. - Really? - Would you like to dance? - No. Well,stop trying to poke me With a sharp thing. You wanted to do this,okay. Just be brave. I know,but you're not a professional, And i'm thinking maybe we should have gone-- I'm doing-- no,i'm doing it for free. Just,you have to stop squirming Otherwise i'm gonna mess up. Are you sure that's not the gay ear? Gayare you 12 years old? - Well-- - Look,i'm gonna count to three. Count to 20. no,i'm gonna count to three. One,two,three. - Ow,son of a bitch! - Andy,that was just the ice. ***missing***   Dunder mifflin. This is erin. He's not available right now. Uh-Huh. Yes. Sure, i'll give him the message when he gets up. Gets back. Michael had chicken pot pie for lunch. Actually, let me rephrase that. Michael had anentire chicken pot pie for lunch. And-- Let me be more specific. Michael ate an entire family-Sized Chicken pot pie for lunch, And then he promptly fell asleep. So we're all trying to be very quiet So as to not wake him up before 5:00 p.M. Which, actually, should be in about ten minutes. Okay, i'm gonna go in there And change the computer. Are you sure you can change his watch? I can do it. What do you need from me? Normally, i don't condone leaving early. But i have an appointment with the horse doctor. How that horse became a doctor, i don't know. Nah, i'm kidding. He's just a regular doctor Who shoots your horse in the head When its leg is broken. Like clock work. Ohh. Oh, no. Uh-Oh. - What's so funny? - You had to be there! Oh, yay! Geography joke. Oh, my-- Oh, wow. Okay, all right. Let's all go home. Come on. See you all tamale. Good night. - See you later. - Good-Bye, micel! - Yes! - Yes! All right, you ready for this? Yeah, we walk around, everyone sees our faces, And we leave, right? - Yeah. - Okay. Wait, should i have left the car running? Oh, don't get us wrong. We like picnics. Come on, who doesn't like a picnic? Tell 'em at happened last year. I had this huge spider in my baseball mitt. No, no, that guy who hit on me. Oh, right, some drunk guy hit on pam last year. Said he was grabbing her for balance. Yeah, you don't grab these for balance. Well i'm gonna say 30. Insect repellant, which we clearly need, Reduces the effectiveness of spf. Good point, but thought of that already. Combination spf/repellant. - Whoa. Homemade? - Of course. You think the epa would ever allow that much deet? Rolph is my best friend. We met in a shoe store. I heard him asking for a shoe That could increase his speed and not leave any tracks. Michael, isn't that holly? We're just friends. Hey, hey! Wait a second. Who let you in here is what i wanna know. Oh, no. I see they're letting just anybody in here. Yeah, that's right. - All right. - All right, mm-Hmm. - Hey. - Hi. You rember aj my boyfriend? A little bit. Uh, i meet a lot of people. - Hey, michael. - Hey. So would you guys like some lemonade? Or one of you? Or both of you. Either or. The combinations are endless. - Lemonade sounds great. - Okay. I'd love an iced tea, actually. You can go to hell. I'm kidding! Um, sure, i will get you the best iced tea in the world. I lied to kevin. Holly and i can never be just friends. I wrote down a list of bullet points Why holly and i should be together, And i'm going to find the perfect moment today, And i'm going to tell her. Number one: "Holly, you and i are soup snakes." The-- And the reason is because, in terms of the soup, we like to-- That doesn't make any sense. We're soul mates. Holly and i are soul mates. Jim, pam. - Hey, how are you? - Hey, charles. - Nice day, huh? - Yeah. Must be nice to get a rest from all your rest. I don't get it. He's not even my boss anymore. Do you want me to beat him up for you? No, i shouldn't have to ask you To do stuff like that. You should just do it. Listen up, everyone! I've gone overhis lineup very carefully. We cannot forget the humiliation we suffered Last year at the softball game With jim's whole spider-In-The-Mitt incident. Right? Well, i could have died, so i looked it up online afterwards. Erin, back row. Ryan, you move up a w! Bro-Migo, You think you could put erin on my row? Why? I don't understand. If-- No, wait. W- Wait a minute. I get it. You want her to set you up So you can spike it. Uh i' tell you what. I'm gonna do you one better. I'm gonna put you next to phyllis. She's the best setter on the team. That's-- Sly dog. Not what i meant. Come on, folks! What is up with you two, holly? Um, not much. We're designing a house. Cl. For who? For us. Wow. I'm designing a chair. It's part of your pants. You sit down, you're supported. I rember your chair pants idea. I like that. Put me down for a pair. I'm a size 34 waist. All right, fatty. I will do it. You know what? We should actually rehearse. Okay, yeah. You guys are really gonna do this? You bet your fat ass we are. Well, in his infinite wisdom, ?? Llace has authorized us To put on a little presentation About the history of dunder mifflin. Yep, the old comedyeam is back together again. That's right. Have ya hoyd the news? Extry, extry! Read all about it! Newspapers for sale! Are you blind?! Are you blind? Sirwith the glasses, Are you literally blind? I'm concerned you might be in danger. These are expensive ray-Bans, jackass. Okay, i was just looking out for you. You're doing great, by the way. Thanks. I got it. - kevin, come on! - Areyoublind? - I could have gotten that, idiot! It's not a sledgehammer. - Can you see things with your eyeballs? Come on, people. We need to get our heads in the game. Let's focus, come on. You're better than this. I am better than this. Phyllis, why are you sitting on the ground? We've been out here for a while. I don't need this. Oh, come-- Ryan, come on, man! - One second. - W-Wait! Net. Net. Her hand's on the net. - So what? - Rule violation. Ball is ours. Give it to me. Our point! Okay. Hey, pam, how you doing? Hey, do you know if you're right-Handed or left-Handed? Or do you even know? What hand do you use to answer the phone. Back off, dwight. Oh, yeah! Nice hit, pam! What? Maybe i played a little in junior high. And in high school. Maybe a little in college. And went to volleyball camp most summers. - ?? Yeah! We win. - Nice job, beesly. - We advance to the next round! Oh, lord in heaven. Had to be part of the group. I brought some snacky snacks, In case we get hungry. Ooh, yes, please. So what do you have planned for us today? - Hmm? - What? Do you have a script for the sketch, or umno. I just thought we'd wing it. That cool? Crystal cool. - Hit it, andy! - Bump, i bumped it! - Set. - Don't set it to yourself. Yeah! Ow, my ankle! - What happened? - Itwisted it. You weren't even moving. Okay, sub! I can play. Is there a meredith here? Yeah! Man in! Rolph, did you not hear me? I don't hear cheaters, tramps, Or women who break my friend's heart. Let's go! We could do a movie sort of thing. - We couldo back to the future. - Oh! We have to convince dunder and mifflin To go back in time fix their parents. Can we get a delorean? Jaws. They swim in the ocean, And they terrorize the whole community. dun-Der, dun-Der Dunder, dunder, dunder, dunder - We haven't found our great idea yet. - No. No. - We're circling it. - Hmm. Nicely done. We're still gonna crush you, though. - Yes, we are. - You suckers are goin' down! They're gonna wipe their asses with your serves! - Piss all over your faces! - Okay, rolph, rolph. It's true! Ah, this reminds me of the h.R. Convention last fall. Oh, yeah, with bernie and efrem. That was hilarious. - Really, really funny. - Really funny. Listen, guys, one more point, And we play corporat. Settle down, gentlemen. Good game! Welcome to the 43rd annual company picnic, everybody. Thanks for being here. Now a couple of ployees have volunteered To entertain us with a song. Uh, it's a sketch now. Okay, introducing scranton's michael scott Performing with nashua's holly flax. I have not seen this. And now, presenting slumdunder mifflinaire! Are you ready to play slumdunder mifflinaire? Yes, i am! For $100. Where did dunder meet mifflinthe "A," on easy street. "B," a tour of dartmouth college. "C," they never met. "D," brushing their teeth. Ohhi'm thinking. I'm going to say "b," tour of dartmouth college. That is correct! How did you know that? I was there! Aah! I was a tour guide at dartmouth college! Noooo-Ho-Ho! Nice campus. Think you'll get in? Yeah, i'm definitely gettin' in. I'm a shoo-In. I'm robert dunder. I'm robert mifflin. Robert mifflin had a great life. But unfortunately, had undiagnosed depression, Which over nine million americans suffer from, And is ?? For $250, How did he kill himself? "A," a rope. "B," a knife. "C," a gun. "D," brushing his teeth! $250 is more money than i've ever seen in my life. I will say "c," a gun. He shot himself in the head. That is correct! Yes! I usually don't enjoy the theater. But this is delightful. The economic downturn has been difficult recently, Forcing the closures of both camden and yonkers, To be followed soon By what other branch? For $500,000, Is it, "a," scranton? "B," buffalo? - "C," utica? - What? Or "d," toothbrush? I will say "b," buffalo! Final answer! That is correct! What is he talking about? - How did you know that? - David wallace told me! David, is this true? Okay, everyone, we're at a picnic today. Are we losing our jobs or not, david? - They didn't know? - I guess not. I'm sorry, this certainly wasn't the time or the place To announce thisort of thing. But there have been talks about closing the buffalo branch. And we're-- We're closing the buffalo branch. You've gotta be kidding me! - Are you serious? - You've gotta be kidding me! We're the best branch in the company! I can't believe it. How could you possibly think That the right way to announce a branch closing Was in a comedy sketch at the company picnic? Welli didn't know they didn't know. What about the fact that they're here today? - What about that? - That didn't throw up any alarms? No, michael need a little bit for his comedy sketch, And he thought, "oh, this would be really funny." - Thank you. - Damn it, michael. I told you that in confidence. Now i have to go over and deal with these employees And their families. A little boy just walked up to me and said, "Is my daddy gonna have a job by christmas?" Well, he'ju thinking about his own gifts. Maybe we shouldn't play due to the circumstances. Hey, people need volleyball now more than ever. How do you figure? Because if we don't play, Then the other team wins. Dwight's right. Corporate deserves to get its ass kicked. Let's do this. Jim, come on! Look who just woke up! Uhh! I been up for a while! It's six to six. It's a nail-Biter. kav   Seven Now it's seven-Six. Or is that too much accounting for you? Here's an accounting question for you. What does one fiance plus one lover equal? ?? One whore. Okay, knock it off, rolph. What? She's sitting there, casting aspersions-- Rolph, please. I am asking nicely! - Rolph, leave it alone! - ??? - There you go. - You got it. ??? Boo-Yah! Get it! - I got it! - Pam! - You all right? - Yeah. No, no, no, i'm fine. - You sure? - Yeah. - easy??? - Oh, whoa, whoa, whoa. You wanna get that looked at. No, no, it's fine. Just give me a second. I don't know. You know, this is a company picnic, So, technically, that is a company injury. You know, safest thing to do is get that examined. Right, david? - Yeah. - All right, you know what? You're justrying to get rid of our best player. Oh, jim, you're putting a volleyball game In front of your fiancee's health. No, uh-- Look, seriously. I can move it fine. Come on, let's go. It's our ball. Let's go! - I don't kw. - Yeah, i don't think we can let you play with that foot. Come on. Tell you what. I spotted a small hospital A few kilometers south of here. Get her back as soon as possible. I'll stall 'em. I guess that's it for you, jim. All right, you know what? ???Come on, all-Black. We'll be back! Oh, man! I'm so mad that pam got hurt! Argh! Rrrah! I'll get it. Probably shouldn't ve mentioned buffalo. Hindsight. Should have had hindsight. How do you think it went before the buffalo thing? I think it went well. I think it was good. There weren't any laughs. No, it was a tough audience. Yeah, but we wrote it Specifically for this audience. Believe me, I have seen a lot of tough audiences in my time, And that was one of them. Well, i'm glad we did it. Me too. We have a lot of good material For next year's sketch. I can't wait. Yeah, she's with the nurse right now, So you'll have to stall No, don't send in the subs yet. Dwight, i don't know. Think of something. Well, to be safe, we should do an x-Ray. How long will that take? Oh, it shouldn't be too bad. It's a slow day. So no other radiation this year? No metal plates? No chance you're pregnant? I'm sorry, could we just hurry this up? I' got a game to get back to. Oh, good, because my next question was Do you have a game to get back to? What'd you think? I loved it. You know, there was a part near the end That seemed like that went on a little long. But well, you guys should hit the road before i close down another branch. Okay. So good to see you. Good to see you. - Aj. - Michael. I didn't find the perfect moment, Because i think that today Was about just having today. And i think that we are one of those couples With a long story When people ask how we found each other. I will see her every now and then. And maybe one year, she'll be with somebody, And the i'll be with somebody. And it's gonna take a long time and then it's perfect. I'm in no rush. - Ha! - Dwight, come on, now. It's time to put in the subs. Yeah, it looks like pam won't make it back. - Okay? - Okay, fine. All right! Come on. Except, you know what? It's not fine. How many people need to get hurt Before we learn a valuable lesson? One? Two? Three? - Four? - Dwight no, no, hear me out. Five? - Six? - Dwight. Seven. Can i finish, please? Okay. Eight? ???H, dwight, we're so close. Just buy us a few more minutes. Well, they just called me in for an updat So i'll call you right back. ?? Hey, dwight, uh send in the subs. Ohh. 